Barcode : 99999990259221 

Title - The Elementary Structures Of Kinship (1949) 

Author - Bell James Harle. 

Language - English 
Pages - 571 

Publication Year - 1 949 
Barcode EAN.UCC-13 




9999999025922 




Gl 306.83 
LEV 




103508 

IBSNAA 



II 



1 

i 

0 

1 



| snnfcr tott 

Accession No. 

j| Class No. 

y Book No. _ 



'°C^> <>5S>oCS2c <^DoCS3i<S3oC!S» 



i Academy of Administration 

mussoorie 

5^TfTT^JT 

LIBRARY 




SDA iS3 

JLe 



a 

0 

1 
i 

0 

1 
i 

0 

1 
i 

o 

/03s:csi 

H 

o 

a 




TI1E ELEMENTARY 
STRUCTURES OF KINSHIP 




CLAUDE LEVI-STRAUSS 

The Elementary 
Structures of Kinship 

(Les Structures elementaires de la Parente ) 



Revised Edition 
Translated from the French 

by 

JAMFS HARLE BELL 
JOHN RICHARD VOI1 STURMER 

and 

RODNEY NEEDHAM 

Editor 



BEACON PRESS 
BOSTON 




Published first in France under the title Les Structures 
elementaires de la Parente in 1949. A revised edition under 
the same title was published in France in 1 967. 

Translation copyright © 1 969 by Beacon Press 

Library of Congress catalog card number : 68-12840 

First published by Beacon Press in 1969 



First published as a Beacon Paperback in 1969 
International Standard Book Number: 0-8070-4669—8 

9 8 7 0 5 4 

Beacon Press books are published under the auspices of the 

Unitarian Universalist Association 

All rights reserved 

Printed in the United States of America 




TO THE MEMORY OF 

LEWIS H. MORGAN 




Contents 



Editor’s Note page xvii 

Acknowledgements xxii 

Preface to the First Edition xxiii 

Preface to the Second Edition xxvii 

INTRODUCTION 

1 NATURE AND CULTURE 3 



Nature and society. The problem of the transition from nature 
to society. ‘Wild children.’ The superior forms of animal life. 

The criterion of universality. The prohibition of incest as a 
universal rule. 

II THE PROBLEM OF INCEST 12 

Rationalist theories: Maine, Morgan. Conclusions from 
genetics. Psychological theories: Westermarck, Havelock 
Ellis. Sociological theories I: McLennan, Spencer, Lubbock. 
Sociological theories II: Durkheim. Antinomies of the 
problem of incest. 

PART ONE: 

RESTRICTED EXCHANGE 

1. THE BASES OF EXCHANGE 

III THE UNIVERSE OF RULES 29 

Consanguinity and alliance. Prohibition of incest, ‘the rule as 
rule’. The system of the scarce product: rules of alimentary 
distribution. Transition to marriage rules: marriage and 
celibacy. 

IV ENDOGAMY AND EXOGAMY 42 

Polygamy, a special form of reciprocity. True endogamy and 
functional exogamy. Limits of the social group. The case of 
the Apinayd. Exogamy and the prohibition of incest. 




• » » 



Contents 



VUl 



V THE PRINCIPLE OF RECIPROCITY page 

The gift. Exchange in primitive and contemporary societies. 
Extension to the laws of marriage. The notion of archaism 
and its implications. From the exchange of goods to the 
exchange of women. 



VI DUAL ORGANIZATION 

General characteristics of dual organizations. Distribution. 
Nature: clans and classes. Dual organization as institution and 
as principle. Discussion of three examples: New Guinea, 
Assam, California. Conclusion: dual organization, a method 
for solving certain problems of social life. 



VII THE ARCHAIC ILLUSION 

Origin of the notion of reciprocity. Data from child psychol- 
ogy. Their interpretation. The child and the primitive 
in Freud and Piaget. Isaacs's criticism. Child thought 
represents a more general experience than adult thought. 
The principle of reciprocity in child thought. The widening 
of psychological and social experience. 



VIII ALLIANCE AND DESCENT 

Return to dual organization. Relationships between dual 
organization and cross-cousin marriage. The philosophical 
postulates of classical interpretations: the notion of relation. 
Systems of classes and systems of relations. Transition to 
descent: the problem of bilateral descent. The Ashanti and 
the Toda. The notion of dichotomy and its genetic analogies: 
the problem of alternate generations. The native and the 
theoretician. Application to certain African and Australian 
systems. Patrilineal and matrilineal descent. The primacy of 
the patrilineal principle. 

IX THE MARRIAGE OF COUSINS 

Cross-cousin marriage and the classificatory system. Pre- 
ferential union and the notion of structure. Biological and 
social proximity. Theoretical value of cross-cousin marriage. 
Its origin: Swanton’s Gifford’s and Lowie’s theses: the 
system of kinship must be conceived of as a total structure. 
Cross-cousin marriage as an elementary structure of exchange. 




Contents 



X MATRIMONIAL LXCHANGL page 

An account of Frazer’s conception and its limitations; 
cross-cousins and parallel cousins; exchange and market; 
role of dual organization. Contrasts with the proposed 
conception. 



AUSTRALIA 



XI THE CLASSICAL SYSTLMS 

Importance of Australian data: the problem of the exchange 
of sisters. Classification of Australian systems; its difficulties. 
Patrilineal dichotomy and matrilineal dichotomy. Theories 
of Radcliffe-Brown, Lawrence and Kroeber. The example of 
the Murinbata, or the origin of a system. Description of 
the Kariera system. Description of the Aranda system. 
These two systems provide insufficient basis for a general 
classification. 



XII THE MURNGIN SYSTEM 

Description. Abnormalities in the system. The impossibility 
of any reduction to an Aranda system. Classes and degrees. 
Hypothesis on the nature of the Murngin system. Theoretical 
consequences. Definition of restricted exchange. Definition of 
generalized exchange. Application to the Murngin nomencla- 
ture; discussion of Warner’s psychological interpretation. 
The structure of the M urngin system ; confirmation from the 
Wikmunkan system. 



XIII HARMONIC AND DIS HARMONIC REGIMES 

The so-called aberrant systems: Karadjeri, Tiwi, Mara, 
Arabana, Aluridja, Southern Cross, Dieri, Wikmunkan. 
Comparison of these systems with the Manchu system. 
Definition of harmonic regimes and disharmonic regimes. 
Their relationships with the two fundamental forms of 
exchange. Integration of the aberrant systems within a 
general classification. Restricted exchange, a particular case 
of generalized exchange. 



XIV APPENDIX TO PART ONE 

I. On the algebraic study of certain types of marriage laws 
(Murngin system) by Andre Weil, University of Chicago. 

II. Commentary; interpretation of apparent gaps in the 
Murngin system. Endogamy and generalized exchange. 




Contents 



PART TWO: 

GENERALIZED EXCHANGE 



1. SIMPLE FORMULA OF GENERALIZED EXCHANGE 
XV THE GIVERS OF WIVES pu\ 

From the theoretical necessity of generalized exchange to its 
experimental study. Hodson's discovery. The Kachin system. 
Kinship nomenclature. Regulation of marriage. Mayu ni and 
dama ni. The exchange cycle. Granet’s hypothesis. Dis- 
cussion: the mythological origins of Kachin society. Clans, 
lineages, houses. 



XVI EXCHANGE AND PURCHASE 255 

Apparent simplicity of the Kachin system; its illusory 
character. The casuistry of purchase. Paternal and maternal 
relatives. The problem of terms of address. Interpretation of 
these difficulties: speculation and feudalism. 



XVII EXTERNAL LIMITS Ol GENERALIZED EXCHANGE 269 

Other systems of generalized exchange: Kuki, Aimol, Chiru, 

Chawte, Tarau. Study of altered forms by the method of the 
reduced model: Mikir, Garo, Lakher. Mixture of restricted 
and generalized exchange in Assam: Konyak, Rengma Naga, 

Lhota Naga, Serna Naga, Ao Naga, Angatni Naga. Relation- 
ship between dual organizations and tripartite organizations 
in Assam. 



XVIII INTERNAL LIMITS OF GENERALIZED EXCHANGE 292 

The Gilyak system: nomenclature, social organization, regu- 
lation of marriage. Sternberg’s interpretation; discussion. 
Comparison with the Kachin system; the role of purchase. 

The Gold system. Role of maternal uncle in simple systems 
of generalized exchange. Matrilateral orientation and 
patrilateral reaction. The inherent contradiction in systems 
of generalized exchange. Is there a Burma-Siberia axis? 



2. THE CHINESE SYSTEM 311 

XIX GRANET’S THEORY 

General characteristics of Granet's interpretation ; application 
to the Chinese system. Cross-cousin marriage in ancient 
China. Transition from bilateral marriage to unilateral 
marriage. Construction of an archaic eight-class system. Its 
impossibilities. 




Contents 






xi 



XX THE CHAO MU order page 325 

Analysis of the Chinese nomenclature. Kinship degrees and 
mourning grades. Feng’s interpretation. The problems it 
poses. The question of the chao mu order; Granet’s thesis; 
criticism of Hsu. General discussion: chao mu order and 
alternate generations. 



XXI M ATRILATER AL MARRIAGE 

Terminological indications of matrilateral marriage. Their 
interpretation by reference to teknonymy; discussion. 
Marriage with the mother’s brother’s daughter in modern 
China. Its theoretical implications. Consequences in terms 
of the history of the Chinese system. Oblique marriage; its 
antiquity; criticism of Granet and Feng. Its modern survivals. 



346 



XXII OBLIQUE MARRIAGE 359 

Theory of oblique marriage in the Miwok system. Kinship 
nomenclature. Gifford's interpretation. Lineages and moieties. 

Oblique marriage as a structural phenomenon ; proof by the 
reduced model method. Chinese system and Miwok system. 

XXIII PERIPHERAL SYSTEMS 371 

The Tibetan system; relatives ‘of the bone’ and relatives ‘of 
the flesh’; significance of this classification. The Lolo system. 

The Tungus system; comparison with the Kachin and Naga 
systems. The Manchu system; general characteristics; social 
organization; terminology; interpretation; comparison with 
Siberian systems. General picture of Far Eastern systems; 
the theoretical problems they present. 



3. INDIA 

XXIV BONE AND FLESH 393 

Extension of the distinction between ‘relatives of the bone’ 
and ‘relatives of the flesh’; its theoretical value. Generalized 
exchange in India: Gond system. Position of the notion of 
caste in a system of generalized exchange. Hypergamy. 
So-called marriage ‘by gift’. The exogamy of the sapinda; 
comparison with the chao mu order. Matrilateral marriage in 
Tndia. Held’s interpretation. 

XXV CLANS AND CASTES 406 

Held’s theory; outline and discussion. Hindu bilateralism. 
Theoretical conditions for the existence of a system with 




Xll 



Contents 



marriage classes. Caste and gotra ; the gotra as a former dan. 

Real nature of gotra exogamy; the two types of gotra. 
Hypothesis on the archaic social structure of India. 

XXVI ASYMMETRIC STRUCTURES page 422 

Theoretical considerations on the relationship between re- 
stricted and generalized exchange. Privileged nature of India 
for the definition of the relationships between the various 
types of cross-cousin marriage. Bilateral marriage; its rarity. 

The Munda system. The problem of the maternal uncle; his 
role in systems with matrilateral marriage. The avuncular 
privilege. 

XXVII CYCLES OF RECIPROCITY 

Theoretical problems of cross-cousin marriage; proposed 438 
solutions; discussion. Matrilateral and patrilatcral marriage; 
short and long cycles. Final interpretation of generalized 
exchange. 

CONCLUSION 

XXVIII THE TRANSITION TO COMPLEX STRUCTURES 459 

The area of elementary structures. The Burma-Siberia axis; 
limits of generalized exchange; diffusion and limits of restricted 
exchange. Brief consideration of the Oceanic-American 
areas; why it relates to the study of complex structures. 

Brief consideration of Africa; marriage by purchase as a 
complex form of generalized exchange. Brief consideration 
of the Indo-European world ; from simple forms of generalized 
exchange to complex forms; modern marriage. 

XXIX THE PRINCIPLES OF KINSHIP 478 

Exchange, the universal basis of marriage prohibitions. 

Nature of exogamy. The world of kinship. Brotherhood and 
fellowship. Malinowski’s theory and its refutation; incest 
and marriage. Historical synthesis and structural analysis; 
the examples of psychoanalysis and linguistics. The universe 
of communication. 

Appendix 499 

Bibliography 501 



General Index 



525 




Figures 



1. Ceremonial carving-up of a buffalo in Burma. page 35 

2. Distribution of meat among relatives. 35 

3. Marriage exchanges in Polynesia. 64 

4. Ceremonial exchanges in the Solomon Islands. 66 

5. Diagram traced by the Ambrym natives to explain their 

kinship system. 126 

6. Cross-cousin marriage. 131 

7. Concept of crossing. 145 

8. Murinbata marriage rules. 154 

9. Kariera marriage rules. 157 

10. Kariera system. 160 

11. An illustration of the Kariera system. 161 

12. Descent and residence in the Kariera system. 162 

13. Aranda rules of marriage. 163 

14. An illustration of the Aranda system. 164 

15. Aranda system. 165 

16. Marriage of cousins descended from cross-cousins. 165 

17. Structure of the Murngin system. 170 

18. Murngin marriage rules (after Warner). 171 

19. Murngin marriage rules. 171 

20. Murngin system and Aranda system. 172 

21. Murngin marriage rule (regular system). 172 

22. Murngin marriage rule (alternate system). 173 

23. Combined regular and alternate Murngin systems. 175 

24. Generalized exchange. 178 

25. Generalized exchange. 1 78 

26. Pairs, couples and cycles. 1 79 

27. Matrilateral marriage. 180 

28. Generalized exchange among four classes. 180 

29. Murngin kinship nomenclature. 182 

30. Murngin system in terms of generalized exchange. 186 

31. Descent and residence in generalized exchange. 187 

32. Definitive diagram of the Murngin system. 188 

33. Four-class cycle. 190 




xiv Figures 

34. Plane projection of a cyclical system. page 191 

35. Karadjeri system. 197 

36. Mara system (after Warner). 199 

37. Aluridja system. 202 

38. Southern Cross system. 203 

39. Dieri system (after Elkin) 205 

40. Simplified representation of the Dieri system. 206 

41. Reconstruction of the hypothetical evolution of the Dieri 

system. 207 

42. Wikmunkan system (after McConnel). 210 

43. Manchu and Wikmunkan systems. 212 

44. Classification of the principal types of kinship systems. 216 

45. Kachin system (after Leach). 242 

46. Feudal cycle of Kachin marriage. 249 

47. Chiru, Chawte and Tarau marriage cycles. 270 

48. Lakher system (reduced model). 274 

49. Rengma Naga system. 277 

50. Lhota Naga system (reduced model). 279 

51. Another aspect of the Lhota Naga system. 279 

52. Serna Naga system (reduced model). 281 

53. Ao Naga system (reduced model). 285 

54. Gilyak system. 297 

55. Generalized exchange with three clans. 299 

56. Generalized exchange with four clans. 300 

57. Chinese system, according to Granet. 321 

58. Another aspect of Granet ’s hypothesis. 324 

59. Simplified table of mourning grades. 331 

60. Diagrammatic representation of the Chinese kinship system. 332 

61. The Chao Mu order. 336 

62. Ancestral temple (after Hsu). 339 

63. Permutation of ancestors in the Chao Mu order. 340 

64. Rows and columns. 340 

65. System of positions in the Chao Mu order. 342 

66. Murngin marriages rules compared with Chinese marriage 

rules according to Granet. 343 

67. Miwok system (reduced model). 362 

68. Miwok system. Correlations between the genealogies and the 

reduced model. 367 

69. Tibetan and Kuki systems. 373 

70. Tungus marriage rules. 377 

71. Mao Naga marriage rules. 377 

72. Aspect of the Manchu system. 383 

73. Comparison between the Manchu and Ao Naga systems. 387 

74. Distribution of elementary forms of exchange in the Far F.ast. 389 




Figures xv 

75. Aspect of the Gond system. 394 

76. Hindu system (after Held). 405 

77. Marriage prohibitions among the Bai. 414 

78. The seven null. 41 5 

79. Prohibited degrees in north India. 416 

80. Munda system. 427 

81. Munda marriage transcribed in terms of the Aranda system. 427 

82. Father’s sister and mother’s brother. 430 

83. Avuncular privilege. 433 

84. Mother’s brother's daughter and father’s sister’s daughter. 443 

85a. Cycle of reciprocity. Marriage with the mother’s brother’s 

daughter (long cycle). 452 

85b. Cycle of reciprocity. Marriage with the father’s sister's daughter 

(short cycle). 452 

86. Approximate boundary of the area considered and axis of 

generalized exchange. 460 

87. System of oppositions among the elementary forms of 

marriage. 465 




Editor’s Note 



An English edition of a major work such as Les Structures elementaires de la 
Parcnte, and one so difficult in argument and exposition, is of unusual impor- 
tance, and some indication should therefore he given of how it was prepared 
and how authoritative it may be taken to be. 

After a long and testing search Professor J. H. Bell and Mr. J. R. von 
Sturmer were decided upon as translators. They prepared their draft trans- 
lation in Australia and sent it chapter by chapter, together with bibliographi- 
cal and other queries, to the editor in Oxford. These drafts were rigorously 
collated with the French text, and certain of the original sources, and were 
recast. The annotated chapters were returned to the first translators for 
correction and any remaining verification of references. The amended and 
retyped drafts were then sent back to Oxford, where they were again revised 
against the text. The proofs were read in Oxford, and further improvements 
were made. 



Bell and von Sturmer, with the aid of members of their university staff, 
not only traced the English sources and, reproduced the passages which 
Professor Levi-Strauss had cited in French, but they also carried out nearly 
all of the wearisome bibliographical work which is more conventionally an 
editorial task. The editor, for his part, actually concentrated upon the scrupu- 
lous fidelity of the translation of the argument, and the ultimate responsibility 
for its accuracy, both grammatical and theoretical, is his . 1 Although he 
made numerous stylistic changes as well, increasingly as the work progressed, 
it is to be expected that the result may savour of committee English, and it 
must be recognized that the text can hardly possess the individual character 
or the literary polish which may be looked for when a work is interpreted by 
a single translator rather than by three. 

But the great advantage of this procedure - and one which appears not 
to have been enjoyed by any other French work, from La Cite antique 
onwards, in a series of such translated contributions to ‘Anglo-Saxon’ social 
anthropology - is that Les Structures elementaires de la Parent (f has thus 
undergone two integral translations. The first translators checked each other 
in the preparation of their joint drafts, and then considered the cogency 



* He would be greatly obliged for advice of any undetected defects and for the suggestion 
of possible improvements. 




xviii Editor's Note 

of the editorial emendations; the editor twice construed the entire work, 
in the course of collation and revision, and returned to particular passages 
for added confidence of accuracy. It is hoped that these circumstances will 
confer on the edition a special reliability which may far outweigh any minor 
awkwardnesses in the English. 

Professor Levi-Strauss, however, formally declined to examine the trans- 
lation before it went to press, and he has likewise abstained from reading the 
proofs. He has had an opportunity to assess the degree of care and exactitude 
with which the edition has been prepared, but it can only be regretted that 
the work should have been deprived of the final stamp of authority which is 
claimed by its importance to scholarship. 

The present version differs from the original French publication of 1949 
in a considerable number of places, where the author has made correc- 
tions and has inserted additional arguments and other observations. 1 In 
the French second edition 2 these changes have been indicated by square 
brackets, 3 but at Professor L6vi-Strauss’s instruction, countermanding the 
editor’s intention, no such indications have been provided for readers 
of the English edition. A few rectifications of misprints and other minor 
points have been tacitly made by the editor, who has also compiled a general 
index. 

The editor deeply thanks his collaborators in Australia for the professional 
spirit and the equanimity with which they readily acceded to the plethora of 
changes and suggestions which he made in their drafts. It is hard enough for 
working academics to devote themselves so intensively for more than a year, 
and to the detriment or exclusion of their own researches, to the propagation 
of the views of another man, however distinguished, without doing so under 
unremitting criticism; and the editor would wish the reader to take special 
account of the scholarly abnegation and sense of responsibility on their part 
which the production of this translation has demanded. 

He also adds his own warm recognition of the services of Miss Janice 
McDonald, who, without the satisfaction of contributing intellectually to 
the wider recognition of an outstanding work of analysis, twice performed 
the exacting and indispensable labour of typing this lengthy book. 

1 A total, in fact, of approximately 180 corrigenda, deletions and interpolations, 
amounting to well over 9,000 words (not including RadclilTc-Brown’s letter) and often 
materially affecting the original argument. These alterations are dated April, 1962. The 
author subsequently made a small number of other changes during the preparation of 
the English edition, which in these particulars thus varies slightly from the French revised 
edition. 

Professor L6vi-Strauss’s revisions, and the working draft of the translation, have been 
deposited in the Bodleian Library, University of Oxford (shelf-mark: MS. Eng. misc. 
c. 448). 

2 Paris and The Hague: Mouton, 1967. 

3 [This at least is what one would understand from the author’s declaration in the 
French preface (p. xv). Actually, of all the corrigenda effected (not counting the correction 
of misprints and small grammatical points), nearly seventy per cent are not signalled in this 
way.] 




Editor's Note 



XIX 

Two of the editor’s colleagues have at Oxford aided decisively in ensuring a 
dependable rendition of Professor Ldvi-Strauss’s work. Dr. P. G. Riviere has 
very generously and effectively carried out an additional reading of the 
proofs, and has at the same time subjected the translation to yet a further 
scrutiny at places throughout each chapter. Mrs. Francis Korn has made a 
special check of the tables, diagrams, and formulas, and has in other ways 
most kindly ministered to the editorial task. 



University of Oxford 



RODNEY NEEDHAM 



Postscriptum. In the new preface, which he modified especially for this 
edition* and which was not supplied until after the translation and editing 
had been reported complete. Professor Levi-Strauss indirectly charges the 
editor with a ‘fundamental misunderstanding’ of the very title and subject 
matter of the book, and imputes to him (admittedly in excellent company) a 
fallacious assimilation of elementary structures to prescriptive marriage 
which is alleged to have seriously misled later commentators on the theory. 

Readers who may therefore be justifiably uneasy that the editor should 
have assumed particular responsibility for the theoretical accuracy o r the 
rendering of the argument (p. xvii) will doubtless appreciate the assurance, 
for the present, that wherever the idea of prescription appears in this edition 
(see index s.v.) it is a literal translation from the French. For example, when 
in the opening lines of the work Professor Levi-Strauss defines ‘elementary 
structures’ as ‘those systems which prescribe marriage with a certain type of 
relative’ (p. xxiii), this is a direct translation of his original and unamended 
words: ‘ les systemes qui prescrivcnt le manage avec un certain type de parents' 
(1949, p. ix; 1967. p. ix). 

It may be found informative, also, to refer to the only place at which 
Professor Levi-Strauss has previously defended his argument, where he writes 
that if an alternative theory proposed by certain critics, in terms of psycho- 
logical ‘preference’, were correct, matrilatcral marriage would indeed be 
more frequent ‘but it would not need to be prescribed ' . f 

R.N. 

* The critical content, however, is in large part a repetition, made more specific in its 
application, of points already published in the author's Huxley Lecture, ‘The Future of 
Kinship Studies’ ( Proceedings of the Royal Anthropological Institute, 1965, pp. 13-22). The 
preface has also appeared separately, under the title ‘ Vingt ans apr£s\ in Les Temps mode rue:; 
(23* annee, no. 256, September 1967, pp. 385-406). 

j Claude Levi-Strauss, Anthropologic structural (Paris: Plon, 1958), pp. 344 5 n. 1 ; 
cf. English edition, translated by Claire Jacobson and Brooke Grundfest Schoepf, Structural 
Anthropology (New York: Basic Books, 1963), p. 322 n. 105. The italicsare those of Professor 
Levi-Strauss. 




Few who will give their minds to master the generai 
principles of savage religion will ever again think it 
ridiculous, or the knowledge of it superfluous to the 
rest of mankind. Far from its beliefs and practices 
being a rubbish-heap of miscellaneous folly, they are 
consistent and logical in so high a degree as to begin, 
as soon as even roughly classified, to display the prin- 
ciples of their formation and development; and 
these principles prove to be essentially rational, 
though working in a mental condition of intense and 
inveterate ignorance . . . 

The tendency of modern inquiry is more and more 
towards the conclusion that if law is anywhere, it is 
everywhere. 

E. B. Tylor, Primitive Culture 
(London, 1871), pp. 20-2 



ACKNOWLEDGEMENTS 



We wish lo acknowledge the help given by the 
following people in the preparation for this trans- 
lation. Mrs. Barbara Bancroft of the Department of 
French in the University of New England willingly 
discussed many matters with us and offered sugges- 
tions which we feel have greatly improved the trans- 
lation. Miss Gwenda Cane of the Department of 
Mathematics in the University of New England read 
chapter XIV. Miss Janice McDonald of the Faculty 
of Agricultural Economics in the University of New 
England typed the manuscript. Miss McDonald and 
Miss Mary Jackes of the Department of Sociology 
prepared many of the figures contained in the draft. 
To these people we make grateful acknowledgement. 

J. H. B. 

J. R. von S. 

The University of New England , 

Armidale, New South Wales 
Australia 



Preface to the First Edition 



i 

Elementary structures of kinship are those systems In which the nomenclature 
permits the immediate determination of the circle of kin and that of aftines, 
that is, those systems which prescribe marriage with a certain type of relative, 
or, alternatively, those which, while defining all members of the society as 
relatives, divide them into two categories, viz., possible spouses and prohibited 
spouses. The term ‘complex structures’ is reserved for systems which limit 
themselves to defining the circle of relatives and leave the determination of the 
spouse to other mechanisms, economic or psychological. In this work, then, 
the term ‘elementary structures’ corresponds to what sociologists usually 
call preferential marriage. It has been impossible to retain this terminology, 
because the basic purpose of this book is to show that marriage rules, 
nomenclature, and the system of rights and prohibitions are indissociable 
aspects of one and the same reality, viz., the structure of the system under 
consideration. 

The preceding definition would thus confine the term ‘elementary structure’ 
to those systems which, like cross-cousin marriage, lead to an almost auto- 
matic determination of the preferred spouse. On the other hand, systems, 
like several in Africa and our own contemporary society, which are based on 
a transfer of wealth or on free choice, would be classified as complex struc- 
tures. This distinction will be largely retained, although several reservations 
must be made. 

Firstly, there is no absolutely elementary structure, because only exception- 
ally can a system ultimately determine one sole individual as the prescribed 
spouse. Elementary structures allow for the definition of classes or the deter- 
mination of relationships, but as a general rule a number of individuals, 
and the number is often large, are equally suited to make up the class and 
to satisfy the relationship. Consequently, even in elementary structures there 
is always some freedom of choice. On the other hand, no complex structure 
allows a completely free choice, the rule being not that one can marry any- 
one in the system, but only those not expressly forbidden. The limit of ele- 
mentary structures lies in the biological possibilities which always provide 
many solutions to a given problem, in the form of brothers, sisters, or cousins, 
while the limit of complex structures is found in the incest prohibition, 
which excludes, by the social rule, certain solutions which are nevertheless 




XXIV 



Preface to the First Edition 

biologically open. Even the strictest elementary structure retains a certain 
freedom of choice, while even in the vaguest of complex structures this choice 
is subject to certain limitations. 

Elementary and complex structures thus cannot be wholly contrasted, 
and the line separating them is also difficult to define. Between those systems 
which determine the spouse and those which do not there are certain hybrid 
and ambiguous forms, where economic privileges allow a secondary choice 
within a prescribed category (marriage by purchase combined with marriage 
by exchange), or where there are several preferential solutions (marriage with 
mother’s brother’s daughter, and with wife’s brother’s daughter; marriage 
with mother’s brother’s daughter, and with mother's brother’s wife, etc.). 
Certain of these will be examined, because they may clarify some of the 
simpler cases, while others indicating a change to complex forms will be 
ignored for the while. 

Properly speaking, then, this work is an introduction to a general theory of 
kinship systems. Following this study of elementary structures there is need 
for another on complex structures, and perhaps even a third on those family 
attitudes expressing or overcoming, by conventional behaviour, conflicts 
or contradictions inherent in the logical structure such as are revealed in the 
system of nomenclature. However, it is essentially for two reasons that this 
book is published in its present form. Firstly, without being exhaustive, the 
study, in that it deals with principles, is complete. Even if some aspect of the 
problem treated in the work were developed no new idea would be introduced. 
For the elucidation of any special problem that the reader has in mind, the 
definitions and distinctions used here should be applied, and the same method 
followed. 

Secondly, no claim is made that the work is free from errors of fact and 
interpretation. The social sciences have become so highly interrelated and 
complex, because of the vast mass of facts and documents on which they 
rest, that their development depends on collective effort. I have been obliged 
to deal with certain fields in which I am badly prepared, to risk hypotheses 
not immediately verifiable, and, lacking information, to ignore for the while 
problems whose solutions were essential to my purpose. Should but few 
ethnologists or sociologists, psychologists or linguists, archaeologists or 
historians, studying human phenomena either in the laboratory, study or in 
the field, read this work, and should their comments and criticisms correct 
some of the extensive and serious errors which we are the first to admit 
exist in it, the limitation of the inquiry, and the presentation of the preliminary 
results before attempting to seek subsequent implications, will have been 
justified. 



ii 

A comparative sociological study faces two main difficulties, viz., the choice 
of sources, and the utilization of facts. The problem here arises principally 




XXV 



Preface to the First Edition 

from the wealth of material, and the hard necessity to limit it. On the first 
point, it will be appreciated that since it was written in the United States - 
where I was generously welcomed and given such exceptional working condi- 
tions - and in daily contact with American colleagues, this book made much 
use of Anglo-Saxon sources. Had I ignored this source of material, I should 
have failed my French colleagues who are especially interested in overseas 
developments in their science. While not neglecting old sources when they 
were absolutely necessary, an attempt has been made to renovate the tradi- 
tional basis of the problems of kinship and marriage by avoiding another 
grinding-out of examples already exhausted by the past discussions of Frazer, 
Briffault, Crawley and Westermarck. For this reason, a large number of 
articles and books published in the last thirty years have been used. Thus, 
while possibly useless theoretically, the work may perhaps be excused be- 
cause it provides easier access to some scattered and occasionally rare 
sources. 

The second point poses a more ticklish problem. In using his material, 
the comparative sociologist constantly faces two criticisms. The first is that 
in amassing examples he strips them of substance and meaning by arbitrarily 
isolating them from their context, while the second is that in preserving 
their concrete nature and ties with other aspects of the culture, only a small 
number of facts may be considered, on which basis he cannot generalize. 
Westermarck is commonly accused of the first fault and Durkheim of the 
second. But by following the course so vigorously outlined by Marcel Mauss, 
it seems these two dangers might be avoided. In this book these two methods 
have been taken not as mutually exclusive, but as two different steps in the 
proof. The initial stages of this combined approach concern facts so general 
that the inquiry, at first, is directed towards setting up the hypothesis, guiding 
intuition, and illustrating principles, rather than with verifying the proof. 
So long as the phenomena considered are so simple, universal, and part of 
everyday life, it is no doubt justifiable, in that they are not required to fulfil 
any conclusive function, for examples to be amassed without undue concern 
for the context which gives each its particular meaning. For, at this stage, 
this meaning is almost identical for them all, and comparison with the subject's 
own experience as a member of a social group is almost always enough to 
restore the content. In this way, even isolated examples, borrowed from the 
most widely varying cultures, acquire an added value, attesting strongly to the 
similarity underlying the differences. Their particular role is to foster the 
impression and to define the atmosphere and colour permeating the truths, 
rather than the truths themselves, as these emerge in the beliefs, fears and 
desires of men. 

But as this combined method progresses, and more complex relation- 
ships are arrived at, this first method ceases to be legitimate. The number of 
examples must be limited so that the particular significance of each may be 
thoroughly studied. At this point the proof relies upon a very small number 




XXVI 



Preface to the First Edition 

of carefully chosen examples. The validity of any subsequent generalization 
will depend upon the typicality of these examples, that is, in so far as each 
example contains as many of the conditions of the problem as reasoning 
might determine. This is why the progress of the argument in this work 
is accompanied by a change of method. Beginning with a systematic exposi- 
tion in which eclectic examples, chosen solely for their evocative value, are 
used, primarily to illustrate the reasoning and to encourage the reader 
to recall personal experiences of the same type, the horizon is gradually 
narrowed to allow for deeper analysis, so that the second part, the conclu- 
sion excepted, is almost in the form of three monographs, on the respective 
marriage organizations of Southern Asia, China and India. These preliminary 
explanations are necessary to justify this procedure. 

This book would never have appeared without the help of the following 
people and institutions. The Rockefeller Foundation provided encouragement 
and material means for the undertaking; by lecturing at the New School for 
Social Research certain of my ideas were clarified and formulated, and 
through personal contact and correspondence with colleagues, facts were 
verified and hypotheses crystallized. The following are thanked for their 
encouragement: Robert H. Lowie, A. L. Kroeber, Ralph Linton, Paul Rivet, 
Georges Davy, Maurice Lcenhardt, Gabriel Le Bras, Alexandre Koyre, 
Raymond de Saussure, Alfred Metraux, Andr6 Weil (who kindly added a 
mathematical appendix to Part I) and very especially, Roman Jakobson, who 
amicably insisted that the work be finished and to whom a great deal is 
owed for theoretical inspiration. 

This work has been dedicated to the memory of Lewis H. Morgan for 
three reasons : to pay homage to the pioneer of the research method modestly 
adopted in this book ; to honour the American school of anthropology that 
he founded and with whose work I was associated for four years; and perhaps 
also, in some small way, to try to discharge the debt owed to him, by recalling 
that this school was especially great at a time when scientific precision and 
exact observation did not seem to him to be incompatible with a frankly 
theoretical mode of thought and a bold philosophical taste. For the progress 
of sociology will be no different from its forerunners, and this must not be 
forgotten when we are beginning to glimpse, as through a glass darkly, the 
area where all these will eventually meet. Having quoted Eddington, ‘Physics 
is becoming the “study of organization” ’, Kohler wrote, almost twenty 
years ago: ‘In this way ... it will converge with biology and psychology.’ 1 
This work will have fulfilled its purpose if, after having finished it, the reader 
feels inclined to add, ‘and sociology’. 

New York, February 23rd 1947 



1 Kohler, 1930, p. 30. 




Preface to the Second Edition 



Seventeen years have passed since the publication of this book, and almost 
twenty since it was first written. During these twenty years, so much new 
material has appeared, and the theory of kinship has become so scientific 
and complicated, that the text would have to be wholly rewritten if it were to 
be brought up to date. On reading it today, the documentation seems tedious 
and the expression old-fashioned. If l had been more careful and less hesitant 
under the weight of my undertaking, 1 would doubtless have seen from the 
start that its very bulk would involve certain weaknesses, upon which, in 
fact, critics have dwelt with some malice. 1 would also have understood better 



the discreet warning contained in what was at first sight a flattering compli- 
ment paid me by Robert Lowie when he returned the manuscript, which he 
had been so kind as to peruse: he told me, in fact, that the work was ‘in the 
grand style . . .’. Nevertheless I reject not one part of the theoretical inspiration 
or of the method, nor any of the principles of interpretation. This is why I have 
finally decided to keep corrections and additions to an absolute minimum. 



After all, the book wanted for reprinting by the publisher is the one brought 

i 

out in 1949, not some other work. 



In the first place l have corrected a considerable n umber of typographical errors 
which certain rather uncharitable scholars have been prepared to see as errors 
on my part. Such is the case with Lucien Malson, who, in his excellent little 
book, Les Enfants sauvages , l thus reproaches me for certain data for which I 
am not responsible, but which come from writers whom I quote and with whom 
he does not agree. Nevertheless, I do believe he is justified in considering the two 
or three short pages devoted to his own particular problem as of scant use, and 
the solution, right or wrong, that I adopt as adding very little to the question. 

I admit to being an execrable proof-reader, who, when faced with the 
finished text, is inspired neither by the tender care of a writer for his work, nor 
by the aggressive inclination which makes for a good corrector. Once completed, 
the book becomes a foreign body, a dead being incapable of holding my 
attention, much less my interest. This world in which I have so passionately 
lived closes up against me and shuts me out. At times it is almost beyond my 
comprehension. If the typographic presentation of the first edition contains 
many more faults than now, it is because I had no help whatever. 



1 Union ginfrale d’fiditions, collection 10/18, Paris, 1964. 




xxviii Preface to the Second Edition 

Some factual errors were doubtless inevitable in a work which - as my 
card-index bears witness - required me to consuit more than 1,00b books and 
articles. Some of the errors I have corrected as often as not had escaped my 
critics’ notice. On the other hand, these self-same critics have been quick to 
seize upon passages which they have not fully understood through lack of 
familiarity with the French language. I have also been taken to task for 
ethnographic errors when the evidence itself comes from reputable observers 
whom I quoted without using inverted commas because the source reference 
was given a little later. I dare say these facts would have been received with 
greater consideration had they not been attributed to me. 

Apart from correcting these details 1 have not substantially altered or 
expanded the original text except on three points. 

In the first place I might have indicated the importance of a general study 
of so-called ‘bilateral’ or ‘undifferentiated’ systems of descent, even though 1 
did not undertake such a study. These systems are far more numerous than 
was believed when I wrote my book, although, by a natural reaction, there 
has been perhaps too great a haste to include, in these new types, systems 
which are now being seen, more and more, as possibly reducible to unilateral 
forms. 

With regard to the other two points, 1 have revised my whole discussion of 
the Murngin (chapter XII) and the Kachin (chapters XV--XVII) systems. 
Notwithstanding the criticisms which have been levelled against me and which 
I have had to refute, I consider the interpretations put forward in 1949, 
although not definitive, as having lost none of their validity. 

If I have refrained from altering Sections II and III of Part II, which are 
devoted to China and India, it is for quite a different reason. I no longer have 
the necessary heart or incentive to tackle such large slabs of writing. Around 
1945 there were relatively few works on the kinship systems of China and 
India. Without being too presumptuous it was possible to absorb them all, 
to synthesize them, and to isolate their meaning. Today this is no longer 
permissible, for sinologists and Indianists, in pursuing these studies, rely on a 
body of historical and philological knowledge w’hich a cursory comparative 
approach cannot fully grasp. It is clear that the authoritative research of 
Louis Dumont and his school on kinship in India henceforth makes this a 
field on its own. I am thus resigned to letting the sections on China and India 
stand, begging the reader to take them for what they arc, as stages outstripped 
by the progress of anthropology, but judged as being still of some interest 
by competent colleagues, viz., Louis Dumont himself and Alexander 
Rygaloff, who were kind enough to read them over again prior to 
republication. 

As to the basic problems raised in the introduction, many new facts and 
the development of my own thought mean that nowadays I would no longer 
express myself in the same way. I still believe that the prohibition of incest 
is to be explained entirely in terms of sociological causes. Certainly, how- 




Preface to the Second Edition xxix 

ever, I have treated the genetic aspect in too casual a manner. A more accu- 
rate appraisal of the very high rate of mutations and the proportion which is 
harmful would call for some qualification of my statements, even if the 
deleterious consequences of consanguineal unions have played no part in 
the origin or the persistence of rules of exogamy. On the subject of biological 
causality I shall now do no more than repeat that social anthropology has 
no need of this hypothesis to explain marriage prohibitions. 

As far as the contrast between nature and culture is concerned, the present 
state of knowledge and that of my own thought (the one, moreover, following 
upon the other) would seem in several respects to present a paradox. My 
proposal was to trace the line of demarcation between the two orders guided 
by the presence or absence of articulated speech. One might think that the 
progress of studies in cerebral anatomy and physiology would have given an 
absolute foundation to this criterion, since certain structures of the central 
nervous system peculiar only to man seem to control the capacity for giving 
objects names. 

But on the other hand, the appearance of certain phenomena has made this 
line of demarcation, if not less real, then certainly more tenuous and tortuous 
than was imagined twenty years ago. Among insects, fish, birds and mammals, 
complex processes of communication, which now and then bring true sym- 
bols into play, have been discovered. We also know that certain birds and 
mammals, notably chimpanzees in the wild state, can fashion and use tools. 
In that period which science has pushed further and further back and which 
saw the beginning of what is still conveniently called the lower palaeolithic, 
different species and even different genera of hominoids, fashioners of stone 
and bone, seem to have lived together on the same sites. 

The question then is just how far the contrast between nature and culture 
may be pushed. Its simplicity would be illusory if it had been largely the work 
of the genus Homo (antiphrastically called sapiens), savagely devoted to elimi- 
nating doubtful forms believed to border on the animal; inspired as it pre- 
sumably was some hundreds of thousands of years or more ago by the same 
obtuse and destructive spirit which today impels it to destroy other living 
forms, having annihilated so many human societies which had been wrongly 
relegated to the side of nature simply because they themselves did not 
repudiate it ( Naturvolkern ); as if from the first it alone had claimed to per- 
sonify culture as opposed to nature, and to remain now, except for those 
cases where it can totally bend it to its will, the sole embodiment of life as 
opposed to inanimate matter. 

By this hypothesis, the contrast of nature and culture would be neither 
a primeval fact, nor a concrete aspect of universal order. Rather it should be 
seen as an artificial creation of culture, a protective rampart thrown up around 
it because it only felt able to assert its existence and uniqueness by destroying 
all the links that lead back to its original association with the other mani- 
festations of life. Consequently, to understand culture in its essence, we 




XXX 



Preface to the Second Edition 

would have to trace it back to its source and run counter to its forward trend, 
to retie all the broken threads by seeking out their loose ends in other animal 
and even vegetable families. Ultimately we shall perhaps discover that the 
interrelationship between nature and culture does not favour culture to the 
extent of being hierarchically superimposed on nature and irreducible to it. 
Rather it takes the form of a synthetic duplication of mechanisms already 
in existence but which the animal kingdom shows only in disjointed form 
and dispersed variously among its members - a duplication, moreover, 
permitted by the emergence of certain cerebral structures which themselves 
belong to nature. 



ii 

Of the developments to which this book has given rise, doubtless the most 
unexpected from my point of view was that which resulted in the distinction, 
now almost standard in England, between the notions of ‘prescriptive marri- 
age’ and ‘preferential marriage’. To discuss this distinction somewhat 
embarrasses me, so great is my debt of recognition to the man who first 
formulated it, Rodney Needham, who has acted as my interpreter (and also, 
at times, my critic) to the English-speaking public in the energetic and per- 
ceptive prose of his Structure and Sentiment , l a book with which 1 would 
prefer not to express any disagreement, even if, as is the case, such disagree- 
ment as 1 feel bears on a limited problem. However, the solution proposed 
by Needham involves so complete a change from my own point of view that 
it seems absolutely necessary to return here to certain themes which, in 
deference to my British colleagues,. I had made a point of first presenting in 
their language and on their soil, since, by conferring upon me the Huxley 
Memorial Lecture for 1965, they themselves had provided me with the 
opportunity for so doing. 

It has long been known that societies which advocate marriage between 
certain types of kin adhere to the norm only in a small number of cases, as 
demonstrated by Kunstadter and his team through the use of computer 
simulations. 2 Fertility and reproduction rates, the demographic balance of 
the sexes and the age pyramid never show the perfect harmony necessary for 
every individual, when the time comes for him to marry, to be assured of find- 
ing a suitable spouse in the prescribed degree, even if the kinship nomen- 
clature is broad enough to confuse degrees of the same type but unequally 
distant, often so much so that the notion of a common descent becomes purely 
theoretical : hence the idea of calling such systems ‘preferential’, a name which, 
as we have just seen, expresses the reality. 

However, there are some systems which confuse several degrees in 
prescribed marriage categories, and in which it is not inconceivable to find 

1 Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1962. 

2 Kunstadter, P., Buhler, R., Stephan, F. F. and WestofT, C. F., ‘Demographic Vari- 
ability and Preferential Marriage Patterns’, American Journal of Physical Anthropology . 
n.s., vol. XXI, 1963, pp. 511-19. 




Preface to the Second Edition xxxi 

even non-kin. This is the case in Australian aboriginal societies of the classical 
type and others, mostly in South-east Asia, in which marriage takes place 
between groups which are called and which call themselves ‘takers’ and 
‘givers’ of women, the rule being that any group may receive women only 
from its ‘givers’, and may itself give women only to its ‘takers’. As the number 
of these groups always seems quite large, there is a certain freedom of choice 
for each group, which is in no way obliged, from generation to generation, and 
even for marriages contracted by several men in the same generation, to 
have recourse always to the same ‘giver’. In this way, the women married 
by two men belonging to consecutive generations (e.g., father and son) 
may, if they come from different groups of ‘givers’, have no kinship link 
between them. The rule is therefore very flexible, and societies which adopt 
it experience no real difficulty in observing it. Exceptional cases apart, they 
do what they say they must, hence the reason for calling their marriage 
system ‘prescriptive’. 

Following Needham, several writers today assert that my book is only 
concerned with prescriptive systems, or, to be more exact (since one need only 
glance through it to be assured of the contrary), that such had been my 
intention had I not confused the two forms. But if the champions of this 
distinction had been correct in believing that prescriptive systems are few 
and far between, a most curious consequence would have resulted: I would 
have written a very fat book which since 1952 1 has aroused all sorts of com- 
mentaries and discussions despite its being concerned with such rare facts and 
so limited a field that it is difficult to understand of what interest it could be 
with regard to a general theory of kinship. 

Nevertheless, the very part which Needham has been so good as to take 
in the English edition of this book, and which gives him an added claim to 
my gratitude, shows that it has not lost all theoretical interest in his eyes. 
How could this be if the book discussed mere isolated instances ? Were this 
the case I would have to admit that Leach is correct when he writes: ‘Since 
the “elementary structures” which he discusses are decidedly unusual they 
seem to provide a rather flimsy base for a general theory’, and in speaking 
of my book as ‘a splendid failure’. 2 At the same time, however, it is puzzling 
to consider the motives which have prompted publishers, almost twenty years 
after it first appeared, to reissue both in French and in English a work which 
had failed, even splendidly. 

If I have employed the notions of preference and obligation indifferently, 
even at times in the one sentence, for which I have been reproached, it is 
because, in my opinion, they do not connote different social realities, but 
rather, correspond to slightly differing ways in which man envisages the same 

1 The publication date of J. P. B. Josselin de Jong’s work, Levi-Strauss' s Theory on 
Kinship and Marriage, Leiden, 1952. 

2 Leach, E., ’Claude L6vi-Strauss - Anthropologist and Philosopher’, New Left Review, 
No. 34, 1965, p. 20. 




xxxii Preface to the Second Edition 

reality, if we follow the example of their creators and define so-called pre- 
scriptive systems as we have just done, the only conclusion to be reached is 
that, on this count, they would not prescribe very much. Those who practise 
them know fully that the spirit of such systems cannot be reduced to the 
tautological proposition that each group obtains its women from ‘givers’ 
and gives its daughters to ‘takers’. They are also aware that marriage with the 
matrilateral cross-cousin (mother’s brother’s daughter) provides the simplest 
illustration of the rule, the form most likely to guarantee its survival. On the 
other hand, marriage with the patrilateral cross-cousin (father’s sister’s 
daughter) would violate it irrevocably. It is on degrees of kinship that the 
system would turn, assuming the ideal situation in which the number of 
exchange groups, having fallen to the lowest possible figure, prevented the 
provisional opening or closing of secondary cycles. 

That there is a divergence between the theoretical model and the empirical 
reality is nothing new. Gilhodes, one of the first observers of the Kachin, 
repeatedly emphasized this when describing how things happened, and even 
Granet’s diagrams bring out the plurality of the cycles. My original edition 
was careful to take this into consideration. It is none the less true that the 
empirical reality of so-called prescriptive systems only takes on its full 
meaning when related to a theoretical model worked out by the natives 
themselves prior to ethnologists, and that this model cannot help but employ 
the notion of degree. 

Moreover, is this not exactly what Needham is doing when he entitles an 
article ‘The Formal Analysis of Prescriptive Patrilateral Cross-Cousin 
Marriage ’, 1 but at the cost of too close an approximation between model and 
empirical reality? To claim to show that no society, unless content with a low 
proportion of regular marriages, can permanently practise a rule of marriage 
with the patrilateral cousin, because of the intolerable restraints resulting 
from the change in the direction of the marriage exchanges in each generation, 
improves but slightly on the observations contained in chapter XXVII. 
On the other hand, those wishing to conclude that this type of marriage is 
contradictory would certainly be making a mistake. Indeed this is a cause 
which could only be pleaded (and then with certain reservations) if marriage 
exchanges were always between clans, a hypothesis by no means necessary 
and arbitrarily formulated. One should not start by introducing an impossi- 
ble condition - as I proved when I showed 2 that marriage with the patri- 
lateral cousin can never ‘realise an overall structure’, and that ‘there is no 
law’ for it - merely for the sake of rediscovering this impossibility. But apart 
from the fact that there is nothing a priori to prevent patrilateral systems 
from being maintained under precarious conditions, an adequate model of 
such systems exists at least in the minds of the many peoples who proscribe 
them. If they proscribe them they surely must have some idea of them. 

1 Southwestern Journal of Anthropology , vol. XIV, 1958, pp. 199-219. 

2 pp. 553-4 of the first edition. 




Preface to the Second Edition xxxiii 

Rather let us own that the notions of prescriptive and preferential marriage 
are relative: a preferential system is prescriptive when envisaged at the model 
level ; a prescriptive system must be preferential when envisaged on the level 
of reality, unless it is able to relax its rule to such an extent that, if one 
persists in preserving its so-called prescriptiveness (instead of paying heed, 
rightly, to its preferential aspect, which is always apparent), it will finally 
mean nothing. One of two things can happen: either change the ‘giver’ 
group, and a former alliance will be renewed and consideration of the pre- 
ferred degree will remain pertinent (e.g., the new wife will be a daughter of 
great-grandmother’s brother’s great-grandson, consequently of the same 
kind as a matrilateral cousin) or else there will be an entirely new alliance. 
Two cases can then arise: either this alliance foreshadows other alliances 
of the same type, and, by the same reasoning as above, becomes the cause of 
future preferences, expressible in terms of degree, or it remains short-lived, 
simply the result of a free and unmotivated choice. Accordingly if the system 
can be called prescriptive it is in so far as it is preferential first. If it is not 
also preferential its prescriptive aspect vanishes. 

Conversely, a system which recommends marriage with the mother’s 
brother’s daughter may be called prescriptive even if the rule is seldom obser- 
ved, since it says what must be done. The question of how far and in what 
proportion the members of a given society respect the norm is very interesting, 
but a different question to that of where this society should properly be placed 
in a typology. It is sufficient to acknowledge the likelihood that awareness of 
the rule inflects choices ever so little in the prescribed direction, and that the 
percentage of conventional marriages is higher than would be the case if 
marriages were made at random, to be able to recognize what might be called 
a matrilateral ‘operator’ at work in this society and acting as pilot: certain 
alliances at least follow the path which it charts out for them, and this suf- 
fices to imprint a specific curve in the genealogical space. No doubt there will 
be not just one curve but a great number of local curves, merely incipient 
for the most part, however, and forming closed cycles only in rare and ex- 
ceptional cases. But the structural outlines which emerge here and there will 
be enough for the system to be used in making a probablistic version of more 
rigid systems the notion of which is completely theoretical and in which 
marriage would conform rigorously to any rule the social group pleases to 
state. 

As Lounsbury has clearly shown in his review of Structure and Sentiment 
a fundamental misunderstanding is bound to arise if the opposition between 
‘elementary structure’ and ‘complex structures’ becomes assimilated to that 
between ‘prescriptive marriage’ and ‘preferential marriage', and if one is then 
substituted for the other . 2 I maintain, on the contrary, that an elementary 
structure can be equally preferential or prescriptive. Neither prescription nor 

1 American Anthropologist , vol. LXIV, 1962, pp. 1302-10. 

2 The same can be said for the likening of restricted exchange to mechanical solidarity 




XXXIV 



Preface to the Second Edition 



preference is the test of an elementary structure. Its one and only criterion 
rests in the fact that, preferred or prescribed, the spouse is the spouse solely 
because she belongs to an alliance category or stands in a certain kinship 
relationship to Ego. In other words, the imperative or desirable relationship 
is a function of the social structure. We enter the realm of complex structures 
when the reason for the preference or the prescription hinges on other 
considerations, e.g., the fact that the desired wife is blond, or slim, or intel- 
ligent, or belongs to a rich or powerful family. The latter certainly involves a 
social criterion, but its valuation remains relative, and the system does not 
define it structurally. 

Consequently, in the case of both elementary and complex systems, the 
use of the term ‘preferential' does not suggest a subjective inclination on the 
part of individuals to seek marriage with a certain type of relative. The ‘pre- 
ference' expresses an objective situation. If it were in my power to fix ter- 
minology I would use ‘preferential’ to describe any system in which, in the 
absence of a clearly formulated prescription, the proportion of marriages 
between a certain type of real or classificatory relative (taking ‘classifieatory’ 
in a vaguer sense than defined by Morgan) is higher than were it the result 
of chance, whether the members of the group are aware of this or not. .This 
objective proportion reflects certain structural properties of the system. If we 
were able to isolate these properties, they would turn out to be isomorphic 
with those which are directly knowable in societies which exhibit the same 
‘preference’, disguised, however, as a prescription, and in practice obtaining 
exactly the same result. In the case of marriage with the matrilateral cross- 
cousin as well as with women from exclusively ‘giver’ groups, the result would 
be, on the one hand, alliance networks ideally tending to close themselves 
(although not necessarily doing so), and on the other hand, and more especi- 
ally, relatively long networks, as compared with those to be observed or 
imagined in societies with preferential marriage with the father's sister's 
daughter, producing (even in the absence of any prescriptive rule) a correla- 
tive shortening of the cycles. 1 

1 It is true that, following De Josselin de Jong, who made a similar remark many years 
before (loc. cit.). Dr. Maybury- Lewis (‘Prescriptive Marriage Systems’, Southwestern Journal 
of Anthropology, vol. XXI, 1965, pp. 207-30) believes he can assert that the theoretical 
model of a patrilatera! system contains cycles which are just as long as those in the matri- 
latcral model, the only difference being that, with the patrilateral model the cycles regularly 
reverse direction, while with the matrilateral model, they maintain the same direction. But 
those who read the diagram in this way are simply deluded by an optical illusion. That 
the mark of the patrilateral system is short cycles, reflecting the desire for the return, as 
promptly as possible, of a woman in exchange for the woman given in the previous genera- 



and of generalized exchange to organic solidarity, adopted without discussion by Homans 
and Schneider. If a society with restricted exchange or generalized exchange is envisaged as 
a whole, each segment fulfils an identical function to each of the other segments. Conse- 
quently what we are dealing with is two different forms of mechanical solidarity. I dare say 
I myself have repeatedly used the terms ‘mechanical’ and ‘organic’ more loosely than 
Durkheim intended and than is generally accepted. 




XXXV 



Preface to the Second Edition 

In other words, 1 do not dispute that there is an ideological distinction to 
be made between the prescriptive or preferential forms of a type of marriage. 
But the extreme terms always allow for a continuous series of intermediary 
applications. I postulate, therefore, that this series constitutes a group, and 
that the general theory of the system is only possible in terms of this group 
and not in terms of some particular application or other. The system should 
not be broken down, reduced by analysis to the various ways in which men 
may choose to represent it. Its nature arises objectively from the type of 
divergence engendered between the form taken by the alliance network of a 
society, and the form which would be observed in this same society if marri- 
ages were made at random. Fundamentally, the sole difference between 
prescriptive marriage and preferential marriage is at the level of the model. 
It corresponds to the difference which I have since proposed between what I 
call a ‘mechanical model’ and a ‘statistical model’; 1 i.e., in one case, a model 
the elements of which are on the same scale as the things whose relationships 
it defines : classes, lineages, degrees ; while in the other case, the model must 
be abstracted from significant factors underlying distributions which are 
apparently regulated in terms of probabilities. 

11! 

This search for a significant structure of marriage exchanges on which the 
society says nothing, either directly by means of rules, or indirectly by inferen- 
ces to be drawn from the kinship nomenclature or by some other means, is 
still possible if the group concerned is small and relatively closed. In such a 
case the genealogies are decisive. But when the size and fluidity of the group 
increase, and its very limits become imprecise, the problem becomes singularly 
complicated. The group continues to stipulate what is not done, be this 
merely in the name of the prohibition of incest, but does it unsuspectingly 
do something more (or less) than would be the case if its members chose 
their spouses on the basis of their own personal histories, ambitions and 
tastes? It strikes me that the problem of the transition from elementary to 
complex structures, or if preferred, the problem of extending the anthro- 
pological theory of kinship to contemporary societies, is posed in these terms. 

When I was writing my book, the method to be followed seemed simple. 
The first decision would be to reduce contemporary societies to those cases 
favourable to the inquiry, viz., the demographic isolates with a strong 

1 Anthropologie structural, pp. 311-17; Structural Anthropology (New York, 1963), 
pp. 283-9. 

tion (sister’s daughter for father’s sister) is amply attested to by the philosophy, not only of 
those who approve of it, but also of the much greater number who condemn it. It is better 
to accede to the universal judgment of those who are interested than to contradict not 
only oneself but the facts by simultaneously declaring that a patrilateral system forms long 
cycles as seen in the diagram, but, because of its very nature, fails to close even the shortest 
cycles. To reason in this way would lead to a confusion of empirical reality no longer only 
with the model but with the diagram. 




XXXVI 



Preface to the Second Edition 

coefficient of endogamy, and in which genealogical chains and networks of 
alliance intersecting at several points might be obtained. In so far as the pro- 
portion of marriages between relatives was determinable it would be possible 
to know whether these cycles were orientated at random, or whether a signi- 
ficant proportion belonged to one form rather than another. For example, 
are spouses who are kin (often without their knowledge) related in the pater- 
nal line or the maternal line, and if either is the case, are they born of cross- 
cousins or parallel cousins? Supposing that a trend did appear, it could be 
classed as a type with similar but better defined structures which anthropo- 
logists have already studied in small societies. 

Nevertheless, the divergence between indeterminate types, which believe 
or wish themselves to be such, and the clearly determined systems which I have 
called elementary structures, is too great for the comparison to be decisive. 
Happily (or so I believed at that time), ethnography does provide an inter- 
mediary type, viz., systems which only set up preventions to marriage, but 
apply them so widely through constraints inherent in their kinship nomen- 
clature that, because of the relatively small population, consisting of no 
more than a few thousand persons, it might be possible to obtain the converse, 
viz., a system of unconscious prescriptions which would reproduce exactly 
and in full the contours of the mould formed by the system of conscious 
prohibitions. If this operation were possible, the anthropologist would have 
at his disposal a method to be applied to cases in which the margin of 
freedom between what is prohibited and what is done widens, making it 
risky to deduce the positive from the negative when only the latter is given. 

The systems just invoked are known in social anthropology as Crow- 
Omaha systems, because it is in these two North American tribes that their 
matrilineal and patrilineal variants respectively were first identified. It is 
through them that in 1957-8 I contemplated approaching the study of com- 
plex kinship structures in a second volume to which several allusions have 
been made but which doubtless I shall never write. I should therefore explain 
why I have abandoned this project. While still quite convinced that it will 
not be possible to generalize unless the Crow-Omaha systems are taken into 
consideration, I have come to see, more and more, that their analysis raises 
tremendous difficulties which are the province, not of the social anthropo- 
logist, but of the mathematician. Those with whom I have occasionally 
discussed this problem over the last decade are agreed. Some have declared 
that it can be solved, and others that it cannot, because of a reason of a 
logical nature which I shall indicate below. At all events, no one has felt the 
desire to take the time necessary to clear up the question. 

RadclifFe- Brown and Eggan have taught us a great deal about these 
systems by showing that one of their essential characteristics was for mem- 
bership of the lineage to have priority over membership of the generation. 
However, it strikes me that there is too much of a hurry to range Crow- 
Omaha systems with other systems which also give a single term to several 




Preface to the Second Edition xxxvii 

members of a lineage, be they male or female, although they belong to con- 
secutive generations, and which, like the Crow-Omaha systems, raise or lower 
by one or two generations certain members of two lineages which are arranged 
symmetrically on either side of a third containing Ego. Indeed, many writers 
class Crow-Omaha nomenclatures with that of societies with so-called 
asymmetrical marriage, i.e., prescriptive or preferential marriage with the 
matrilateral cross-cousin. As the theory of the latter systems poses no 
problem, it is assumed that it would be the same for the former. 

Nevertheless, a curious anomaly must detain us. It is easy to construct the 
diagram of an asymmetrical system. It looks like a chain of successive 
connections, the orientation of which remains the same in each generation 
level, thus forming closed cycles one on top of the other, which can be traced 
on the wall of a cylinder and projected on a plane. On the other hand, no 
one has yet managed to give a satisfactory graphic representation of a 
Crow-Omaha system in a two- or even three-dimensional space. As one 
generation follows another new lineages are involved, and to represent these 
requires as many reserve planes as there are new lineages. Lacking complete 
genealogical information except for that explicitly provided by the system, 
the anthropologist is only entitled to make these planes intersect once in 
the space of three or four generations. As the rule holds for both sexes, 
and as a lineage includes at least one man and one woman in each generation 
(otherwise the model would not be in equilibrium), the result is that a diagram 
limited to even a few generations requires many more spatial dimensions 
than can be projected on a single sheet of paper. And to these is added a 
temporal dimension which does not figure in the model of an asymmetrical 
system. Radcliffe-Brown and Eggan have got round this difficulty but only by 
juxtaposing several diagrams which each illustrate a single aspect of, or 
instant in, the system. Even placed side by side they fail to tell the whole 
story. 

Let us see how a discerning observer such as Deacon goes about describing 
a Crow system as found in Melanesia. Among the Seniang, he writes, ‘the 
selection of a consort ... is controlled by a number of prohibitions rather 
than injunctions’, and he adds, ‘theoretically ... a man should not marry a 
woman belonging to a clan into which a man of his own group has married 
within living memory ’. 1 One need only turn these two phrases round to obtain 
a perfectly satisfactory definition of asymmetrical marriage. Indeed, in this 
case, a single prescription is enough to determine the selection of a consort, 
viz., that which requires a man to marry a mother’s brother’s daughter or a 
woman from a ‘giver’ group. The ‘giver’ group, moreover, is recognized by 
the fact that there have already been similar alliances with it in living memory. 

It would be impossible to conclude from this that all so-called Crow- 
Omaha systems necessarily refrain from issuing prescriptions or voicing 

1 Deacon, A. B., Malekula: A Vanishing People in the New Hebrides , cd. C. H. Wedge- 
wood, London, 1 934 (George Routledge and Sons), p. 1 32. 




xxxviii Preface to the Second Edition 

marriage preferences, just as it would be to conclude that there is complete 
freedom of choice within the approved clans. The matrilineal Cherokee 
prohibit only two clans, the mother’s and the father’s, and recommend 
marriage with a ‘grandmother’, i.e., with a girl from mother's father’s clan 
or from father’s father’s clan. Among the Hopi, marriage was theoretically 
prohibited with any woman from any phratry to which belonged the mother’s 
clan, the father’s clan, or the mother’s father’s clan. If these societies com- 
prised only four clans or phratries, i.e., one for each type of grandparent, 
their marriage system would be very similar to the Kariera or Aranda sys- 
tems of Australia, in which, to find a suitable marriage partner, an individual 
rejects two or three lines and directs his attention to those one or two which 
remain. But Crow-Omaha systems always have more than four lines, there 
being seven clans among the Cherokee ; ten among the Omaha ; thirteen among 
the Crow, and probably more at one time; twelve phratries and about fifty 
clans among the Hopi; and thirty to forty clans among the Seniang. Since, 
as a general rule, marriage is allowed with all clans not subject to a formal 
prohibition, the Aranda-type structure, towards which every Crow-Omaha 
system would tend if the number of clans were approaching four, will remain 
submerged, as it were, beneath a flood of contingent incidents. It will never 
crystallize into a stable form. Here and there it will show through in a fluid 
and undifferentiated environment, but only as a faint and fleeting shadow. 

Moreover, in general this phenomenon will not even occur if it is true that 
the most suitable manner of defining a Crow-Omaha system is to say that 
each time Ego chooses a line from which to obtain a wife, all its members are 
automatically excluded for several generations from among the spouses 
available to Ego’s line. As every marriage means that the same thing happens, 
the system is in a continual state of turmoil which places it in contrast with 
the ideal model of an asymmetrical system in which the exchange mechanism 
is regularly ordered. On the whole an asymmetrical system resembles a 
clock with all its workings encased : 1 but a Crow-Omaha system is more like 
a lift-and-force pump fed from an external source, into the basin of which 
any surplus water which cannot be distributed is returned. 

Nothing, therefore, could be further from the truth than to see Crow-Omaha 
systems and asymmetrical systems as identical, on the pretext that, in both 
systems, one type of cross-cousin is raised a generation and the other type 
lowered a generation, as this would be to overlook an essential difference. 
Asymmetrical systems make one cross-cousin a ‘father-in-law’ and the other 
a ‘son-in-law’, i.e., always a member of a line with which Ego can contract 
marriage or which is able to contract marriage with Ego’s line. On the other 
hand, it will not unduly force matters to say that Crow-Omaha systems 

1 Or, to take into account the valuable analyses made by Needham, several clocks, each 
of which can engage any one at all of its wheels with the relevant part of any other, but all 
contained in the same case and functioning in such a way that there is always at least one 
dial working, even if whole portions of the cog-systems of each clock arc temporarily still. 




XXXIX 



Preface to the Second Edition 



change these same persons into ‘father’ and ‘son’ respectively, thereby 
proclaiming that marriage between their and Ego’s lineages has become 
impossible. Consequently, an asymmetrical system operates to change kin 
into affines, contrary to a Crow-Omaha system, which operates to change 
affines into kin. But in so doing, the two systems are seeking symmetrical and 
inverse effects: to make it possible or necessary either for the marriage alli- 
ance to be always between closely related persons or for alliance and kinship 
to become mutually exclusive, except (and as yet we do not know) for distant 
degrees. 

It is in this sense that Crow-Omaha systems provide the connecting link 
between elementary and complex structures. They relate to elementary 
structures in so far as they formulate preventions to marriage in sociological 
terms, and to complex structures in so far as the nature of the network of 
alliances is aleatory, an indirect result of the fact that the only conditions 
laid down are negative. To return to a distinction which has already been 
mentioned, we can say that, like all elementary structures, they require a 
mechanical model on the normative level, but, as observed in complex 
structures, they require only a statistical model on the factual level. 

No doubt some will object that the same is true of complex structures, since 
we are of the opinion that the prohibition of incest provides sufficient guaran- 
tee that a network of alliances, resulting in all other respects from free choices, 
will not compromise social cohesion. The incest prohibition persists in 
modern societies as a mechanical model. However, there is a difference: 
this model, which we continue to use, is much lighter than the model of 
Crow-Omaha systems in that, while ours covers a small number of very 
close degrees, the Crow-Omaha takes in whole lineages. On the other hand, 
the distribution of alliances in Crow-Omaha systems can be assumed to 



be less aleatory than in ours since these systems are concerned with small 



societies in which the mingling which is the consequence of massive prohibi- 



tions seemingly cannot avoid the appearance of a certain kinship between the 
spouses if the system has functioned regularly for several generations. Is this 
true, and if so, what form does it take and what is the mean distance of the 



degree? These are all questions of a major theoretical interest, but equally 
are all very difficult to answer for reasons which must now be given in detail. 



IV 

When we study systems with marriage classes (without giving this notion too 
technical a meaning), it is always possible and is generally easy to define 
marriage types, each type being represented by the marriage of a man from 
a determined class to a woman likewise from a determined class. If each 
class were given an index (a letter, number, or combination of both), there 
would thus be as many permissible types of marriage as there are pairs of 
indices, provided that all those which correspond to prohibited alliances are 
excluded in advance. 




xl Preface to the Second Edition 

In the case of elementary structures, this operation is considerably simplilied 
by the fact that there is a positive rule which lists the types or allows them to 
be deduced. But with the Crow-Omaha systems, things are doubly complic- 
ated. Firstly, the number of classes (if, for the sake of the argument, it is 
agreed to call exogamous units classes) increases appreciably and sometimes 
runs into the tens. More importantly, the system does not prescribe (or 
prescribes only partially and on rare occasions). It prohibits two or three 
types and allows all others, without telling us anything as to their form and 
their number. 

Nevertheless, we can ask mathematicians to express Crow-Omaha systems 
in terms of elementary structures. If each individual were represented by a 
vector with as many indices as there are clan memberships made pertinent 
by the prohibitions of the system, all the vector couples which did not have 
the same index twice would then constitute the list of those types of marriage 
which are permissible, and these in turn would determine those permissible 
or not for the children born of these previous marriages, and for their own 
children. Bernard Jaulin, Head of the Mathematical Section of the Maison 
des Sciences de 1’Homme, has kindly dealt with this problem and 1 thank 
him. Subject to possible errors which attach solely to the vague and clumsy 
way in which an anthropologist presents his data, it appears that a Crow- 
Omaha system which imposed only two prohibitions, viz., on the mother’s 
and the father’s clans respectively, would allow 23,436 different types of 
marriage if there were seven clans, 3,766,140 types if there were fifteen, and 
297,423,855 if there were thirty. With three clan prohibitions the constraints 
would be stronger, but the number of types would remain in the same order 
of magnitude: 20,181 ; 3,516,345; and 287,521,515 respectively. 1 

These high figures give us food for thought. Firstly, it is clear that when we 
deal with Crow-Omaha systems we are dealing with vastly different mechan- 
isms to those found in societies with marriage classes, in which the number of 
marriage types has nothing in common with the above figures. At first sight 
they seem to be more akin to the situation one might expect to find in modern 
societies in certain sectors, characterized by a strong coefficient of endogamy. 
If research in this direction confirmed the similarity, from the numerical 
point of view alone, Crow-Omaha systems would indeed form a bridge 
between elementary and complex structures, just as we supposed. 

As far as their range is concerned, the combinative possibilities of Crow- 
Omaha systems also suggest such complicated games as cards, draughts 
and chess, in which the possible combinations, although theoretically finite, 
are so large in number that, for all useful purposes and on the human scale, 
they might as well be infinite. In principle, these games are unaffected by 
history, since the same synchronic configurations (in the distributions) 
and diachronic configurations (in the development of the moves) can re- 
appear, even after thousands or millions of millenia, provided that imaginary 
1 The latter set of figures was also calculated by J. P. Schellhorn whom I also thank. 




Preface to the Second Edition 



xli 



players keep at it for that length of time. Nevertheless, in practice such games 
remain in a continual state of flux, as is seen in the fact that whole works are 
written on the history of chess strategy. Although potentially present at all 
times, the entire range of possible combinations is too great for it to become 
an actuality except fragmentarily and over a long period of time. In the same 
way, Crow-Omaha systems reveal a compromise between the periodicity of ele- 
mentary structures and their own determinism which relates to probability. 
The combinative possibilities are so vast that individual choices always 
preserve a certain latitude which is inherent to the system. The conscious 
or unconscious use to which this is put might even inflect the system if, as 
certain indications suggest, this margin of freedom proved to vary according 
to the composition of the vectors determining the place of each individual in the 
system. If such were the case, it would have to be said that, with Crow-Omaha 
systems, history finds its way into elementary structures, although, judging 
by what happens, their mission would seem to be to counteract its effects. 

Unfortunately, the way to go about measuring this margin of freedom, 
and the limits between which it is liable to vary, remains largely unknown. 
Because of the very high number of combinations, computer simulations 
would have to be employed. However, in order to commence operations, an 
initial state would have to be determined. The danger then would be that of 
being trapped in a vicious circle, because in a Crow-Omaha system the state 
of possible or prohibited marriages is constantly determined by the marriages 
which have occurred in preceding generations. The only solution to the pro- 
blem of determining an initial state which does not violate for certain one of the 
rules of the system would be a regression to infinity, unless one were prepared 
to wager that, despite its aleatory appearance, a Crow-Omaha system returns 
on itself periodically in such a way that, taking any initial state whatsoever, 
after a few generations a structure of a certain type must necessarily emerge. 

But even assuming that the empirical data would allow us to prove a 
posteriori that this is how things actually happen, the problem would not be 
resolved. A difficulty of a demographic nature must be taken into account. 
Almost all societies with a Crow-Omaha system were small in population. 
The most studied of these, the American examples, had fewer than 5,000 
persons. Consequently, the types of marriage which were actually practised 
in each generation could represent only an absurdly low proportion of the 
possible types. The result is that in a Crow-Omaha system the marriage 
types are not realized only at random, given the prohibited lineages. A 
factor of chance to the second power intervenes and chooses, from among 
all the potential marriage types, that small number which will become actual, 
and which will define, for the generations born of them, another range of 
possible choices, which, for the most part, are fated to remain merely poten- 
tial in their turn. In the final analysis, a very strict nomenclature and nega- 
tive rules which operate mechanically combine with two types of chance, 
one distributive, the other selective, to produce a network of alliances, the 




xlii 



Preface to the Second Edition 

properties of which are unknown. This network of alliances probably differs 
little from the network produced by so-called Hawaiian-type nomenclatures 
which give generation levels priority over the lineages, and which define 
preventions to marriage in terms of individual degrees of kinship rather than 
by prohibiting whole classes. The difference with Crow-Omaha systems derives 
from the fact that the Hawaiian systems employ three heterogeneous tech- 
niques characterized by the use of a restricted nomenclature, the ambiguity 
of which is corrected by a very precise determination of the prohibited degrees, 
and by an aleatory distribution of alliances, a distribution guaranteed by 
prohibitions extending to the fourth collateral degree and on occasion 
beyond. On the other hand, Crow-Omaha systems, which employ the same 
techniques, give them a more systematic expression by integrating them into 
a body of solidary rules w hich ought more readily to permit the development 
of the theory of such games. Until the development of this theory with the 
help of mathematicians, without which nothing is possible, the study of 
kinship will mark time despite the ingenious attempts which have appeared 
during the last ten years, but which, turned as they are towards empirical 
analysis or towards formalism, equally fail to recognize that kinship nomen- 
clature and marriage rules are complementary aspects of a system of exchanges 
whereby reciprocity is established and maintained between the constituent 
units of the group. 



Paris, February 23rd, 1966 




Introduction 



A relative by marriage is an elephant’s hip. 

Rev. H. L. Bishop, ‘A Selection of 
SiRonga Proverbs’, The South African 
Journal of Science, vol. XIX (1922), p. 413 




CHAPTER 1 



Nature and Culture 

i 

Of all the principles advanced by the forerunners of sociology, probably none 
has been so confidently repudiated as the distinction between nature and 
society. In fact, it is impossible to refer without contradiction to any phase 
in the evolution of mankind, where, without any social organization whatso- 
ever, forms of activity were nevertheless developed which are an integral 
part of culture. But the distinction proposed can admit of more valid 
interpretations. 

It was taken up by ethnologists of the Elliot Smith and Perry school to 
construct a theory, which, although questionable, clearly reveals, beyond the 
arbitrary detail of the historical outline, the profound contrast between 
two levels of human culture, and the revolutionary character of the neolithic 
transformation. With his probable knowledge of language, his lithic industries 
and funeral rites, Neanderthal man cannot be regarded as living in a state of 
nature. His cultural level, however, places him in as marked a contrast with 
his neolithic successors as, in another way, writers of the seventeenth century 
are to be distinguished from writers of the eighteenth. Above all, it is begin- 
ning to emerge that this distinction between nature and society, 1 while of no 
acceptable historical significance, does contain a logic, fully justifying its use 
by modern sociology as a methodological tool. Man is both a biological being 
and a social individual. Among his responses to external or internal stimuli, 
some are wholly dependent upon his nature, others upon his social environ- 
ment. For example, there would be no difficulty in establishing the respective 
origins of the pupillary reflex, and the usual position of the horse-rider's 
hands on the reins. But the distinction is not always as easy. The physico- 
biological and the psycho-social stimuli often arouse similar reactions, and it 
may be asked, as did Locke, whether a child’s fear of the dark is to be ex- 
plained as revealing his animal nature, or as resulting from his nurse’s 
stories. 2 Furthermore, in most cases, the causes themselves are not really 

1 ‘Nature’ and ‘culture* seem preferable to us today. 

2 In fact, it seems that fear of the dark does not appear before the twenty-fifth month: 
cf. Valentine, 1930, pp. 394-420. 




4 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

distinct, the subject’s response representing an integration of the biological 
and social sources of his behaviour, as in the mother’s attitude towards her 
child. Culture is not merely juxtaposed to life nor superimposed upon it, but 
in one way serves as a substitute for life, and in the other, uses and trans- 
forms it, to bring about the synthesis of a new order. 

If this general distinction is relatively easy to establish, a twofold difficulty 
emerges when it has to be analysed. An attempt might be made to establish 
a biological or social cause for every attitude, and a search made for the 
mechanism whereby attitudes, which are cultural in origin, can be grafted 
upon and successfully integrated with forms of behaviour which are them- 
selves biological in nature. To deny or to underestimate this opposition is to 
preclude all understanding of social phenomena, but by giving it its full 
methodological significance there is a danger that the problem of the transi- 
tion from the biological to the social may become insoluble. Where does 
nature end and culture begin? Several ways can be suggested for answering 
this dual question, but so far all have proved singularly disappointing. 

The simplest method would be to isolate a new-born child and to observe 
its reactions to various stimuli during the first hours or days after birth. 
Responses made under such conditions could then be supposed to be of a 
psycho-biological origin, and to be independent of ulterior cultural syntheses. 
However interesting the results which modern psychology has obtained by 
this method, their fragmentary and limited character cannot be overlooked. 
In the first place, only the early observations can be valid, for signs of condi- 
tioning are likely to appear within a few weeks or even days, and hence only 
such very elementary reactions as certain expressions of emotion can in 
actual fact be studied. Furthermore, negative proofs are always ambiguous, 
in that the question always remains open whether a certain reaction is absent 
because its origin is cultural, or because, with the earliness of the observa- 
tion, the physiological mechanisms governing its appearance are not yet 
developed. Because a very young child does not walk, it cannot be concluded 
that training is necessary, since it is known that a child spontaneously begins 
to walk as soon as it is organically capable of doing so . 1 Analogies can be 
found in other fields. The only way to eliminate these uncertainties would be 
to extend observation over several months or even years. But insoluble 
difficulties would then be encountered, since the environment satisfying the 
strict isolation requirements of the experiment is no less artificial than the 
cultural environment it purports to replace, in that, for example, during 
the first years of life, maternal care is a natural condition in the individual’s 
development. The experimenter is locked in a vicious circle. 

It is true that sometimes chance has seemed to succeed where artificial 
means have failed. Eighteenth-century imaginations were greatly stirred by 
the instance of “wild children”, lost in the countryside from their early years, 
and enabled, by exceptionally fortunate circumstances, to continue living 

' McGraw, 1944. 




Nature and Culture 



5 

and developing outside the influence of any social environment. But it seems 
clear enough from past accounts that most of these children were congenital 
defectives, and that their imbecility was the cause of their initial abandon- 
ment. and not, as might sometimes be insisted, the result. 1 

Recent observations support this view. The so-called ‘wolf-children’ found 
in India never reached a normal level. One of them never learned to speak, 
even as an adult. Of two children discovered together some twenty years 
ago, the younger remained unable to speak, while the elder lived till six years 
of age, but had the mental age of a 2^-year-old, and a vocabulary of scarcely 
one hundred words. 2 A South African ‘baboon-boy’, discovered in 1903 
when probably twelve to fourteen years old, was considered a congenital 
idiot in a 1939 account. 3 It must be added that as often as not the 
circumstances of discovery are unreliable. 

Moreover, these examples must be dismissed for a general reason 
which brings us directly to the heart of the problems to be discussed in this 
Introduction. As early as 1811, Blumenbach noted in a study of one of these 
children, ‘Wild Peter’, that nothing should be expected of such phenomena, 
for he made the important observation that if man is a domesticated animal 
he is the only one who has domesticated himself. 4 While it can be anticipated 
that, if lost or isolated, a domesticated animal, such as a cat, dog, or farm 
animal, will return to the natural behaviour of the species prior to the out- 
side interference of domestication, such cannot be expected of man, since the 
species has no natural behaviour to which an isolated individual might 
retrogress. A bee, Voltaire said, having roamed far from the hive, which it 
can no longer find, is lost, but for all that, has not become more wild. Whether 
the product of chance or experimentation, these ‘wild children’ may be cul- 
tural monstrosities, but under no circumstances can they provide reliable 
evidence of an earlier state. 

Man himself, therefore, cannot be expected to exemplify types of precul- 
tural behaviour. Is a reverse approach then possible, of trying to find among 
the superior levels of animals, attitudes and manifestations recognizable as the 
preliminary indications and outline of culture? Superficially, the contrast 
between human and animal behaviour provides the most striking illustration 
of the difference between culture and nature. If the transition does exist, it 
is not at the level of the so-called animal societies, as encountered among 
certain insects, for the unmistakable attributes of nature, instinct, the ana- 
tomical features necessary to it, and the hereditary transmission of forms of 
behaviour essential to the survival of both the individual and the species, 
seem united nowhere better than here. In these collective structures there is not 
even a suspicion of what might be called the universal cultural model, i.e., 

1 Itard, 1962; von Feuerbach, 1833. 

2 Ferris, 1902; Squires, 1927, p. 313; Kellogg, 1931, pp. 508-9; Kellogg, 1934, p. 149. 
See also on this polemic, Singh and Zingg, 1942; Gesell, 1940. 

3 Foley, 1940, pp. 128-33; Zingg, 1940, pp. 455-62. 

* Blumenbach, 1865, p. 339. 




6 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

language, tools, social institutions and systematized aesthetic, moral, or 
religious values. If any incipient stage to these human activities is to be dis- 
covered, attention must be directed to the other end of the animal scale, to 
the superior mammals, and more especially the anthropoid apes. 

But research on the great apes during the last thirty years has been parti- 
cularly discouraging in this respect. This is not to say that the basic compo- 
nents of the universal cultural model are entirely absent. With infinite trouble 
certain subjects can be made to articulate several monosyllables and disyl- 
lables but they never attach any meaning to them. To a certain extent the 
chimpanzee can use elementary tools and on occasions improvise with them. 1 
Temporary solidary and subordinate relationships can appear or disappear 
within a given group, and certain remarkable attitudes might be recognized 
as suggesting unselfish forms of activity or contemplation. Recent experiments 
have established the existence, among chimpanzees, of certain rudimentary 
forms of symbolic thought. What is remarkable is that it is especially feelings, 
such as religious fear and the ambiguity of the sacred, normally associated 
with the noblest part of human nature, that are the most easily identified 
among the anthropoids. 2 But if these phenomena all plead by their presence, 
their paucity is even more eloquent and in quite a different way. The 
rudimentary outline they provide is less striking than the apparently utter 
impossibility, confirmed by all the specialists, of developing these hints beyond 
their most primitive expression. Consequently, the gap which a thousand 
ingenious observations were expected to close has in reality merely shifted, 
whereby it appears even more insuperable. When it has been shown that 
there is no anatomical obstacle to a monkey’s articulating the sounds of 
speech, or even to his stringing syllables together, one can only be further 
impressed by the irremediable lack of language and the total incapacity to 
treat sounds uttered or heard as signs. The same must be acknowledged 
in other fields. This explains the pessimistic conclusion of an attentive 
observer, resigned after years of study and experimentation, to see the chimp- 
anzee as ‘a being hardened in the narrow circle of his own innate imperfections, 
“regressive” in comparison with man, neither desirous nor capable of 
tackling the path of progress’. 3 

But even the failures in the face of exact testing are not so convincing as the 
more general finding, which goes much more deeply into the problem, that 
general conclusions cannot be drawn from experiment. The social life of 
monkeys does not lend itself to the formulation of any norm. Whether faced 
by male or female, the living or the dead, the young or the old, a relative or a 
stranger, the monkey’s behaviour is surprisingly changeable. Not only is the 
behaviour of a single subject inconsistent, but there is no regular pattern to 

1 Guillaume and Mcyerson, 1930, pp. 92-7; 1931, pp. 481-555; 1934, pp. 497-554; 
1938, pp. 425-48. 

2 Kohler, 1928, appendix. 

3 Kohts, 1937, p. 531 ; 1928, pp. 255-75; 1930, pp. 412-47. 




Nature and Culture 



7 



be discerned in collective behaviour. Furthermore, in sexual life, as in other 
forms of activity, the external or internal stimulus, and rough adjustments, 
as influenced by successes and failures, seem to provide all the elements 
necessary to the solution of problems of interpretation. These uncertainties 
appear in the study of hierarchical relationships within the one group of 
vertebrates - a study, nevertheless, which can establish an order of sub- 
ordination for the animals in their relations with one another. This order 
is remarkably stable, since the one animal retains the dominant position for 
anything up to a year. Yet frequent irregularities make systematization 
impossible. A fowl, subordinate to two others in the middle of the hierar- 
chical table, nevertheless attacks the bird with the higher rank. Triangular 
relationships are observed in which A dominates B, B dominates C, and C 
dominates A, while all three dominate the rest of the group. 1 

It is the same with the relationships and individual tastes of anthropoid 
apes, among which such irregularities are even more pronounced: ‘Primates 
are much more variable in their food preferences than rats, pigeons, and 
hens.’ 2 In addition, the sex life of these anthropoids provides a ‘picture that 
almost covers the entire field of sexual behaviour in man ... all of the 
“normal” elements . . . also . . . the more conspicuous of the elements usually 
designated as “abnormal” in that they run up against social conventions. 3 
The orang-utan, gorilla and chimpanzee especially resemble man in this 
individualization of behaviour.’ 4 

Malinowski, then, is wrong when he writes that all the factors which define 
the sexual behaviour of male anthropoids ‘are common to all individuals of 
the species. They work with such uniformity that for each animal species 
one set of data and only one has to be given . . . The variations ... are so 
small and irrelevant that the zoologist ignores them and is fully justified in 
in doing so.’ 5 

What then is the real state of affairs ? Polyandry seems to prevail among the 
howler monkeys of Panama, since the proportion of females to males is 
28 to 72. In fact, a female in heat has been observed to have promiscuous 
relations with several males, but without preferences, or an order of priority, 
or lasting bonds being definable. 6 The gibbons of the Siam forests live in 
relatively stable monogamous families, but sexual relations take place with- 
out discrimination between members of the same family group, or with an 
individual belonging to another group, thus proving, it could be said, the 
native belief that gibbons are the reincarnations of unhappy lovers. 7 Mono- 
gamy and polygamy exist side by side among the rhesus monkeys, 8 and 
while bands of wild chimpanzees observed in Africa vary from four to four- 
teen in number the question of their conjugal system remains unanswered. 9 

' Ailec, 1942. 2 Maslow, 1933, p. 196. 3 Miller, 1931, p. 392. 

4 Yerkes, 1927, p. 181 ; Yerkes and Elder, 1936, p. 39. 

5 Malinowski, 1927, p. 194. 6 Carpenter, 1934, p. 128. 7 ibid. 1940, p. 195. 

8 ibid. 1942. 9 Nissen, 1931, p. 73. 




8 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

It seems as if the great apes, having broken away from a specific pattern of 
behaviour, were unable to re-establish a norm on any new plane. The clear 
and precise instinctive behaviour of most mammals is lost to them, but the 
difference is purely negative and the field that nature has abandoned re- 
mains unoccupied. 

This absence of rules seems to provide the surest criterion for distinguishing 
a natural from a cultural process. Nowhere is this suggested more than in the 
contrast between the attitude of the child, even when very young, whose 
every problem is ruled by clear distinctions, sometimes clearer and more 
imperative than for the adult, and the relationships among members of a 
simian group, which are left entirely to chance and accident and in which the 
behaviour of an individual subject today teaches nothing about his congener’s 
behaviour, nor guarantees anything about his own behaviour, tomorrow. 
In fact, a vicious circle develops in seeking in nature for the origin of insti- 
tutional rules which presuppose, or rather, are culture, and whose establish- 
ment within a group without the aid of language is difficult to imagine. 
Strictly speaking, there is consistency and regularity in nature as in culture, 
but these features appear in nature precisely where in culture they arc weakest, 
and vice versa. In nature this is the field of biological heredity, and in culture, 
that of external tradition. An illusory continuity between the two orders 
cannot be asked to account for points of contrast. 

No empirical analysis, then, can determine the point of transition between 
natural and cultural facts, nor how they are connected. The foregoing dis- 
cussion has not merely brought us to this negative result, but has provided 
the most valid criterion of social attitudes, viz., the presence or absence of 
rules in patterns of behaviour removed from instinctive determination. 
Wherever there are rules we know for certain that the cultural stage has been 
reached. Likewise, it is easy to recognize universality as the criterion of nature, 
for what is constant in man falls necessarily beyond the scope of customs, 
techniques and institutions whereby his groups are differentiated and con- 
trasted. Failing a real analysis, the double criterion of norm and universality 
provides the principle for an ideal analysis which, at least in certain cases 
and within certain limits, may allow the natural to be isolated from the 
cultural elements which are involved in more complex syntheses. Let us 
suppose then that everything universal in man relates to the natural order, 
and is characterized by spontaneity, and that everything subject to a norm is 
cultural and is both relative and particular. We are then confronted with a 
fact, or rather, a group of facts, which, in the light of previous definitions, 
are not far removed from a scandal: we refer to that complex group of beliefs, 
customs, conditions and institutions described succinctly as the prohibition 
of incest, which presents, without the slightest ambiguity, and inseparably 
combines, the two characteristics in which we recognize the conflicting features 
of two mutually exclusive orders. 1 It constitutes a rule, but a rule which, 
alone among all the social rules, possesses at the same time a universal 




Nature ami Culture 



9 

character. That the prohibition of incest constitutes a rule need scarcely be 
shown. It is sufficient to recall that the prohibition of marriage between close 
relatives may vary in its field of application according to what each group 
defines as a close relative, but, sanctioned by no doubt variable penalties, 
ranging from immediate execution of the guilty parties to widespread re- 
probation, sometimes merely ridicule, this prohibition is nevertheless to be 
found in all social groups. 

In fact, the famous exceptions and their small number which traditional 
sociology is often content to emphasize cannot be called upon here, for every 
society is an exception to the incest prohibition when seen by another society 
with a stricter rule. This being so, it is appalling to think how many excep- 
tions a Paviotso Indian would record. When reference is made to the three 
classical exceptions, Egypt, Peru and Hawaii, and to several others which 
must be added (Azande, Madagascar, Burma, etc.), it must not be overlooked 
that these systems are exceptions only in comparison with our own, in that 
their prohibitions cover a more limited area. But the idea of exception is 
completely relative, with a very different meaning for an Australian aborigine, 
a Thongan or an Eskimo. 

It is not so much, then, whether some groups allow’ marriages that others 
prohibit, but whether there are any groups in which no type of marriage 
whatever is prohibited. The answer must be completely in the negative, for 
two reasons: firstly, because marriage is never allowed between all near 
relatives, but only between certain categories (half-sister, to the exclusion of 
sister, sister to the exclusion of mother, etc.); secondly, because these con- 
sanguineous marriages are either temporary and ritualistic, or, where perma- 
nent and official, nevertheless remain the privilege of a very limited social 
category. Thus in Madagascar, the mother, the sister, and sometimes also 
the cousin, are prohibited spouses for the common people, while for the 
great chiefs and kings, only the mother, but the mother nevertheless, is 
fady or ‘prohibited’. But there is so little ‘exception’ to the prohibition of 
incest that the native conscience is very sensitive about it. When a household 
is sterile, an incestuous relationship, although unknown, is taken for granted, 
and prescribed expiatory ceremonies are celebrated automatically . 1 

Ancient Egypt is more disturbing since recent discoveries 2 suggest that 
consanguineous marriage, particularly between brother and sister, was per- 
haps a custom which extended to the petty officials and artisans, and was 
not, as formerly believed , 3 limited to the reigning caste and to the later 
dynasties. But as regards incest, there is no absolute exception. One day my 
eminent colleague, Ralph Linton, told me that in the genealogy of a Samoan 

1 Dubois, 1938, pp. 876-9. 2 Murray, 1934, p. 282. 

3 Amelineau, 1895, pp. 72-3; Flinders-Petrie, 1923, p. 1 10. 

1 ‘If ten ethnologists were asked to indicate one universal human institution, probably 

nine would choose the prohibition of incest. Several have already formally designated it as 

the only universal institution’ (cf. Kroeber, 1939, p. 448). 



10 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



noble family studied by him, of eight consecutive marriages between brother 
and sister, only one involved a younger sister, and native opinion condemned 
it as immoral. Marriage between brother and older sister appears then as a 
concession to the law of primogeniture, and it does not exclude the prohibition 
of incest, since over and above the mother and daughter, the younger sister 
remains prohibited as a spouse, or at least not viewed with favour. Now 
one of the rare texts we possess in the social organization of Ancient Egypt 
suggests a similar interpretation. It is the Bulak Papyrus No. 5, which tells 
the story of a king's daughter who wished to marry her older brother, and 
her mother remarked, ‘If I have no more children after those two, is it not the 
law for them to marry?’ 1 Here also there seems to be a form of prohibition 
approving marriage with the older sister, but not with the younger. As will 
be seen later the scope of our interpretation is widened by ancient Japanese 
texts which describe incest as a union with the younger, to the exclusion of 
the older sister. The rule of universality, even in these perhaps extreme cases, 
is no less apparent than the normative character of the institution. 

Here therefore is a phenomenon which has the distinctive characteristics 
both of nature and of its theoretical contradiction, culture. The prohibition 
of incest has the universality of bent and instinct, and the coercive character 
of law and institution. Where then does it come from, and what is its place 
and significance? Inevitably extending beyond the historical and geographical 
limits of culture, and co-extensive with the biological species, the prohibition 
of incest, however, through social prohibition, doubles the spontaneous 
action of the natural forces with which its own features contrast, although 
itself identical to these forms in field of application. As such, the prohibition 
of incest presents a formidable mystery to sociological thought. Few social 
prescriptions in our society have so kept that aura of respectful fear which 
clings to sacred objects. Significantly, as must be commented upon and 
explained later, incest proper, and its metaphorical form as the violation of a 
minor (by someone ‘old enough to be her father’, as the expression goes), 
even combines in some countries with its direct opposite, inter-racial sexual 
relations, an extreme form of exogamy, as the two most powerful induce- 
ments to horror and collective vengeance. But not only does this aura of 
magical fear define the climate in which this institution is evolving even yet 
in modern society, but on the theoretical plane as well, it envelops those 
debates with which sociology, since its inception, has, with an ambiguous 
tenacity, been concerned: ‘The famous question of the prohibition of incest,’ 
writes L£vy-Bruhl, ‘this vexata quaestio , whose solution has been so sought 
after by ethnographers and sociologists, has none. There is no purpose in 
asking it. In the societies just discussed, it is useless wondering why incest 
is forbidden. The prohibition does not exist . . . There is no consideration 
given to prohibiting it. It is something that does not occur, or, if by some 
impossibility it does occur, it is unparalleled, a monstrum , a transgression 

1 Maspero, 1889, p. 171. 




Nature and Culture 



11 



spreading horror and fear. Do primitive peoples recognize a prohibition on 
autophagy or fratricide? There is no more nor less reason for them to 
prohibit incest .’ 1 

To find so ill at ease a writer who otherwise did not falter at the boldest 
hypotheses is not surprising if it is borne in mind that almost all sociologists 
exhibit the same repugnance and timidity in the face of this problem. 

1 Levy-Bruhl, 1931, p. 247. 




CHAPTER II 



The Problem of Incest 

i 

The problem of the prohibition of incest displays all the ambiguity which, on 
a different plane, undoubtedly accounts for the sacredness of the prohibition 
itself. This rule is at once social, in that it is a rule, and pre-social, in its 
universality and the type of relationships upon which it imposes its norm. 
Man’s sexual life is itself external to the group, firstly, in being the highest 
expression of his animal nature, and the most significant survival of instinct, 
and secondly, in that its ends are to satisfy individual desires, which, as is 
known, hold little respect for social conventions, and specific tendencies, 
which, although in another sense, also go beyond society’s own ends. How- 
ever, if the regulation of relationships between the sexes represents an over- 
flow of culture into nature, in another way sexual life is one beginning of 
social life in nature, for the sexual is man’s only instinct requiring the stimula- 
tion of another person. This point must be taken up later. That it should 
provide a transition, in itself natural, between nature and culture, would be 
inconceivable, but it does give one reason why the change can and must 
necessarily take place in the field of sexual life above any other. It is a rule 
which embraces that which in society is most foreign to it, but also a social rule 
which retains what in nature is most likely to go beyond it. The incest prohibi- 
tion is at once on the threshold of culture, in culture, and in one sense, as we shall 
try to show, culture itself. Let it suffice for the moment to note the inherent 
duality to which it owes its ambiguous and equivocal character. Rather than 
accounting for this ambiguousness, sociologists have been almost exclusively 
concerned with reducing it. Their attempts fall into three principal types, 
which we shall distinguish and discuss here only in their essential features. 

ii 

Following the popular belief of many societies, including our own, the first 
type of explanation attempts to maintain the dual character of the prohibi- 
tion by dividing it into two distinct phases. For Lewis H. Morgan and Sir 
Henry Maine , 1 for example, the origin of the incest prohibition is really 

1 Maine, 1886, p. 228. 

12 




The Problem of Incest 



13 



both natural and social, but in the sense that it results from a social reflection 
upon a natural phenomenon. The incest prohibition is taken to be a protective 
measure, shielding the species from the disastrous results of consanguineous 
marriages. This theory is remarkable in that it is required by its very statement 
to extend to all human societies, even to the most primitive, which in other 
matters give no indication of any such eugenic second-sight, the sensational 
privilege of knowing the alleged consequences of endogamous unions. This 
justification for the prohibition of incest is of recent origin, appearing no- 
where in our society before the sixteenth century. Following the general 
pattern of his Moralia and impartially listing all possibilities without showing 
a preference for any one of them, Plutarch proposes three hypotheses, all 
sociological in nature, none referring to eventual defects in the descendants. 
Only Gregory the Great 1 can be quoted to the contrary, but his work does 
not seem to have had any influence on the thought of contemporaries or on 
later commentators . 2 

It is true that various monstrosities are threatened to the descendants of 
incestuous parents in the folklore of various primitive peoples, notably the 
Australian aborigines. But apart from the fact that this Australian aboriginal 
taboo is probably the least concerned with biological proximity (it permits 
unions, such as grand-uncle with grand-niece, the effects of which cannot be 
particularly favourable), it is sufficient to note that such punishments are, 
in primitive tradition, commonly expected for all those who break rules, 
and are in no way especially confined to reproduction. The extent to which 
hasty observations should be distrusted is well brought out in Jochelson’s 
remarks : 



‘These Yakut told me that they had observed that children born from 
consanguineous marriages are generally unhealthy. Thus, my interpreter, 
Dolganoff, told me that it had been observed among the Yukaghir that 
in case of marriages between cousins - which are contracted regardless of 
the custom of n’exi'yini ... - the children die, or the parents themselves 
are subject to disease which frequently result in death .' 3 

So much for natural sanctions. As for social sanctions, they are based so 
little upon physiological considerations that among the Kenyah and Kayan 
of Borneo, who condemn marriage with mother, sister, daughter, father’s 
sister or mother's sister, and with brother's daughter or sister's daughter, 
‘in the case of those women who stand to him in any of these relations in 
virtue of adoption, the prohibitions and severe penalties are if possible even 
more strictly enforced ’. 4 

Furthermore, it must be remembered that since the end of the paleolithic 
1 Muller, 1913, pp. 294-5. 2 Cooper, 1932. 

3 Jochelson, 1910-26, p. 80. The Nuer call incest ‘syphilis’ because they see in one the 

punishment of the other (Evans-Pritchard, 1935, p. 11). 

4 Hose and McDougaU, 1912, vol. I, p. 73. These authors remark that this observation 
demonstrates the artificiality of the rules concerning incest, ibid. vol. 11, p. 197. 







The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



era man has increasingly perfected cultivated or domesticated species through 
the use of endogamous reproductive methods. If it is supposed that man was 
conscious of the results of such methods, and also that he had judged the 
matter rationally, what explanation could be given as to how, in the held of 
human relationships, he reached conclusions running counter to those which 
his everyday experience in the animal and vegetable kingdoms continually 
served to prove, and upon which his very well-being depended? Moreover, if 
primitive man had been conscious of such considerations, why, instead of 
setting prohibitions upon himself, did he not turn to prescriptions whose 
experimental results had, at least in certain cases, shown beneficial effects? 
Not only did he not do so, but we ourselves still recoil from any such under- 
taking, and it has been onlv in recent social theories, denounced moreover as 
irrational, that the planned reproduction of man has been recommended. 
The positive prescriptions most commonly encountered in primitive societies, 
in association with the prohibition of incest, are those which tend to increase 
the number of marriages between cross-cousins (the respective descendants 
of a brother and a sister), and which, in this way, place identical forms of 
marriage, from the point of view of proximity, at the two extreme poles of 
social regulation: the marriage of parallel cousins (descended from two bro- 
thers or two sisters) is likened to fraternal incest, and cross-cousin marriage, 
despite the very close degree of consanguinity between the spouses, is 
regarded as an ideal. 

Nevertheless, it is striking to see how contemporary thought is loth to 
abandon the idea that the prohibition of relations between immediate 
consanguines or collaterals is justified for eugenic reasons, doubtless because, 
as we have experienced in the last ten years, it is in the held of biological con- 
cepts that we find the last traces of deductive reasoning still prevalent in 
modern thought. A particularly significant example comes from a writer 
whose scientific work has contributed most highly in dispelling the prejudices 
surrounding consanguineous unions. East, namely, has shmvn, in some admir- 
able work on the reproduction of maize, that the creation of an endogamous 
line results first in a period of fluctuations during which the type is subject 
to extreme variations, undoubtedly because of the resurgence of recessive 
characteristics which are usually hidden. Then the variabilities gradually 
diminish, ending in a constant and invariable type. In a work destined for a 
wider audience, the author, having recapitulated these results, draws the 
conclusion that popular beliefs about marriages between near relatives are 
largely justified, laboratory work merely confirming the prejudices of folk- 
lore, for, as one old writer said, ‘Superstition is often awake when reezon 
iz asleep .’ 1 This is so because ‘objectionable recessive traits are common in 
the human race as they are in maize ’. 2 But, except for mutations, this trouble- 
some reappearance of recessive characteristics is explicable only where work 
is being done on previously selected types, the characteristics which reappear 

1 East, 1938, p. 156. 2 loc. eit. 




15 



The Problem of Incest 

being precisely those that the age-long effort of the stock-breeder has success- 
fully eliminated. With man, this situation is not to be found, since, as we have 
just seen, the exogamy practised in human societies is a blind exogamy. 
But more especially East’s work has indirectly established that these supposed 
dangers would never have appeared if mankind had been endogamous from 
the beginning. If this were so, human races would probably be as constant 
and as definitively fixed as the endogamous lines of maize after the elimina- 
tions of variable factors. The temporary danger of endogamous unions, sup- 
posing such a danger to exist, obviously stems from an exogamous or 
pangenetic tradition, but it cannot be the cause of this tradition. 

As a matter of fact, consanguineous marriages merely match up genes of 
the same type, while a system having the law of probability as its only deter- 
minant for the union of the sexes (Dahlberg’s ‘amphimixis’) would mix 
them haphazardly. But the nature of genes and their individual characteristics 
remain the same in both cases. Consanguineous unions need only be inter- 
rupted for the general composition of the population to revert to what might 
be expected on a basis of ‘amphimixis’. Consanguineous marriages con- 
tracted long before therefore have no influence; they affect only the generations 
immediately following. But this influence is itself a function of the absolute 
dimensions of the group. In any given population, a state of equilibrium 
can always be defined in which the frequency of consanguineous marriage 
is equal to the probability of such marriages in an ‘amphimixis' system. If 
the population goes beyond this state of equilibrium, the frequency of con- 
sanguineous marriages remaining the same, then the number of carriers of 
recessive characteristics will increase: ‘The enlargement of the isolate brings 
with it an increase of heterozygosity at the expense of homozygosity'. 1 If 
the population falls below the state of equilibrium, the frequency of consan- 
guineous marriages remaining ‘normal’ in comparison, the recessive charac- 
teristics are lowered at a progressive rate of 0-0572 per cent in a population of 
500 with two children per family, and of 0-1697 per cent if the same population 
falls to 200. Dahlberg can thus conclude that ‘as far as heredity is concerned 
these inhibitions do not seem to be justified’ 2 from the standpoint of the 
theory of heredity. 

It is true that mutations determining the appearance of a recessive defect 
are more dangerous in small than in large populations. In fact, the chances of a 
transition to homozygosity are greater in small populations. However, this 
same rapid and complete transition to homozygosity will sooner or later 
ensure the elimination of the dreaded characteristic. Consequently, in a 
small, stable, endogamous population, as exemplified by many primitive 
societies, the only risk in marriages between consanguines arises from the 
appearance of new mutations, a risk that can be calculated since the rate of 
appearance is known. But the chances of finding a recessive heterozygote 
within the group arc slimmer than would attend marriage with a stranger. 

1 Dahlberg, 1937-8, p. 224. 2 ibid. 1929, p. 454. 




i6 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



Even in connection with recessive characteristics arising from mutation within 
a given population, Dahlberg estimates that the role of consanguineous 
marriages in the production of homozygotes is very slight, because for every 
homozygote from a consanguineous marriage, there arc an enormous number 
of heterozygotes which, if the population is sufficiently small, will necessarily 
reproduce among themselves. Hence, in a population of eighty, the prohibi- 
tion of marriage between near relatives, including first cousins, would only 
reduce the carriers of rare recessive characteristics by 10 per cent to 15 per 
cent. 1 These considerations are important since they introduce the quanti- 
tative notion of population size. The economic systems of some primitive 
or archaic societies severely limit population size, and it is precisely for a 
population of such a size that the regulation of consanguineous marriages can 
have only negligible genetic consequences. Without fully attacking the problem 
to which modern theoreticians can only hazard provisional and highly varied 
solutions, 2 it can therefore be seen that primitive mankind was not in a 
demographic position which would even have permitted him to ascertain 
the facts of the matter. 



in 

The second type of explanation tends to do away with one of the terms of the 
antinomy between the natural and social characteristics of this institution. 
For a large group of sociologists and psychologists, represented principally 
by Westermarck and Havelock Ellis, the prohibition of incest is no more 
than the social projection or reflection of natural feelings or tendencies, 
which can be entirely expanded by human nature. Quite important variations 
may be noted among those supporting this position, some deriving the horror 
of incest, the postulated origin of the prohibition, from the physiological 
nature of man, and others rather from his psychic tendencies. As a matter 
of fact, the old preconception of the ‘voice of blood’ has merely been revived, 
and here expressed more negatively than positively. This alleged horror of 
incest can only be manifested when a kinship relationship is supposedly 
known, or later established, between the guilty parties, and this sufficiently 
substantiates that its source cannot be instinctive. There remains the inter- 
pretation that this horror is based upon actual attraction, or the lack of it. 
Thus Havelock Ellis explains the repugnance for incest by the negative effect 
of daily habits upon erotic excitability, while Westermarck adopts a similar 
but more strictly psychological interpretation. 3 

1 Dahlberg, 1937-8, p. 220. 

2 Baur, Fischer and Lcnz, 1927; Dahlberg, 1930-1, pp. 83- 96; Hogben. 1931; Haldane 

1938; cf. also ch. VIII below. ’ 

3 Havelock Ellis, 1906; Westermarck, 1891, vol. I, p. 20 et seq. and vol. II, p. 207 et seq. 
Westermarck’s position provides curious variations. Moving away from the Havelock Ellis 
type of interpretation based on instinct, in the first edition of his The History of Human 
Marriage , he was to develop towards a more psychological conception, which is apparent 
in the second edition. However, towards the end of his life (Westermarck, 1 934a, pp. 22-40) 
reacting against B. Z. Seligman and Malinowski, he returned not only to his 1891 position 




The Problem of Incest 17 

The objection might be raised that these writers are confusing two forms 
of familiarization, the first of which develops between two individuals who 
are sexually united, generally bringing about a lessening of desire, and 
which a modern biologist declares, ‘is one of the disturbing elements in 
every social system’. 1 The second prevails among near relatives and is thought 
to have the same result, although sexual activity, which plays the determining 
role in the first case, is obviously absent in the second. The proposed inter- 
pretation therefore begs the question, for without experimental verification 
there is no knowing whether the alleged observation on which it rests, viz., 
that sexual desire is less frequent among near relatives, is to be explained either 
by these relatives being physically or psychologically accustomed to one 
another, or as a consequence of the taboos which constitute the prohibition. 
Therefore, the observation is assumed at the very moment of its alleged 
explanation. 

There is nothing more dubious than this alleged instinctive repugnance, 
for although prohibited by law and morals, incest does exist and is no doubt 
even more frequent by far than a collective conspiracy of silence would lead 
us to believe. To explain the theoretical universality of the rule by the uni- 
versality of the sentiment or tendency is to open up a new problem, for in no 
conceivable way is this supposedly universal fact universal. Hence, if all the 
numerous exceptions were treated as perversions or anomalies, it would 
remain to be defined in what these anomalies consist, on the only level to 
which they might be referred without tautology, i.e., the physiological, 
which would undoubtedly be all the more difficult now that the attitude taken 
by an important modern school towards this problem runs completely 
counter to Havelock Ellis and Westermarck. Psychoanalysis, namely, finds 
a universal phenomenon not in the repugnance towards incestuous relation- 
ships, but on the contrary in the pursuit of such relationships. 

Nor is it certain that familiarity is always regarded as being fatal to marri- 
age. Many societies judge otherwise. ‘The desire for a wife begins with the 
sister’, an Azande proverb says. The Hehe justify their custom of cross- 
cousin marriage by the long intimacy between the future spouses, which is 
seen by them as the true cause of sentimental and sexual attraction. 2 And it is 
the very same type of relationship which Westermarck and Havelock Ellis 
regarded as the origin of the horror of incest that the Chukchee strive to make 
the model of exogamous marriage: 

‘Most of the marriages between relatives (that is, cousins) are concluded 
at a tender age, sometimes when the bridegroom and the bride are still 
infants. The marriage ritual is performed, and the children grow up, 

1 Miller, 1931, p. 398. This innate tendency of man to become tired of his sexual partner 
is common to him and to the higher apes, ibid. p. 386. 2 Brown, 1934, p. 33. 

but even to the belief that the ultimate origin for the prohibition was to be sought in a 
vague awareness of the harmful consequences of consanguineous unions (Westermarck, 
19346, p. 53 ct seq.). 



1 8 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

playing together. When a little older, they tend the herd together. Of 
course, the ties between them grow to be very strong, often stronger 
even than death: when one dies, the other also dies from grief, or commits 
suicide. 

‘Similar to these marriages are those between the members of families 
friendly to each other, though not connected by ties of blood. Sometimes 
such families agree to a marriage between their children even before the 
children are born .’ 1 



Even among the Indians of the Thompson River in British Columbia, where 
marriage between second cousins is treated and derided as incestuous, this 
hostility to even distant consanguineous marriages does not prevent men from 
being betrothed to girls twenty years younger than themselves . 2 Facts such 
as these could be multiplied indefinitely. 

But there is an infinitely more serious confusion underlying the attitude 
under discussion. Why, if it resulted from congenital physiological and 
psychological tendencies, should the horror of incest be expressed as a pro- 
hibition so solemn and so essential as to be found enveloped by the same 
aura of sacredness in every human society? There is no point in forbidding 
what would not happen if it were not forbidden. Two answers can be given 
to this argument. The first is that the prohibition is only meant for certain 
exceptional cases in which nature has failed. But what proportion is there 
between the exceptions, which ex hypothesi must be extremely rare, and the 
importance of the regulations directed against them? In particular, if these 
errings were not regarded as harmful and dangerous, why should they be 
prohibited, let alone punished, w'ith such extreme severity in many societies? 
The origin of the prohibition of incest must be sought in the existence, or in 
the assumed existence, of this danger for the group, the individuals concerned, 
or their descendants. We are brought back inevitably to the previous ex- 
planation. It is true that a comparison could be made with suicide, against 
which multiple sanctions are levelled by morality and often the law itself, 
even though self-preservation is a natural tendency in all living beings. But 
the analogy between incest and suicide is only apparent, for if society pro- 
hibits them both this prohibition applies in the first case to a natural pheno- 
menon found commonly among. animals, and in the second, to a phenomenon 
which is completely foreign to animal life and which should be regarded as a 
function of social life. Society expressly forbids only that which society 
brings about. Next, and in particular, society condemns suicide because it 
considers it harmful to its interests, and not because it constitutes the denial 
of a congenital tendency. A better proof is that, while every society prohibits 
incest, there is none which does not make room for suicide and does not 



recognize it as legitimate in certain circumstances or for certain motives when 



the individual attitude happens to coincide with some social interest. Accord- 



1 Bogoras, 1904-9, p. 577. 



2 Teit, 1900, pp. 321, 325. 




The Problem of Incest 19 

ingly, the reasons why incest is prejudicial to the social order still remain to 
be discovered. 



IV 

The third type of explanation and the one just discussed have this in common, 
that they both claim to do away with one of the terms of the antinomy. In 
this way, they both contrast with the first type of explanation, which keeps 
both terms while trying to dissociate them. However, while advocates of the 
second type of explanation choose to reduce the prohibition of incest to 
some instinctive psychological or physiological phenomenon, the third group 
adopts the similar but contrary position of seeing it as a rule whose origin 
is purely social, its expression in biological terms being accidental and of 
minor importance. Because this last point of view is subject to more variations 
among its authors it must be set out in a little more detail than the others. 

Considered as a social institution, the prohibition of incest has two dif- 
ferent aspects. Sometimes it is only a prohibition of sexual union between 
close consanguines or collaterals, while at others this form of the prohibition, 
based as it is upon a definite biological criterion, is only one aspect of a 
broader system which is apparently without any biological basis. In many 
societies the rule of exogamy prohibits marriage between social categories 
which include near relatives, but, along with them, a considerable number 
of individuals for whom it is impossible to establish all but the most distant 
consanguineous or collateral relationships. In this case, it is an apparent 
caprice of the nomenclature to assimilate individuals who fall under the pro- 
hibition to biological relatives. 

Advocates of the third type of interpretation give their particular atten- 
tion to the broad and social form of the incest prohibition. But let us discard, 
without further delay, Morgan and Frazer’s suggestions that exogamous 
systems incorporate methods for preventing incestuous unions, which are 
actually only a small fraction of the unions that these systems do prohibit. 
In fact, as is proved by societies with neither clans nor moieties, the same 
result could be achieved without cumbersome rules of exogamy. If this 
first hypothesis provides a highly unsatisfactory explanation for exogamy, 
it provides no explanation at all for the prohibition of incest. Much more 
important from our point of view are theories giving a sociological inter- 
pretation of exogamy, or else leaving open the possibility that the incest 
prohibition may have derived from exogamy, or categorically affirming the 
existence of such a derivation. 

In the first group are included the ideas of McLennan, Spencer and Lub- 
bock, 1 and in the second those of Durkheim. McLennan and Spencer saw 
exogamous practices as the fixing by custom of the habits of warrior tribes 
among whom capture was the normal means of obtaining wives. Lubbock 
outlined an evolutionary transition from endogamous group marriage to 

1 McLennan, 1865; Spencer, 1882-96; Lubbock, 1870, p. 83 et seq. ; Lubbock, 1911. 




20 



The Elementary Structures oj Kinship 



exogamous marriage by capture. As opposed to wives gained endogamously, 
wives acquired by capture would have the status of individual possessions, 
and only they, for this reason, would provide the prototype for modern 
individual marriage. All these ideas can be discarded very simply, since, if 
they do not establish any connection between exogamy and the prohibition 
of incest, they fall outside our study, and if, on the contrary, they do offer 
applicable solutions not only to the rules of exogamy but to that particular 
form of exogamy which is the prohibition of incest, they are still completely 
unacceptable, for they would then claim to derive a general law, the prohibi- 
tion of incest, from some special and often sporadic phenomenon, no doubt 
associated with certain societies but having no possible universality. They 
have this and several other methodological defects in common with 
Durkheim’s theory, which is the most conscientious and systematic inter- 
pretation from purely social causes. 

The hypothesis advanced by Durkheim in the important work which in- 
augurated the A mice sociologique 1 has three characteristics. Firstly, it is 
based upon the universalization of facts observed in a limited group of 
societies; secondly, it makes the prohibition of incest a distant consequence of 
rules of exogamy; and, thirdly, these rules of exogamy are interpreted by 
reference to phenomena of a different order. Durkheim believed that the 
observation of Australian societies, which were regarded as illustrating 
a primitive type of organization formerly common to every human 
society, would provide the solution to the problem of incest. As is well 
known the religious life of these societies is dominated by beliefs affirming 
an identity of substance between the clan and the eponymous totem. The 
belief in this substantial identity explains the special prohibitions imposed 
upon blood, which is considered as the sacred symbol and the origin of the 
magico-biological community uniting members of the one dan. This fear of 
clan blood is particularly intense as regards menstrual blood, and it explains 
why, in most primitive societies, women are subject, because of their menstrual 
periods, and then in a more general way. to magical beliefs and special pro- 
hibitions. Consequently, the prohibitions relating to women and their segrega- 
tion, such as in the rule of exogamy, would only be the distant repercussions 
of religious beliefs which originally did not distinguish between the sexes, 
but which changed with the link which became established in men’s minds 
between blood and the female sex. In the final analysis, if the rule of exo- 
gamy prevents a man contracting a marriage within his own clan, it is be- 
cause otherwise he would risk coming in contact with that blood which is the 
visible sign and substantial expression of his kinship with his totem. Since the 
totem of others is unaffected by prohibitions and does not contain any magical 
force, there is no such danger for members of another clan, and accord- 
ingly there arose the double rule of interclan marriage and the prohibition of 
marriage within the clan. As conceived nowadays, the prohibition of incest is 

1 Durkheim, 1898. 




The Problem of Incest 2 1 

only a vestige or relic of that complex collection of beliefs and prohibitions, 
with roots extending into a magico-religious system where ultimately the 
explanation lies. Consequently, by proceeding analytically, we see that for 
Durkheim the prohibition of incest is a remnant of exogamy, that this exo- 
gamy is explicable in terms of the special prohibitions relating to women, 
that these prohibitions originate in the fear of menstrual blood, that this fear 
is only a particular case of the general fear of blood, and finally, that this 
fear merely expresses certain feelings deriving from the belief in the con- 
substantiality of the individual clan member and his totem. 

The strength of this interpretation proceeds from its capacity to 
systematize widely varying phenomena, which, when taken separately, are 
seemingly very difficult to comprehend. Its weakness lies in the fact that the 
connexions so established are fragile and arbitrary. Let us leave aside the 
prejudicial objection drawn from the non-universality of totemic beliefs. 
In fact, Durkheim postulates this universality, and it is highly probable he 
would maintain his position, in view of contemporary observations which in 
no way prove this theory, but which cannot give reasons to invalidate it 
cither. But even accepting his hypothesis for the moment, we find no logical 
link between the various stages allowing them to be deduced from the initial 
postulate. The relationship linking each of the stages with its predecessor is 
arbitrary, and there is no a priori proof either for or against its existence. 
Take first the belief in totemic substantiality. We know that this belief 
poses no obstacle to the eating of the totem, but merely confers some cere- 
monial significance upon this eating. Marriage and, in very many societies, 
the sexual act itself have a ceremonial and ritualistic significance in no way 
incompatible with the claim that they represent a form of totemic com- 
munion. Secondly, the horror of blood, especially menstrual blood, is not 
universal. 1 Young Winnebago Indians visit their mistresses and take advan- 
tage of the privacy of the prescribed isolation of these women during their 
menstrual period. 2 

On the other hand, where the horror of menstrual blood seems to reach 
its culminating point, it is by no means obvious that the imourity should 
have predilections, or limits. The Chaga, a Bantu tribe living on the slopes 
of Mt. Kilimanjaro, have a patrilineal social organization. However, the 
instructions lavished upon girls during initiation put them on guard against 
the general dangers of menstrual blood, and not against the special dangers 
to which people of the same blood would be exposed. Moreover, it seems to 
be the mother, and not the father, who runs the gravest danger: 

‘Do not show it to your mother, for she would die! Do not show it to 
your age-mates, for there may be a wicked one among them, who will take 
away the cloth with which you have cleaned yourself, and you will be 
barren in your marriage. Do not show it to a bad woman, who will take 



1 Van Waters, 1913. 



2 Radin, 1920, p. 393. 




22 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

the doth to place it in the top of her hut . . . with the result that you can- 
not bear children. Do not throw the cloth on the path or in the bush. A 
wicked person might do evil things with it. Bury it in the ground. Protect the 
blood from the gaze of your father, brothers and sisters. It is a sin to let 
them see it .’ 1 



The Aleutian does not copulate with his wife during her menstrual periods 
for fear of bad hunting, but if a father sees his daughter during her first 
menstrual period, she risks becoming blind and mute. The dangers are all 
for her, not for him . 2 As a rule, a woman is impure during her menses, not 
only for her clan relatives, but also for her exogamous husband, and for 



everyone in general. This point is vital since Durkheim claims to derive exo- 



gamy from a combination of customs and prohibitions relating to women. 



of which it is presumably in some way the consequence, and from difficulties 



to which it might provide a solution. However, these prohibitions are not 
lilted when the rule of exogamy is applied, and they are imposed indifferently 
upon endogamous as w'ell as exogamous members of the group. Moreover, 
how did the rule of exogamy appear if prejudices relating to menstrual blood 
were its only source? The prohibition of sexual relations with the wife during 
her menses would be enough to avoid any risk of pollution. If the rules of 
exogamy have no other function, they are superfluous and incomprehensible, 
especially when one considers the innumerable complications which they 
introduce into group life. If these rules have arisen it is because they satisfy 
other demands and fulfil other functions. 



The sociological interpretations of Durkheim, as well as of McLennan, 
Spencer and Lubbock, have one basic defect in common. They attempt to 
establish a universal phenomenon on an historical sequence, which is by 
no means inconceivable in some particular case but whose episodes are so 
contingent that the possibility of this sequence being repeated unchanged 
in every human society must be wholly excluded. In being the most complex, 
the Durkhcimian sequence falls most heavily under this criticism. It is possi- 
ble to imagine that, in a given society, the origin of some particular institution 
is to be explained by some highly arbitrary transformations. History provides 
examples. But history also shows that, according to the society considered, 
such processes may result in widely differing institutions, and that where ana- 
logous institutions have found independent origins in various parts of the 
world, the historical sequences leading up to their appearances are them- 
selves highly dissimilar. This is w'bat is termed convergence. But if the results 
of a succession of immutably repeated events were always identical (as in 
the physical sciences), the conclusion could be reached with assurance that 
these events are not the reason for the phenomenon’s existence but point to a 
law which alone provides the explanation. Durkheim does not propose any 
law which might account for the necessary transition in the human mind 



1 Raum, 1939, p. 559. 



2 Jochelson, n.d., nos. 34-5. 




The Problem of Incest 23 

from the belief in totemic substantiality to the horror of blood, from the 
horror of blood to the superstitious fear of women, and from this fear to the 
setting up of exogamous rules. The same criticism can be levelled at Lord 
Raglan’s imaginary reconstructions. However, we have shown that there is 
nothing more arbitrary than this succession of transitions. Even if there 
were only these transitions at the origin of the incest prohibition, they would 
still have permitted other solutions, some of which at least should have eventu- 
ated, by the simple law of probabilities. For example, the prohibitions 
afTecting women during their menstrual periods provided a very happy answer 
to the problem, and a number of societies could have been satisfied 
with it. 

The ambiguity then is more serious than it seemed, bearing not solely or 
principally upon the validity of the facts involved, but also upon the way in 
which the prohibition itself must be conceived. McLennan, Lubbock, 
Spencer and Durkheim see the prohibition of incest, in comparison with 
current social conditions, as a survival from an altogether heterogeneous 
past. Consequently they arc confronted with a dilemma, namely, if the whole 
institution is no more than a survival, how can the universality and vitality of 
the rule be understood, when only occasional formless traces of it might 
conceivably be brought to light, or does the prohibition of incest correspond 
in modern society to new and different functions? But this being the case, it 
must be acknowledged that the historical explanation does not exhaust the 
problem. Furthermore, might not the origin of the institution be found in 
those functions which are still current and are verifiable by observation 
rather than in a vague and hypothetical historical scheme? The problem of 
the incest prohibition is not so much to seek the different historical configura- 
tions for each group as to explain the particular form of the institution 
in each particular society. The problem is to discover what profound and 
omnipresent causes could account for the regulation of the relationships 
between the sexes in every society and age. Any different procedure would 
commit the same error as that of the linguist who believed that by studying 
the history of vocabulary he had exhausted the sum total of the phonetic or 
morphological laws governing the development of language. 



This disappointing analysis at least explains why contemporary sociology has 
often preferred to confess itself powerless than to persist in what, because of 
so many failures, seems to be a closed issue. When it cannot tackle a problem 
of this importance, instead of admitting that its methods are inadequate and 
that its principles require revision and readjustment, it declares that the 
prohibition of incest is outside its field. It was in this manner that, in Primitive 
Society , where so many problems have been reopened, Robert Lowie came 
to the following conclusion regarding the question with which we are 




24 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



concerned: ‘It is not the function of the ethnologist but of the biologist and 
psychologist to explain why man has so deep-rooted a horror of incest. . . The 
student of society merely has to reckon with the fact that the dread of incest 
limits the biologically possible number of unions '. 1 Another specialist writes 
on the same subject: ‘It may be that it is impossible to explain or to trace the 
origin of any human custom that is universal; perhaps the most we can do is 
to correlate it with certain other conditions ’, 2 which amounts to the same 
thing as Lowie's renunciation. But the prohibition of incest would then 
clearly be the only case of the natural sciences being asked to account for the 
existence of a rule sanctioned by human authority. 

It is true that, through its universality, the prohibition of incest touches 
upon nature, i.e., upon biology or psychology, or both. But it is just as certain 
that in being a rule it is a social phenomenon, and belongs to the world 
of rules, hence to culture, and to sociology, whose study is culture. In the 
Appendix to Primitive Society , Lowie, having perceived this very clearly, 
reconsiders the statement just quoted: ‘Nevertheless, l do not believe, as 
formerly, that incest is instinctively repugnant to man . . . We . . . must 
consider his aversion towards incest as a former cultural adaptation .' 2 The 
almost general failure of theories gives no justification for the drawing of 
any other conclusion. Instead, analysis of the causes of this failure should lead 
to the readjustment of those principles and methods which provide the only 
possible basis for a viable ethnology. In fact, how could rules be analysed 
and interpreted if ethnology should confess its helplessness before the one 
pre-eminent and universal rule which assures culture’s hold over nature? 

We have shown that each of the early theoreticians who tackled the pro- 
blem of the incest prohibition held one of the three following points of view. 
Some put forward the natural and cultural duality of the rule, but could only 
establish a rationally derived and extrinsic connection between the two 
aspects. Others have explained the prohibition of incest solely or predomi- 
nantly if not in terms of natural causes, then as a cultural phenomenon. 
Each of these three outlooks has been found to lead to impossibilities or 
contradictions. Consequently, a transition from static analysis to dynamic 
synthesis is the only path remaining open. The prohibition of incest is in 
origin neither purely cultural nor purely natural, nor is it a composite mixture 
of elements from both nature and culture. It is the fundamental step because 
of which, by which, but above all in which, the transition from nature to 
culture is accomplished. In one sense, it belongs to nature, for it is a general 
condition of culture. Consequently, we should not be surprised that its formal 
characteristic, universality, has been taken from nature. However, in another 
sense, it is already culture, exercising and imposing its rule on phenomena 
which initially are not subject to it. We have been led to pose the problem of 
incest in connection with the relationship between man’s biological existence 
and his social existence, and we have immediately established that the 

1 Lowie, 1961, p. 15. 2 Seligman, 1935, p. 75. 3 Lowie, 1935, pp. 446-7. 




The Problem of Incest 25 

prohibition could not be ascribed accurately to either one or the other. In 
the present work we propose to find the solution to this anomaly by showing 
that the prohibition of incest is the link between them. 

But this union is neither static nor arbitrary, and as soon as it comes into 
being, the whole situation is completely changed. Indeed, it is less a union 
than a transformation or transition. Before it, culture is still non-existent; 
with it, nature’s sovereignty over man is ended. The prohibition of incest is 
where nature transcends itself. It sparks the formation of a new and more 
complex type of structure and is superimposed upon the simpler structures 
of physical life through integration, just as these themselves are superimposed 
upon the simpler structures of animal life. It brings about and is in itself the 
advent of a new order. 




PART ONE 



Restricted Exchange 



Your own mother, 

Your own sister. 

Your own pigs. 

Your own yams that you have piled up, 

Y ou may not eat. 

Other people’s mothers, 

Other people’s sisters, 

Other people’s pigs, 

Other people’s yams that they have piled up, 
You may eat. 

Arapesh aphorisms: M. Mead, Sex and 
Temperament in Three Primitive Societies 
(New York, 1935), p. 83. 






1 • The Bases of Exchange 



CHAPTER III 

The Universe of Rules 

I 

Even if the incest prohibition has its roots in nature it is only in the way 
it affects us as a social rule that it can be fully grasped. In form and in field of 
application it varies greatly from group to group. While highly limited in 
our society, in certain North American tribes it is extended to the most 
distant degrees of kinship. In this case there is no need to add that the pro- 
hibition is less concerned with true consanguinity, which is often impossible 
to establish, if at all, than with the purely social phenomenon by which two 
unrelated individuals are classed as ‘brothers’ or ‘sisters’, ‘parents’ or ‘child- 
ren’. The prohibition and the rule of exogamy, in this case, are therefore 
merged. Occasionally both institutions exist side by side. As has often been 
observed, exogamy by itself is not enough to prevent the marriage of a mother 
with her son in a patrilineal system, nor of a father with his daughter in a 
matrilineal system. But in many cases it is the rule of exogamy or the kinship 
system which is decisive, without taking real relationships, apart from those 
of the first degree, into account. It is the same law which in the marriage of 
cross-cousins likens one group of first cousins to brothers and sisters and 
makes the other half of these same cousins into potential spouses. The same 
system, and others also, highly recommends and sometimes prescribes 
marriage between the maternal uncle and his niece, and less commonly 
between the paternal aunt and her nephew, whereas similar behaviour by the 
paternal uncle or the maternal aunt would horrify just as much as would 
incest with the relatives to whom these collaterals are assimilated. It has 
often been noted that several contemporary legal systems omitted to register 
one or both of the grandparents among the prohibited degrees. This dis- 
crepancy can be explained by the high improbability of such marriages in 
modern societies, but among the Australian aborigines - otherwise so 
punctilious - and certain Oceanic peoples, such a union is not inconceivable, 
although other unions involving a more distant relationship are specifically 
forbidden. Hence, the prohibition is not always expressed in terms of degrees 
of real kinship but refers to individuals who use certain terms in addressing 
one another. This remains true even of those Oceanic systems which permit 
marriage with a classificatory ‘sister’, but distinguish immediately between 



29 




30 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

have maori, or ‘real sister’, and kave kesekese, ‘different sister’, kave fakata- 
fatafa , ‘sister set aside’, kave i take yaeya, ‘sister from another place’. 1 It is 
the social relationship more than the biological tie implied by the terms 
‘father’, ‘mother’, ‘son’, ‘daughter’, ‘brother’, and ‘sister’, that acts as the 
determinant. For this reason especially, theories attempting to justify the 
prohibition of incest by the harmful consequences of consanguineous unions 
(including numerous primitive myths suggesting this interpretation) can only 
be regarded as rationalizations. 

Considered from the most general viewpoint, the incest prohibition ex- 
presses the transition from the natural fact of consanguinity to the cultural 
fact of alliance. Nature by itself already moves to the double rhythm of 
receiving and giving, which finds expression in the opposition of marriage and 
descent. But, although present in both and in some way bestowing a common 
form upon them, this rhythm does not display the same aspect in both nature 
and culture. The characteristic of nature is that it can give only what has been 
received. Heredity expresses this permanence and continuity. However, in the 
sphere of culture, the individual always receives more than he gives, and gives 
more than he receives. This double disequilibrium is expressed by the 
processes of education and invention, one being the inverse of the other, and 
both contrasting with the process of heredity. It is certainly not our intention 
here to suggest that the vital phenomena should be considered as phenomena 
in equilibrium ; the contrary is obviously true. But biological disequilibria only 
appear as such in their relationship with the physical world. In comparison 
with cultural phenomena, they show, on the contrary, stability, whereas dyna- 
mic synthesis is now applicable to the new phenomena. Seen thus, the pro- 
blem of the transition from nature to culture is reduced to the problem of 
introducing the accumulatory processes within the repetitive process. 

Based on natural facts, which hypothetically are all that are present, how 
is this introduction possible? As we have just emphasized, nature, like culture, 
moves to the double rhythm of receiving and giving. But the two moments of 
this rhythm, as produced by nature, are not viewed indifferently by culture. 
The first stage, that of receiving, as expressed through biological kinship, 
finds culture powerless, for a child’s heredity is integrally inscribed in the 
genes transmitted by the parents ; whatever they are, such will be the child. 
The transitory effect of the environment can leave its mark, but cannot make 
this permanent independently of changes in this environment. But for the 
moment let us consider marriage, which nature requires just as urgently as 
descent, if not in the same way or to the same extent. In the first instance, 
only the fact of marriage is required, but not, within specific limits, 
its determination. Nature assigns to each individual determinants trans- 
mitted by those who are in fact his parents, but it has nothing to do with decid- 
ing who these parents will be. Consequently, from the point of view of nature 
heredity is doubly necessary, firstly as a law - there is no spontaneous genera- 

1 Firth, 1936, p. 265. 




3 * 



The Universe of Rules 

tion - and secondly as a specification of the law, for nature not only says that 
one must have parents, but that one will be like them. As regards marriage, 
however, nature is satisfied with affirming the law, but is indifferent to its 
contents. If the relationship between parents and children is strictly deter- 
mined by the nature of the parents, the relationship between male and female 
is left entirely to chance and probability. Thus, mutations aside, nature 
contains one solitary principle of indetermination, revealed in the arbitrariness 
of marriage. If, in keeping with the evidence, nature is acknowledged as 
being historically anterior to culture, it can be only through the possibilities 
left open by nature that culture has been able to place its stamp upon nature 
and introduce its own requirements without any discontinuity. Culture yields 
to the inevitability of biological heredity. Eugenics itself can barely claim to 
manipulate this irreducible fact while respecting its preconditions. But culture, 
although it is powerless before descent, becomes aware of its rights, and of 
itself, with the completely different phenomenon of marriage, in which 
nature for once has not already had the last word. There only, but there finally 
culture can and must, under pain of not existing, firmly declare ‘Me first’, 
and tell nature, ‘You go no further'. 

For much deeper reasons than already given, we are opposed to those 
concepts, such as held by Westermarck and Havelock Ellis, which credit 
nature with a principle of determination, even a negative one, for marriage. 
Whatever the uncertainties regarding the sexual habits of the great apes, and 
the monogamous or polygamous character of the gorilla and chimpanzee 
family, it is certain that these great anthropoids practise no sexual dis- 
crimination whatever against their near relatives. On the other hand, Hamil- 
ton’s observations establish that sexual familiarity lessens desire even among 
the Macaques . 1 Either there is no link, therefore, between the two pheno- 
mena, or, in man, the transition from familiarity to aversion, regarded by 
Westermarck as the true origin of the prohibition, is accompanied by addi- 
tional characteristics. How can this peculiarity be explained if, ex hypothesis 
the intervention of any step of an intellectual, i.e., cultural, origin has been 
excluded ? The supposed aversion would have to be seen as a specific pheno- 
menon without any sign of corresponding physiological mechanisms. We 
consider that if this aversion were a natural phenomenon, its appearance 
would have been anterior or at least external to culture, and unaffected by it. 
It would be useless to wonder in what way or by what mechanisms the 
articulation of culture with nature, without which there could be no conti- 
nuity between the two orders, was brought about. This problem becomes 
clear when nature’s indifference to the modalities of relations between the 
sexes is acknowledged, an indifference witnessed to by the entire study of 
animal life, for it is precisely alliance that is the hinge, or more exactly the 
notch where the hinge might be fixed. Nature imposes alliance without 
determining it, and culture no sooner receives it than it defines its modalities. 

* Miller, 1931, p. 392. 





The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



The apparent contradiction between the regulatory character of the pro- 
hibition and its universality is thus resolved. The universality merely expresses 
the fact that culture has at all times and at all places filled this empty form, 
as a bubbling spring first fills the depressions surrounding its source. For the 
moment, let it be enough to state that the content with which culture has 
filled it is the rule, the permanent and general substance of culture, without 



asking yet why this rule exhibits the general characteristic of prohibiting 



certain degrees of kinship, and why this general characteristic seems 



so curiously varied. 



The fact of being a rule, completely independent of its modalities, is indeed the 
very essence of the incest prohibition. If nature leaves marriage to chance and 
the arbitrary, it is impossible for culture not to introduce some sort of order 
where there is none. The prime role of culture is to ensure the group’s existence 
as a group, and consequently, in this domain as in all others, to replace 
chance by organization . 1 The prohibition of incest is a certain form, and even 
highly varied forms, of intervention. But it is intervention over and above 
anything else; even more exactly, it is the intervention. 

This problem of intervention is not raised just in this particular case. It is 
raised, and resolved in the affirmative, every time the group is faced with the 
insufficiency or the risky distribution of a valuable of fundamental importance. 
Certain forms of rationing are new to our society and arouse surprise in 
minds cast in the traditions of economic liberalism. Thus we are prompted to 
see collective intervention, when it affects commodities vital to our way of life, 
as a bold and somewhat scandalous innovation. Because the control of 



distribution and consumption affects gasoline, we readily think that its 
formulation was only contemporaneous with the motor-car. But nothing is 
less true. The system of the scarce product’ constitutes an extremely general 
model. In this and many other cases these periods of crisis, to which until 
recently our society was so unaccustomed, merely re-establish, in a crucial 
form, a state of affairs regarded as virtually normal in primitive society. 
Thus, ‘the system of the scarce product’, as expressed in collective measures 
of control, is much less an innovation, due to modern conditions of warfare 
and the worldwide nature of our economy, than the resurgence of a set of 
procedures which are familiar to primitive societies and necessary to the 
group if its coherence is not to be continually compromised. 

It is impossible to approach the study of marriage prohibitions if it is not 
thoroughly understood from the beginning that such facts are in no way 
exceptional, but represent a particular application, within a given field, of 
principles and methods encountered whenever the physical or spiritual 
existence of the group is at stake. The group controls the distribution not 
only of women, but of a whole collection of valuables. Food, the most 



1 Porteus has clearly seen this point for Australia: Porteus, 1931, p. 269. 




33 



The Universe of Rules 

easily observed of these, is more than just the most vital commodity it really 
is, for between it and women there is a whole system of real and symbolic 
relationships, whose true nature is only gradually emerging, but which, when 
even superficially understood, are enough to establish this connexion. 
Thurnwald tells us that in Buin women feed the pigs, relatives lend them to 
one another, and the villages exchange them for women . 1 This continuity is 
possible only because it remains within the sphere of speculation. Primitive 
thought unanimously proclaims that ‘food is . . . something that has to be 
shared ’. 2 But this is because, from season to season, the native lives in accord- 
ance with the double rhythm of abundance and famine, passing ‘through the 
whole range of sensations from inanition to repletion ’. 3 From one set of 
conditions to another, from ‘the hungry months’ to ‘the months of plenty’, 
the change is brutal and complete . 4 These observations are not just true for 
Africa. Among the Svanetes of the Caucasus, ‘if some family decides to kill 
a bullock or cow, or to sacrifice several dozen sheep, the neighbours come 
from all around . . . Having eaten, the Svanetes will fast for weeks, content 
to swallow down a little flour mixed with water. Then comes another 
feast ... ’ 5 In view of this radical uncertainty, which might be illustrated by 
examples the world over, it is not unusual that primitive thought should be 
incapable of regarding food ‘as something which could be procured, owned, 
and consumed by one individual alone. In childhood, or in subsequent depen- 
dent positions, it must be supplied by elders; throughout life it must be shared 
with contemporaries .’ 6 This sharing follows rules which are interesting to 
consider because they reflect, and also specify, the structure of the familial 
and social group. 

The Eskimo hunter of Hudson Bay ‘who first strikes a walrus receives the 
tusks and one of the fore-quarters. The person who first comes to his assis- 
tance receives the other fore-quarter ; the next man, the neck and head ; the 
following, the belly; and each of the next two, one of the hind-quarters .’ 7 
But in times of scarcity, all rights of distribution are suspended, and the 
kill is regarded as the common possession of the community as a whole. 

Another section of this work will describe the matrimonial organization of 
certain Burmese peoples. The reader need only refer to this section 8 to com- 
prehend the extent to which the native mind sees matrimonial and economic 
exchanges as forming an integral part of a basic system of reciprocity. 
The methods for distributing meat in this part of the world are no less ingen- 
ious than for the distribution of women. These methods for distributing meat 
have been carefully described by Stevenson . 9 The recipient groups vary 
according to the importance of the feast, and those who receive meat during 
the tsawnlam feasts are not the same as those taking part in the hunting 

1 Thurnwald, 1934, pp. 119-41. 2 Richards, 1939, p. 197. 

3 ibid. 1932, p. 165. 4 ibid.; Evans-Pritchard, 1940, p. 83. 

5 Kowalewsky, 1890a, p. 53. 6 Richards, 1939, pp. 199-200. 

7 Boas, 1901, p. 116. ■ Pt. II, chs. XV and XVI. 

’Stevenson, 1937, pp. 15-23. 




34 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

or war dances. The system of obligations is again modified at the Ruak hnah, 
Khan Tseh and Pual thawn funeral feasts: 



Khuang Animals 

Recipients tsawi killed in the Funerals 

feast hunt 



Father 

Brothers (class.) 

Sisters 

Mother's brother 
Wife’s brother 

Ego (feast-giver, shooter of game, or 
heir of deceased) 

Rual 

Headman 

Blacksmith 

Gun-owner 

Beaters 

Previous givers of feasts 
Sangsuan 

Workers (at feasts) 

Assistant (at feasts) 

Owner of Khuang bamboo 



+ 


+ 




+ 


+ 


+ 


+ (6) 


+ (i) 


+ (3) 


4 


+ 


4 


4 




4 


4 


+ 


+ 


4 




4 - 


4 


4 


+ 


4 


4 


+ 




4 






4 




4 


4 




4 


4 


4 - 


4 






4 







Curiously similar rules have been described for Samoa. 1 

In the present example, three buffalo ( bos frontalis ) are sacrificed for the 
Khuang tsawi feast, and are cut up in the following manner (Fig. 1). 

The distribution is made within the limits of the kinship group (Fig. 2). 

Pa and nau receive three alu and three amifi (the heads to the closest 
relatives, and the joints to the moie distant). 

Farnu ngai get one akawng each. 

Hlam hlaw farnu get one ahnawi each. 

Nupu and papu share the pusa, or entrails. 

Rual (ritual friends) get one azang each. 

The assistants, the headman, the blacksmiths, and so on, get an equal 
portion from the distribution. 

These rules and those determining the distribution of the bride-price are 
not formally of the same type, but are organically connected. There are at 
least two indications of this. A man is always paired with one of his sisters 
who is called his ruang pawn farnu, ‘body-paired sister’, whose bride-price he 
receives, and whose husband’s nupu he becomes. On the other hand, the 
generosity expended in the feasts has the effect of raising the price which 
may be demanded for the marriage of the daughter. 2 

1 Buck, 1930, pp. 119-27. 

2 Stevenson, 1 937, pp. 22, 27. Other schemes for sharing may be found in ShirokogorofT, 
1935, p. 220, and L^vi-Strauss, 1948a, fig. 17. 



35 



The Universe of Rules 

The organized distribution of alimentary products was apparently formerly 
applied by the Kaffirs to vegetable foodstuffs and milk as well as to meat. 
But even today ‘the division of an ox upon the central place of the village, or 




Fig. 1. Ceremonial carving-up of a buffalo in Burma. (After Stevenson. 1937, 

p. 19.) 



t i i r 



o A 


0 = 


' A 




A = 


papu 


1 

nu 


pa 


A = 

pascu 
, — — 


i 

paseu 

"i i 



A 


O = A 


o 


0 


o e a 


r. 


o 


nupu 


nupi E 


farnu 


farnu 


farnu farnu nau 


nau farnu 


farnu 



upa nauta 


rawl- upa 


nauta rawl- 




suang 


suang 


v 


J V 


j 

Y 



farnu ngai hlam hlaw farnu 



Fig. 2. Distribution of meat among relatives. 

of the quarry slain in the hunt, must give young children a dramatic demon- 
stration of the functions of kinship, and of the series of reciprocal obligations 
so entailed.’ 1 The Thonga assign a hind-leg to the elder brother, a fore-leg 
to the younger brother, the other two limbs to the eldest sons, the heart and 

1 Richards, 1932, p. 79. Similarly, having recalled that any activity of an Australian tribe 
is founded on a network of personal relationships established on the basis of a genealogical 
system, RadclifTe-Brown, 1940, p. 7, adds: ‘When an Australian blackfellow goes hunting 
he provides meat, not only for himself, but for his wife and children and also for other 





36 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

kidneys to the wives, the tail and the rump to the relatives-in-law, and a piece 
of the loirs to the maternal uncle. In certain regions of East Africa, the rules 
are infinitely more complicated since they vary for oxen, sheep or goats. 
In addition to the relatives, the headman and those who helped in getting the 
beast have the right to a portion. This distribution is made less ostensibly than 
the division in the village square whose end is ‘that those who are eating, and 
those who are not, may be seen’. 1 Authority within the family is in fact 
based on ‘the possession and control of food’. 2 

Finally, the same observer’s description of the division of a great antelope 
among twenty-two adults and forty-seven children must be quoted : 

‘During the division of the animal the excitement was intense . . . Before 
the meal there was a buzz of expectation. Women ground extra flour with 
enthusiasm, “Because we have so much meat to eat with it’’ . . . Directly 
after the meal the women gathered near me talking in loud voices. They 
kept describing with ecstasy how full they felt . . . Another old lady cried 
light-heartedly, hitting her stomach, “I have been turned into a young 
girl again, my heart is so light . . . ” ’ 3 

For some years we have doubtless become more aware of the dramatic 
import of such situations. In any case, the reader inclined to appraise them 
in the perspective of our traditional culture, which likes to contrast the 
pathos of unhappy love and the comedy of the full stomach, cannot be too 
carefully forewarned. In the great majority of human societies, the two pro- 
blems are set on the same plane, since, with love as with food, nature presents 
man with the same risk. The lot of the satiated man is just as liable to excite 
emotion, and is just as much an excuse for lyrical expression, as the lot of the 
loved man. Moreover, primitive experience asserts the continuity between 
organic sensations and spiritual experiences. Food is completely riddled with 
signs and dangers. ‘Warmth’ can be the common denominator of states 
as different for us as anger, love, or repletion. Repletion, in its turn, hinders 
communications with the supernatural world. 4 

There is no need to call upon the matrimonial vocabulary of Great Russia, 
where the groom was called the ‘merchant’ and the bride, the ‘merchandise’ 5 
for the likening of women to commodities, not only scarce but essential to 
the life of the group, to be acknowledged. The comparison seems less shock- 
ing if Richards’s analyses of the systems of psycho-physiological equivalences 
in native thought are kept in mind: ‘Food is the source of some of his most 

1 Richards, 1932, p. 80. 2 ibid. p. 81. 

3 ibid. 1939, pp. 55-9. 4 ibid. 1932, p. 162. 

5 Kowalewsky, 1 890 b, p. 480. The same symbolism is to be found among the Christians of 
Mosul where the marriage proposal is stylized: ‘Have you any merchandise to sell us? . . . 
Upon my word, yours is excellent merchandise! We shall buy it.’ Kyriakos, 1911, p. 775. 

relatives to whom it is his duty to give meat when he has it.’ Elkin, 1934, p. 9, uses much 
the same terms: ‘Kinship rules also lie at the basis of the distribution of gifts; this explains 
why a native shares his earnings with others.’ 




The Universe of Rules 37 

intense emotions, provides the basis for some of his most abstract ideas* 
and the metaphors of his religious life ... To the primitive man it may come 
to symbolize some of his highest spiritual experiences, and express his most 
significant social ties.’ 1 

Let us first examine the feature of growing scarcity. There is a biological 
equilibrium between male and female births. Consequently, except in societies 
where this equilibrium is modified by customs, every male should have a 
very good chance of obtaining a wife. In such circumstances, is it possible to 
speak of women as a scarce commodity requiring collective intervention for 
its distribution? It is difficult to answer this question without posing the 
problem of polygamy, any discussion of which would go too far beyond 
the bounds of this work. We shall confine ourselves, therefore, to a few rapid 
considerations which will be less a demonstration than a brief indication of 
what seems to be the soundest position in this matter. For some years, the 
attention of anthropologists, especially those attracted by the diffusionist 
interpretation, has been drawn to the fact that monogamy seems to predom- 
inate in those societies which otherwise appear to be at the most primitive 
economic and technical level. From this and similar observations, these 
anthropologists have drawn more or less hazardous conclusions. According 
to Father Schmidt and his students, these facts must be seen as the sign of 
man’s greater purity in the archaic stages of his social existence. According to 
Perry and Elliot Smith, they attest to the existence of a sort of Golden Age 
before the discovery of civilization. We believe that each author observed the 
facts correctly, but that there is a different conclusion to be drawn. At these 
archaic levels, it is the difficulties of daily existence, and the obstacle they 
present to the formation of economic privileges (which, in more highly evolved 
societies, are easily recognized as still providing the substructure of poly- 
gamy), which limit the cornering of women for the benefit of a few. Purity of 
soul, in the Vienna School sense, is never a factor in what might more readily 
be called a form of abortive polygamy rather than monogamy, for, in these 
societies as well as in those which favourably sanction polygamous unions, 
and in our own, the tendency is towards a multiplicity of wives. It was earlier 
indicated that the contradictory nature of the information about the sexual 
habits of the great apes does not allow any resolution, on the animal plane, of 
the problem of whether polygamous tendencies are innate or acquired. Social 
and biological observation combine to suggest that, in man, these tendencies 
are natural and universal, and that only limitations born of the environment 
and culture are responsible for their suppression. 2 Consequently, to our eyes, 
monogamy is not a positive institution, but merely incorporates the limit of 
polygamy in societies where, for highly varied reasons, economic and sexual 
competition reaches an acute form. The very small degree of social unity 
in the most primitive societies accounts very well for these particular 
characteristics. 

1 Richards, 1932, pp. 173-4. 



2 Miller, 1931, p. 392. 




38 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

Even in these societies, moreover, monogamy is not a general rule. The 
Nambikwara, semi-nomads of western Brazil, who live for most of the year 
by collecting and gathering, sanction polygamy for their headmen and sor- 
cerers. The securing of two, three or four wives by one or two important 
persons in a band of sometimes less than twenty people necessarily obliges 
their companions to be celibate. This privilege by itself is sufficient to upset 
the natural equilibrium of the sexes, since male adolescents occasionally can 
no longer find wives available from among the women of their own generation. 
Whatever the solution given to the problem - homosexuality among the 
Nambikwara, fraternal polyandry among their northern neighbours, the 
Tupl-Cawahib - the growing scarcity of wives does not appear less serious 
a problem in a society however predominately monogamous it might be. 1 
But even in a strictly monogamous society, the considerations of the previous 
paragraph still retain their validity. This deep polygamous tendency, which 
exists among all men, always makes the number of available women seem 
insufficient. Let us add that, even if there were as many women as men, these 
women would not all be equally desirable -giving this term a broader meaning 
than its usual erotic connotation - and that, by definition (as Hume has 
judiciously remarked in a celebrated essay 2 ), the most desirable women 
must form a minority. Hence, the demand for women is in actual fact, or to 
all intents and purposes, always in a state of disequilibrium and tension. 

Considerations drawn exclusively from the study of relations between the 
sexes in our society could not reveal the truly tragic nature of this disequili- 
brium in primitive societies. Its sexual implications are secondary. Indeed, 
primitive society, even more than our own, provides many ways of overcoming 
this aspect of the problem. Homosexuality in some groups, polyandry and 
wife-lending in others, and finally, almost everywhere, the extreme freedom 
of premarital relations would prevent adolescents from experiencing any 
discomfort while waiting for a wife, if the wife’s function were limited to 
sexual gratification. But, as often noted, in most primitive societies (and also, 
but to a lesser extent, in the rural classes of our own society) marriage is of 
an entirely different importance, not erotic, but economic. In our society, 
the difference between the economic status of the married man and the un- 
married man amounts almost solely to the fact that the bachelor has to 
replace his wardrobe more frequently. The situation is altogether different 
in groups where the satisfaction of economic needs rests wholly on the con- 
jugal society and the division of labour between the sexes. Not only do man 
and wife have different technical specializations, one depending on the 
other for the manufacture of objects necessary for their daily tasks, but 
they are each employed in producing different foodstuffs. Accordingly, a 
complete, and above all regular, food supply indeed depends on that ‘pro- 

1 Levi-Strauss, 1948a, and 1948ft. 

2 Hume, 1886, p. 154. Likewise, ‘If all were excellent here below, then there would be 
nothing excellent’, Diderot, 1935, p. 199. 




The Universe of Rules 39 

duction cooperative’, the household. The Pygmies, who consider women and 
children as the most valuable of the active part of the family group, say that 
‘the more women available the more food’. 1 Likewise, Hottentot women, 
during the marriage ceremony, chorus the praise of the groom and of the 
men who, like him, are looking for a wife, ‘since today they have enough to 
eat’. 2 

It would be almost impossible for an individual by himself to survive, 
especially at the most primitive levels, where hunting and gardening, as well 
as collecting and gathering, are made hazardous by the harshness of the geo- 
graphical environment and the rudimentary nature of techniques. One of 
the deepest impressions which I retain from my first experiences in the field 
was the sight, in a central Brazilian native village, of a young man crouching 
for hours upon end in the corner of a hut, dismal, ill-cared for, fearfully thin, 
and seemingly in the most complete state of dejection. I observed him for 
several days. He rarely went out, except to go hunting by himself, and when 
the family meals began around the fires, he would as often as not have gone 
without if a female relative had not occasionally set a little food at his side, 
which he ate in silence. Intrigued by this strange fate, 1 finally asked who 
this person was, thinking that he suffered from some serious illness; my 
suppositions were laughed at and I was told, ‘He is a bachelor.' This was 
indeed the sole reason for the apparent curse. This example could be multi- 
plied many times. Denied food after bad hunting or fishing expeditions when 
the fruits of the women's collecting and gathering, and sometimes their 
gardening, provide the only meal there is, the wretched bachelor is a character- 
istic sight in native society. But the actual victim is not the only person 
involved in this scarcely tolerable situation. The relatives or friends on whom he 
depends in such cases for his subsistence are testy in suffering his mute anxiety, 
for, from the combined efforts of both husband and wife, a family often 
barely derives enough to avoid death by starvation. Hence, in such societies it 
is no exaggeration to say that marriage is of vital importance for every 
individual, being, as he is, doubly concerned, not only to find a wife for 
himself but also to prevent those two calamities of primitive society from 
occurring in his group, namely, the bachelor and the orphan. 

We apologize for amassing a number of quotations and comments here, 
but it is essential to illustrate if not the generality of these attitudes, which 
doubtless no one would contest, then rather the vehemence and conviction 
of their expression in primitive thought everywhere. ‘Among these Indians’, 
write Colbacchini and Albisetti of the Bororo, where the observation con- 
tained in the previous paragraph was made, ‘celibacy does not exist, and it is 
not even imagined, for its possibility would never be admitted.’ 3 Likewise, 
Schebesta says, ‘the Pygmy despises and jeers at bachelors as abnormal 
creatures.’ 4 Radcliffe-Brown notes : ‘One man was mentioned to me as being a 



1 Schebesta, 1933, p. 128 and 1936, pp. 138-9. 
3 Colbacchini and Albisetti, 1942, p. 51. 



2 Schapera, 1 930, p. 247. 

4 Schebesta, 1936, p. 138. 




40 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

bad man because he refused to take a wife after he had reached the age when 
it is considered proper for a man to marry .' 1 In New Guinea, ‘The economic 
system, the traditional partition of labour between man and woman, make a 
community of life between the sexes a necessity. Indeed, all persons attain 
that state except cripples .’ 2 ‘With the Reindeer Chukchee, no man can live 
a tolerable life without a separate house of his own and a woman to take care 
of it ... A man full-grown and unmarried is despised by the people, and in 
reality is looked upon as a good-for-nothing, a lounger, a tramp, idly wander- 
ing from camp to camp ’. 3 

Gilhodes says of the Kachin of Burma: 

‘As to voluntary celibacy, they seem not to have even the idea of it. It is a 
glory for every Kachin to marry and to have children, and a shame to die 
without posterity. You find nevertheless some rare old boys or old spin- 
sters; but nearly always they are half-witted people or of an impossible 
temper, and at their death they are given a ridiculous burial .' 4 

Again: 

‘Some rare cases, however, are found of old bachelors and old spinsters. 
In their lifetime they are ashamed of their condition and at their death 
they inspire fear chiefly to the young . . . Young men and young girls, for 
fear of not being able to settle themselves in the future, take no part . . . 
in the funeral meals; the ceremonies are chiefly done by the old men and 
women and in a somewhat ridiculous manner . . . The dances are done 
inside out .’ 5 

Let us conclude this brief survey with a report from the Orient. ‘ “If a 
man has no wife, there will be no Paradise for him hereafter and no Paradise 
on earth’’ ... If woman had not been created, there would have been no sun 
and no moon, no agriculture and no fire .’ 6 Like the eastern Jews and the 
ancient Babylonians, the Mandaeans make celibacy a sin . 7 The unmarried of 
both sexes (and particularly monks and nuns) are given up defenceless to 
the dealings of demons ‘and so [evil] spirits and goblins proceed from them 
which plague mankind ’. 8 The Navaho Indians share the same theory. Even 
in the first three of the inferior Four Worlds, the distinction of the sexes 
and their relationships is maintained, so difficult do the natives find it to 
imagine a form of existence, be it the lowest and most miserable, which did 
not possess this benefit. But the sexes are separated in the fourth world, and 
monsters are the fruit of the masturbation to which each sex is reduced . 9 

There are no doubt several exceptions to this general attitude. Celibacy 
seems to be of some frequency in Polynesia , 10 perhaps because in this part of 

1 Radclifle- Brown, 1933, pp. 50-1. 2 Thurnwald, 1916, pp. 383-4. 

3 Bogoras, 1904-9, p. 569. 4 Gilhodes, 1922, p. 225. 

5 ibid. p. 277. 6 Drower, 1937, p. 59. 7 ibid. p. 17. 

8 ibid. p. 65. 9 Reichard, n.d., p. 662. 10 Firth, 1936, passim. 




41 



The Universe of Rules 

the world the production of food is not a critical problem. Elsewhere, as 
among the Karen of Burma and the Tungus , 1 it is rather a consequence of the 
rigour with which these people apply their rules of exogamy. When the pre- 
scribed spouse is subject to a strict determination, marriage becomes impos- 
sible without there being a relative in exactly the required position. In this 
last case at least, the exception proves the rule. 

What would happen, then, if the principle of collective intervention ex- 
pressed purely formally by the rule prohibiting incest - without regard to 
particular circumstances - did not exist? It might be expected that privileges 
would arise in that natural aggregation called the family, by reason of the 
greater intimacy of its inter-individual contacts, and by the lack of any social 
rule tending to limit this family and to establish equilibrium in it. We are 
not suggesting that every family would automatically maintain a monopoly 
of its women. This would be to assert the institutional priority of the family 
over the group, a supposition far from our mind. We merely postulate, with- 
out posing the question of the historical precedence of the one over the other, 
that the specific viscosity of the family aggregation would act in this direction, 
and that the combined results would confirm this action. As has been shown, 
such an eventuality is incompatible with the vital demands not only of 
primitive society but of society in general. 

1 Bogoras, 1904-9, p. 570; Frazer, 1919, vol. II, p. 138. 




CHAPTER IV 



Endogamy and Exogamy 

I 

By establishing a general rule of obedience, whatever this rule may be, the 
group asserts its jural authority over what it legitimately considers an essen- 
tial valuable. It refuses to sanction the natural inequality of the distribution 
of the sexes within the family, and on the only possible basis it institutes 
freedom of access for every individual to the women of the group. This basis 
is, in short, that neither fraternity nor paternity can be put forward as claims 
to a wife, but that the sole validity of these claims lies in the fact that all men 
are in equal competition for all women, their respective relationships being 
defined in terms of the group, and not the family. 

This rule also has advantages for individuals, since, by obliging them to 
renounce a limited or very restricted share in the women immediately avail- 
able, it gives everybody a claim to a number of women whose availability, it is 
true, is checked by the demands of custom, but a number which theoretically 
is as large as possible and is the same for everyone. If it is objected that such 
reasoning is too abstract and artificial to have occurred at a very primitive 
human level, it is sufficient to note that the result, which is all that counts, 
does not suppose any formal reasoning but simply the spontaneous resolu- 
tion of those psycho-social pressures which are the immediate facts of col- 
lective life. In non-crystallized forms of social life, such as communities 
arising spontaneously out of accidental circumstances (bombardments, earth- 
quakes, concentration camps, children’s gangs, and so on), which still await 
psychological investigation - and are so rich in both elemental and universal 
processes - it is soon learnt that the perception of another’s envy, the fear of 
violent dispossession, the distress resulting from collective hostility, and so 
on, can wholly inhibit the enjoyment of a privilege. The renunciation of a 
privilege need not be explained by the intervention of authority, nor as being 
calculated, but may be merely the resolution of an emotional conflict, the 
pattern of which has already been observed in the animal kingdom . 1 

Even when thus corrected, this method of posing the problem remains 

1 Zuckerman, 1932; Kohler, 1928, p. 88 et seq., 300-2; Yerkes, 1935, ch. 21 ; Nissen and 
Crawford, 1936, pp. 383-419. 



42 




Endogamy and Exogamy 43 

approximate and provisional. We shall have an opportunity to specify 
and elaborate upon it later. However, even in this approximate form, it is 
sufficient to show that there is no need to assume an apprenticeship of thou- 
sands of years to understand that in the course of history savage peoples 
have clearly and constantly been faced with the simple and brutal choice, 
powerfully expressed by Tylor, ‘between marrying-out and being killed out’. 1 

But for the demonstration to be effective, it must extend to every member 
of the group. It is this condition, in a most developed form, of which the 
prohibition of incest provides the ineluctable expression. Marriage is an 
eternal triangle, not just in vaudeville sketches, but at all times, and in all 
places, and by definition. Because women have an essential value in group 
life, the group necessarily intervenes in every marriage. It does this in two 
ways: firstly in the form of the ‘rival’, who, through the agency of the group, 
asserts that he had the same right of access as the husband, a right upon 
which the union is conditional and which must be shown to have been 
respected; and secondly through the group as a group, which asserts that 
the relationship which makes the marriage possible must be social, that is, 
defined in group terms and not in the natural terms having all the conse- 
quences incompatible with collective life which have already been indicated. 
Considered in its purely formal aspect, the prohibition of incest is thus 
only the group’s assertion that where relationships between the sexes are 
concerned, a person cannot do just what he pleases. The positive aspect of the 
prohibition is to initiate organization. 

Doubtless the objection will be made that in no way does the prohibition 
of incest fulfil any organizing function. Is it not true that in certain areas of 
Australia and Melanesia this prohibition is adapted to a virtual monopoly 
of the women by the old men, and, more generally, to polygamy, the results 
of which we ourselves have emphasized ? 

But these ‘advantages’, if one wishes to see them as such, are not unilateral, 
for, on the contrary, analysis shows that they always entail a positive count- 
erpart. Let us return to the example cited above of the Nambikwara chief 
who jeopardizes the demographic equilibrium of his little band by mono- 
polizing several women, who would normally have made as many monoga- 
mous wives for men of the following generation. It would be arbitrary to 
isolate the institution from its context. The chief of the band bears heavy 
responsibilities, since the group relies on him entirely to fix the itinerary for 
its nomadic life, to choose the camping places, to know every inch of the 
territory and the natural resources to be found there during each season, 
to determine the position and movement of hostile bands, to negotiate or 
fight with them, as the occasion arises, and finally, to organize sufficient 
reserves of arms and everyday objects so that everyone has what he needs. 
Without his polygamous wives, who are companions rather than wives, 
freed by their social status from the constraints of their sex, and always ready 

* Tylor, 1889, p. 267. 




44 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

to accompany and assist him in his reconnaissances, agricultural work or 
handicrafts, the chief could not face up to all his responsibilities. His plurality 
of wives, accordingly, is both the reward for and the instrument of power. 

Let us push the analysis a little further. If the 'Nambikwara had combined 
their rule of bilateral cross-cousin marriage 1 with a strict monogamy there 
would be a perfectly simple system of reciprocity, both quantitatively, 
since the system would guarantee roughly a wife for every man, and qualita- 
tively, since this general guarantee would result in a network of reciprocal 
obligations based on individual kinship relationships. But the polygamous 
privilege of the chief upsets this ideal formula. It results in an otherwise non- 
existent element of insecurity for every individual. Where, then, did this 
privilege originate, and what is its significance? By recognizing the privilege, 
the group has exchanged the elements of individual security which accompany 
the rule of monogamy for a collective security arising out of political organ- 
ization. Each man receives the daughter or the sister of another man as his 
wife. The chief receives several wives from the group. In exchange, he gives 
a guarantee against want and danger, certainly not to the particular individuals 
whose sisters or daughters he has married, and not even to those perhaps 
condemned for ever to celibacy by the exercise of his polygamous right, but 
to the group as a group, for it is the latter which has suspended the common 
law in his favour . 2 

Polygamy, therefore, does not run counter to the demand for an equitable 
distribution of women. It merely superimposes one rule of distribution upon 
another. In fact, monogamy and polygamy correspond to two types of comp- 
lementary relationship. On the one hand, there are the systems of presta- 
tions and counter-prestations which bind together the individual members 
of the group, and on the other hand, there are the systems of prestations 
and counter-prestations which bind together the group as a whole and its 
chief. This parallelism can become so transparent that in the Trobriand 
Islands, for example, the chief, who receives a wife from each of the sub- 
clans, is regarded as a sort of ‘universal brother-in-law'. Political allegiance 
and the presentation of tribute are no more than just a particular case of that 
special relationship which in this part of the world places the wife’s brother 
under obligation to his sister's husband . 3 

Besides, so far only the most summary aspect of the prohibition of incest 
has been considered, that is, from the viewpoint of a rule as a rule. Considered 
from this angle, the prohibition does not yet provide a solution to the 
problem. It is merely a preliminary measure, useless in itself, but necessary for 
future development. In short, the prohibition of incest asserts that natural 
distribution should not be the basis of social practice regarding women. 
What this basis should be still remains to be determined. To borrow an 
expression familiar to modern regulation (but eternal also in some ways) of 

1 For the definition of this marriage rule and its theoretical study, see below, ch. IX. 

2 L£vi-Strauss, 1944, pp. 16-32. 3 Malinowski, 1929, pp. 131-32. 




Endogamy and Exogamy 45 

the ‘scarce product’, the first logical end of the incest prohibition is ‘to freeze’ 
women within the family, so that their distribution, or the competition for 
them, is within the group, and under group and not private control. So far 
this has been the only aspect of the prohibition examined. But it can also be 
seen to be the one primordial aspect coextensive with the whole prohibition. 
Passing from the study of the rule as a rule to the study of its most general 
characteristics, it now has to be shown how the transition from an originally 
negative rule to a collection of entirely different stipulations was accomplished. 

11 

Considered as a prohibition, the prohibition of incest merely affirms, in a 
field vital to the group's survival, the pre-eminence of the social over the natu- 
ral, the collective over the individual, organization over the arbitrary. But 
even at this point in the analysis, the converse of this ostensibly negative rule 
has already appeared. When considered from this new point of view, the 
prohibition of incest appears so laden with positive modalities that this over- 
determination is itself an immediate problem. 

In point of fact, marriage rules do not always merely prohibit a kinship 
circle, but occasionally also fix one within which marriage must necessarily 
take place, under pain of the same scandal as would result if the prohibition 
itself were violated. There are two cases to be distinguished here: on the one 
hand endogamy, or the obligation to marry within an objectively defined 
group; and on the other, preferential union, or the obligation to choose as 
spouse an individual who is related to Ego in some particular way. It is 
difficult to make this distinction in classificatory kinship systems, for all 
individuals in a defined kinship relationship to each other, or to a given 
subject, fall into one class, and consequently it is possible to pass from pre- 
ferential union to endogamy, properly so called, without any marked change. 
Any system of marriage between cross-cousins could thus be interpreted as 
endogamous if all the parallel cousins were designated by one term, and all 
the cross-cousins by another. This double appellation could hold good even 
after the disappearance of the marriage system considered, and consequently 
an exogamous system par excellence would make way for a new system, which, 
on the contrary, would offer all the appearances of endogamy. This artificial 
conversion of genuine exogamous systems into ostensibly endogamous sys- 
tems may be seen in the field, and the difficulties it raises in the interpretation 
of certain Australian systems will be seen later . 1 

It is advisable then to distinguish between two different types of endogamy. 
One is merely the reverse of a rule of exogamy and is explicable only in terms 
of this rule ; the other - or true endogamy - is not an aspect of exogamy but 
is always found along with the latter, although not in the same regard, but 
simply in connexion with it. From this point of view, any society is both 

1 cf. ch. XIII. 




46 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

exogamous and endogamous. Thus among the Australian aborigines the clan 
is exogamous, but the tribe is endogamous, while modern American society 
combines a family exogamy, which is rigid for the first degree but flexible for 
the second or third degrees onwards, with a racial endogamy, which is rigid 
or flexible according to the particular State. 1 But contrary to the hypothesis 
examined above, endogamy and exogamy are not here complementary insti- 
tutions and they could appear symmetrical only from a formal point of view. 
True endogamy is merely the refusal to recognize the possibility of marriage 
beyond the limits of the human community. The definitions of this commun- 
ity are many and varied, depending on the philosophy of the group considered. 
A very great number of primitive tribes simply refer to themselves by the 
term for ‘men' in their language, showing that in their eyes an essential 
characteristic of man disappears outside the limits of the group. Thus the 
Eskimoes of Norton Sound describe themselves exclusively as the ‘excellent 
people’, or more exactly as the ‘complete people’, and reserve the epithet 
‘nit’ to describe neighbouring peoples. 2 The generality of the attitude lends 
some colour of truth to Gobineau's hypothesis, according to which the 
proliferation of the fantastic beings of folklore - dwarfs, giants, monsters, 
and so on - is to be explained less by a rich imagination than by the inability 
of fellow-citizens to conceive of strangers in the same way as themselves. 
Certain Brazilian tribes identified the first black slaves imported to America 
as ‘earth monkeys’, in comparison with the arboreal species which was the 
only kind known to them. When certain Melanesian peoples were asked for 
the first time who they were, they replied: ‘ “Men,” meaning that they were 
not demons or ghosts, but living men ; and they did so because they did not 
believe their visitors to be men, but rather ghosts themselves, or demons, or 
spirits belonging to the sea.’ 3 On their arrival in the New Hebrides, the Euro- 
peans were at first taken to be ghosts, and were so named. Their clothes were 
called ‘ghost skins’ and their cats ‘the ghosts’ rats’. 4 L6vy-Bruhl has collected 
other accounts of no less significance, such as horses taken for their riders’ 
mothers, since they carried them on their backs, in contrast with mission- 
aries who were called lions, because of their fair beards, and so on. 5 

In all these cases, it is merely a question of knowing how far to extend 
the logical connotation of the idea of community, which is itself dependent 
upon the effective solidarity of the group. In Dobu, the white man is consid- 
ered as ‘another kind’, not really a human being in the native sense of the 
word, but as a being with different qualities. These differences, however, do 
not extend to yams, which are regarded as people. The order of affinities is 
therefore: the native group, tomot ; yams, which reproduce in the same way 
as the group and allow the group to survive ; and finally, white men, who are 
set completely outside the community. All this is because the group’s conti- 
nuity depends on the continuity of the vegetable lines. There are masculine 

1 Johnson, 1943. 2 Rink, 1887, p. 333. 3 Codrington, 1891, p. 21. 

4 Deacon, 1934, p. 637; Radcliffe-Brown, 1933, p. 138. 5 L6vy-Bruhl, 1935, pp. 59 -60. 




Endogamy and Exogamy 47 

and feminine gardens, each descended from ancestral seed, hereditarily 
transmitted from the mother’s brother to the sister’s son or daughter. If a 
‘race’ of seeds is lost, the human line is in jeopardy, for the woman will not 
find a husband, nor will she raise children to succeed to her miserable in- 
heritance and share the contempt attached to her destitution. A person 
deprived of his hereditary seeds cannot count upon charity, nor upon grain 
borrowed from outside: ‘I knew of several women in this position. They were 
thieves, or fishers, sago workers and beggars.’ 1 Thus yams are real persons, 
for to be without them is to be orphaned. When all is said and done, the 
economic and social structure of the group does justify the restrictive defini- 
tion of itself as a community of tubers and cultivators. But let us not be 
deceived. The strict endogamy of the Mormons is based on formally analogous 
considerations, even although they are spiritual. If a girl cannot find a partner 
possessing the true faith, it is better for her to marry her father, for it is the 
possession of this faith which is the prime essential in their definition of a 
human being. 2 

Similar distinctions are found also in groups in which rank and fortune 
are rated highly. But in all these cases, endogamy is merely the expression of 
a conceptual limit and of a negative reality. It is only in the exceptional case 
of highly differentiated societies that this negative form can take on a posi- 
tive aspect, viz., as a deliberate calculation to maintain certain social or 
economic privileges within the group. Yet this situation is still more the 
result of a concept of endogamy than its locus of origin. Generally, ‘true’ 
endogamy simply represents the exclusion of marriage outside the culture, 
which itself is conceived of in all sorts of ways, sometimes narrowly, some- 
times broadly. The apparently positive formula of being obliged to marry 
within a group defined by certain concrete characteristics (such as name, 
language, race, religion, and so on) thus merely expresses a limit, socially 
conditioned, to the capacity for generalization. Beyond the precise forms 
just alluded to, the expression of the formula in our society is diffuse, since 
the proportion of marriages between cousins is known to be greater in general 
than would be the case if marriage were contracted at random. 3 

By contrast, the other form of endogamy previously distinguished might be 
called ‘functional endogamy', since it is only a function of exogamy, or the 
counterpart of a negative rule. In cross-cousin marriage, for example, the 
class of possible spouses is never an exogamous category, in spite of the 
appearances emphasized earlier. Cross-cousins are not so much relatives who 
must intermarry, as they are the first persons among relatives between whom 
marriage is possible once parallel cousins are classified as brothers and 
sisters. This vital characteristic has often been misunderstood, for in certain 
cases cross-cousin marriage is not only sanctioned but obligatory. When 

1 Fortune, 1932, pp. 69-74, 102. 

2 ‘Dcr sexuclle Anteil an der Theologie der Mormonen’, 1914. 

3 Hogben, 1931, p. 152. 




48 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

possible it is obligatory because it provides the simplest conceivable system 
of reciprocity. Indeed, we shall attempt to show later that cross-cousin 
marriage is essentially a system of exchange. But whereas, in this case, only 
two marriages are required to maintain the equilibrium, a more complex and 
consequently more brittle cycle becomes necessary, with less likelihood of 
the desired result, when the kinship relationship between the spouses be- 
comes more distant. Marriage between outsiders is a social advance (because 
it integrates wider groups). It is also a venture. But the best proof that the 
class of marriageable cross-cousins is determined simply by eliminating the 
class that is forbidden (so that endogamy here is clearly a function of exo- 
gamy, and not the contrary), is that there is no trouble if a potential spouse of 
the required degree of cousinhood is missing, for a more distant relative can 
be substituted. The category of possible spouses in a system of preferential 
marriage is never closed, for what is not prohibited is permitted, though 
sometimes only in a certain order and to a certain extent. Moreover, this 
preference is explained by the mechanism of exchanges proper to the system 
considered, and not by the privileged nature of a group or class. 

The difference between the two forms of endogamy is particularly easy to 
make when the marriage rules of strongly hierarchical societies are studied. 
‘True’ endogamy is all the more marked when the social class practising it 
occupies a higher rank, as in ancient Peru, the Hawaiian Islands and certain 
African tribes. By contrast, it is ‘functional endogamy’ whenever the relation- 
ship is inversed, that is, when the apparent endogamy steadily diminishes as 
one rises in the hierarchy. The Kenyah and the Kayan of Borneo are divided 
into three unequally privileged classes, and while these are normally endo- 
gamous, the highest class is subject to village exogamy. 1 Thus, as in New 
Zealand and Burma, exogamy is specified at the top of the social hierarchy, 
and is a function of the obligation of feudal families to maintain and widen 
their alliances. The endogamy of the lower classes is one of indifference, 
and not of discrimination. 

Finally the case must be considered where preferential union is not directly 
determined by a relation of kinship but by the membership of a clan or a 
marriage class. Here, there are constituted groups, and would it not appear 
that marriage obligations which pair these groups off one with another are 
equivalent to forming ‘true’ endogamous categories, each consisting of two 
clans or classes practising intermarriage? But in reality, things are less dif- 
ferent than they seem. The classes and the sub-classes of the Australian 
aborigines are not so much groups defined in extension as positions which 
are alternately or successively occupied by the members of one line of descent 
or by the partners in an alliance. Among the Bororo Indians, whom I studied 
in 1936, the situation is less clear, for marriage preferences seem to make a 
direct pairing of the clans and not the classes. But then it is the very tempor- 
ariness of these clans, their presence in one village, their absence in another, 

1 Hose and McDougall, 1912, vol. I, pp. 71, 74. 




Endogamy and Exogamy 49 

and their possible division or subdivision into sub-clans, which enables them 
to elude the fixity and strict delimitation of endogamous categories. One is 
tempted to see the clan preferences not as an outline of ‘true’ endogamy but 
simply as a technique of adjustment to ensure matrimonial equilibrium in 
the group, the clan itself continually changing to suit the demands of this 
equilibrium. 1 

The correlation between the concepts of endogamy and exogamy emerges 
elsewhere, and particularly clearly in the neighbouring example of the Apinay6 
Indians. These are divided into four exogamous groups, or kiye, united by a 
system of preferential marriage, so that a man of A marries a woman of B, 
a man of B marries a woman of C, and man of C marries a woman of D , 
and a man of D marries a woman of A . This appears to be what is later 
described as a simple system of generalized exchange, 2 except that here the 
rule of descent makes the system static, with the first result that it excludes 
cousins from the number of possible spouses. With regard to the kiye, 
boys succeed to their fathers' status, and girls to their mothers’. Hence, 
men of A and women of B are all descended from marriages between men of 
A and women of B ; men of B and women of C are all descended from marri- 
ages between men of B and women of C; and so on. The apparent division into 
four exogamous groups thus conceals a division into four endogamous groups, 
viz., men of A and women of B, these being related to each other, men of B 
and women of C, these being related, men of C and women of D, these 
being related, and men of D and women of A, these also being related to 
each other. By contrast, there is no relation of kinship between the two groups, 
one of male kin, the other of female kin, which go into the formation of the 
kiyd . 3 Unlike Lowie, 4 we believe that this system is not exceptional, but is 
merely a particular application of a general formula, which will be studied 
in another work, and which is more typical than it would seem. 5 We confine 
ourselves here to this brief description, which is sufficient to show in a 
precise case that exogamous and endogamous categories have no objective 
existence as independent entities. Rather, they must be considered as \iew- 
points, or different but solidary perspectives, on a system of fundamental 
relationships in which each term is defined by its position within the system. 



1 L6vi-Strauss, 1936. 2 cf. ch. XII. 

3 Nimuendaju, 1939, p. 29 et. seq. Our interpretation is in agreement with those of 
Henry, 1940 and Kroeber, 1942. 4 Lowie, 1940, p. 468. 

5 Williams, 1932, pp. 15-81 ; and chs. XXVI and XXVIII of this work. Maybury-Lewis, 
1960, p. 196, refers to the above sentence as a ‘startlingly specific remark’, because, he 
says, it does not take into consideration the difference between ‘descent’ and ‘filiation’. 
Is there any need to emphasize that this book is concerned exclusively with models and not 
with empirical realities? It is only in connexion with the latter that this distinction, rightly 
criticized by Leach in his controversy with Fortes, can be said to have any meaning. With 
all due respect to Maybury-Lewis, Williams - almost thirty years before him - had fully 
isolated from the Melanesian data the theoretical principle of ‘parallel descent’ as it exists 
among the Apinayd, writing, in the article cited above: ‘The essence of [sex affiliation] 
is that male children are classed with their father's group and female children with their 
mother’s.’ Williams, 1932, p. 51. 




50 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

Furthermore, in certain cases the relative reciprocity of endogamous and 
exogamous relationships already appears in the vocabulary. For example, 
the Ifugao term for ‘relative-in-law’, aidu, corresponds to a root found in 
every area of Indonesia with the original meaning of ‘the other group’ or 
‘outsiders’, and the derivative meanings of ‘enemy’ or ‘relative by marriage’. 
Likewise, in other Malay languages, tulang, ‘all kin of the same generation’ 
as Ego, comes to mean, on the one hand, ‘aborigines’ (Formosa, Buginese), 
‘brother and sister’, ‘sister’, ‘woman’, and on the other, ‘relative-in-law’, 
or ‘spouse’. 1 Compare this with the Japanese imo which sometimes designates 
the sister and sometimes the wife. 2 May we assert, as do Barton and Chamber- 
lain, that the ambivalence of certain ancient terms bears witness to the former 
existence of consanguineous marriages? The hypothesis does not seem im- 
probable when it is noted, as above, that ancient Japanese texts, by limiting 
the definition of incest to marriage with the younger sister, would seem to 
legitimatize marriage with the older sister, as in Egypt and Samoa. The pre- 
ference for marriage with the matrilateral cousin among the Batak and in 
other regions of Indonesia, and indications that the same system formerly 
existed in Japan, 3 would suggest another interpretation, while not, however, 
excluding the previous one. Although referred to by the same term, women 
of Ego's generation would be distinguished as to whether they were possible 
or prohibited spouses. In this regard it will be noted that in the vocabulary 
of the Batak, the term tulang is applied by a man to the mother’s brother 
and to the latter’s daughter, who is the preferred spouse, while a woman 
addresses outsiders as ‘father’s sister', or as ‘mother’s brother’, 4 that is, the 
names given respectively to the clanswoman who marries elsewhere, or to the 
uncle whose sons a woman cannot marry. 

If the most general meaning of aidu is ‘stranger’, and if its derived meanings 
are ‘affine’ and ‘enemy’, it is clearly obvious that these last two meanings are 
two distinct modalities of, or more exactly two ways of looking at, the same 
reality. Among the ‘other groups’ some are my affines, others are my enemies. 
They are both enemy and affine at the same time, but not for the same person. 
This relativist interpretation, which is clear in this particular case, can also 
be easily applied to the former without resorting to the hypothesis of a former 
marriage with the sister. It is sufficient to consider that, starting from the 
general meaning of tulang as ‘girls of my generation’, the latter are either 
‘sisters’ or ‘wives’. Just as a group of ‘affines’ is at the same time ‘someone’s 
enemy’, a ‘married woman’ must necessarily have been, for me to have 
married her, ‘someone’s sister’. 

Thus we have distinguished a ‘true’ endogamy, which is a class endogamy 
(in the logical sense, but in many of the societies practising it, in the social 
sense of the term class as well), and a functional endogamy, which might be 
called endogamy of relation, since it is merely the counterpart or positive 

1 Barton, 1941, pp. 540-9. 2 Chamberlain, 1932. 3 cf, ch. XXVII. 

4 Loeb, 1933, pp. 22, 25. 




Endogamy and Exogamy 5 1 

expression of exogamy and expresses the apparently negative nature of the 
latter. 

But, as we have emphasized at the beginning of this chapter, complementary 
endogamy merely serves to recall to mind that the negative aspect is only the 
superficial aspect of the prohibition. A group within which marriage is 
prohibited immediately conjures up the idea of another group, with clearly 
defined features (the prohibition of incest joined with an exogamous system), 
or vague characteristics (simple prohibition without exogamy), with which 
marriage is merely possible, or inevitable, according to circumstances. The 
prohibition on the sexual use of a daughter or a sister compels them to be 
given in marriage to another man, and at the same time it establishes a right 
to the daughter or sister of this other man. In this way, every negative stipula- 
tion of the prohibition has its positive counterpart. The prohibition is tanta- 
mount to an obligation, and renunciation gives rise to a counter-claim. It 
can now be seen how impossible it is to consider exogamy and endogamy as 
institutions of the same type, as is often done. This is true only for what has 
been called functional endogamy, which is none other than exogamy itself 
seen in terms of its consequences. The comparison is only possible on condi- 
tion that ‘true’ endogamy, a passive principle of limitation incapable of 
development, is excluded. By contrast, the analysis of the notion of exogamy 
sufficiently shows its far-reaching effects. The prohibition of incest is not 
merely a prohibition, as the previous chapter suggested, because in prohibit- 
ing it also orders. Like exogamy, which is its widened social application, 
the prohibition of incest is a rule of reciprocity. The woman whom one does 
not take, and whom one may not take, is, for that very reason, offered up. 
To whom is she offered? Sometimes to a group defined by institutions, and 
sometimes to an indeterminate and ever-open collectivity limited only by the 
exclusion of near relatives, such as in our own society. But at this stage in the 
research I believe it possible to ignore the differences between the prohibition 
of incest and exogamy : in the light of the previous considerations, their formal 
characteristics are in effect identical. 

Furthermore, in the technical case of marriage ‘by exchange’ so-called, 
or in any other marriage system whatsoever, the result of the incest prohibi- 
tion is fundamentally the same, viz., that as soon as I am forbidden a woman, 
she thereby becomes available to another man, and somewhere else a man 
renounces a woman who thereby becomes available to me. The content ot 
the prohibition is not exhausted oy the fact of the prohibition : the latter is 
instituted only in order to guarantee and establish, directly or indirectly, 
immediately or mediately, an exchange. It is now for us to show how and why. 




CHAPTER V 



The Principle of Reciprocity 

I 

The conclusions of the famous Essai sur le Don are well known. In this study, 
which today is regarded as a classic, Mauss sought to show that exchange 
in primitive societies consists not so much in economic transactions as in 
reciprocal gifts, that these reciprocal gifts have a far more important func- 
tion in these societies than in our own, and that this primitive form of 
exchange is not merely nor essentially of an economic nature but is what he 
aptly calls ‘a total social fact’, that is, an event which has a significance that 
is at once social and religious, magic and economic, utilitarian and senti- 
mental, jural and moral. It is well known that in many primitive societies, 
particularly those of the Pacific Islands and the North-west Pacific coast of 
Canada and Alaska, every ceremony celebrating an important event is accom- 
panied by a distribution of wealth. Thus in New Zealand the ceremonial 
offering of clothes, jewellery, arms, food and various goods was a common 
feature of Maori social life. These gifts were made on the occasions of births, 
marriages, deaths, exhumations, peace treaties, crimes and misdemeanours 
‘and many other things too numerous to mention ’. 1 Similarly, Firth includes 
among ceremonial exchanges in Polynesia ‘birth, initiation, marriage, 
sickness, death and other social events, as well as much religious ritual ’. 2 In a 
more limited section of the same region, another observer cites betrothal, 
marriage, pregnancy, birth and death, and describes the presents offered by 
the young man’s father at the betrothal feast, viz., ten baskets of dried fish, 
ten thousand ripe and six thousand green coconuts, the young man himself 
receiving in exchange two cakes four feet square and six inches thick . 3 

These gifts are either exchanged immediately for equivalent gifts or are 
received by the beneficiaries on condition that at a later date they will give 
counter-gifts often exceeding the original goods in value, but which in their 
turn bring about a subsequent right to receive new gifts surpassing the 
original ones in sumptuousness. The most characteristic of these institutions 
is the potlatch of the Indians of Alaska and the Vancouver region. During 

* Best, 1929, p. 36. 2 Firth, 1939, p. 321. 

3 Hogbin, 1931a, p. 28. See also the astonishing figures collected by Firth, 1929, p. 317 
et seq. 



52 




The Principle of Reciprocity 53 

the potlatch considerable valuables are transferred in this way, sometimes 
amounting to several tens of thousands of rugs handed over in kind, or in the 
symbolical form of copper plaques whose face value increases in terms of the 
importance of the transactions in which they have figured. These ceremonies 
have a triple purpose, viz., to return gifts previously received, together with an 
appropriate amount of interest, sometimes as much as 100 per cent; to estab- 
lish publicly the claim of a family or social group to a title or prerogative, or 
to announce officially a change of status; finally, to surpass a rival in genero- 
sity, to crush him if possible with future obligations which it is hoped he 
cannot meet, so as to take from him his prerogatives, titles, rank, authority 
and prestige. 1 Doubtless the system of reciprocal gifts only reaches such vast 
proportions among the Indians of the North-west Pacific coast, virtuosi 
who display a genius and an exceptional aptitude for the treatment of the 
fundamental themes of primitive culture. But Mauss has been able to estab- 
lish the existence of analogous institutions in Melanesia and Polynesia. 
For example, it is certain that the main purpose of the feasts of several New 
Guinea tribes is to obtain recognition of a new pangua by an assembly of 
witnesses, 2 that is, the same function which, according to Barnett, is the 
fundamental basis of the Alaskan potlatch. The same author sees the desire 
to go one better than anyone else as a characteristic peculiar to Kwakiutl 
ceremonies, and regards the interest-bearing loan as a preliminary transaction 
to the potlatch , rather than as one of its modalities. 3 Doubtless there are local 
variations, but the various aspects of the institution form a whole found in a 
more or less systematized way in North and South America, Asia and Africa. 
It is a question of a universal mode of culture, although not everywhere 
equally developed. 

But it should also be stressed that this attitude of primitive thought to- 
wards the exchange of goods is not only expressed in clearly defined and 
localized institutions. It permeates every transaction, ritual or profane, in 
which objects or produce are given or received. Implicitly or explicitly, the 
double assumption is found everywhere that reciprocal gifts constitute a 
means - normal or privileged, depending on the group - of transferring 
goods, or certain goods, and that these gifts are not offered principally or 
essentially with the idea of receiving a profit or advantage of an economic 
nature. ‘On birth ceremonies,’ writes Turner of the refined Samoan culture, 
‘after receiving the oloa and the tonga , the “masculine” and “feminine” 
property, the husband and wife were left no richer than they were.' 4 

Hogbin remarks that neither partner acquires any real material benefit 
from such exchanges. 

‘Indeed, at times the gifts exchanged are of precisely the same kind. 

Thus a ball of sennit ceremonially presented may be returned by a similar 

1 Davy, 1922; Murdock, 1936, pp. 3-20; Barnett, 1938 b, pp. 349-58. 

2 See later, ch. VI. 3 Boas, 1897; Barnett, 19386, p. 351 et seq. 

4 Mauss, 1925, p. 42. 




54 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

ball of exactly the same size, presented with exactly the same ceremony. 
Or again, a parcel of food may be returned by another parcel of the same 
kind of food cooked according to the same recipe .’ 1 

On the southern coast of New Guinea, the natives make long voyages to 
participate in a transaction which from an economic viewpoint seems totally 
meaningless. They exchange live animals . 2 It is the same with the exchanges 
that accompany a Yukaghir marriage: relatives who have received a reindeer 
give a reindeer . 3 In fact, the exchange does not bring a tangible result such as 
is the case in commercial transactions in our own society. The profit is neither 
direct nor inherent in the things exchanged as in the case of monetary profit 
or consumer gain. Or rather it is not so according to our own conventions. 
In primitive thought there is clearly something else in what we call a ‘com- 
modity’ that makes it profitable to its owner or its trader. Goods are not 
only economic commodities, but vehicles and instruments for realities of 
another order, such as power, influence, sympathy, status and emotion; and 
the skilful game of exchange (in which there is very often no more real 
transfer than in a game of chess, in which the players do not give each other 
the pieces they alternately move forward on the chessboard but merely seek 
to provoke a counter-move), consists in a complex totality of conscious or 
unconscious manoeuvres in order to gain security and to guard oneself against 
risks brought about by alliances and by rivalries. 

Amundsen’s misadventures show the cost of losing the meaning of recipro- 
city. From the generous gifts that Amundsen gave the Eskimo, in return for 
their presents, they quickly concluded that it was to their advantage to offer 
all their goods as presents. It soon became necessary to decline any present 
and to resort to proper commerce . 4 Likewise, Holm states that an exchange 
with one native opens a general claim on the part of all the others to the same 
gift: ‘The natives explained that they always gave people everything they 
asked for .’ 5 But the true meaning of this statement must be specified: 

‘When a person wishes to start one of these [i.e., a pd-tukh-tuk ] he takes 
some article into the kashim [the men’s house] and gives it to the man 
with whom he wishes to trade, saying, at the same time, “It is a pd-tukh-tuk” 
The other is bound to receive it, and give in return some article of about 
equal value ; the first man then brings something else, and so they alternate, 
until sometimes two men will exchange nearly everything they originally 
possessed ; the man who received the first present being bound to continue 
until the originator wishes to stop .’ 6 

This passion for the gift, accompanied by the ritual obligation on the 
recipient to accept and to give, is found at the other end of the American 
continent, among the Yaghan . 7 

1 Hogbin, 1932, p. 13. 2 Williams, 1936, p. 137; Armstrong, 1920-1. 

3 Jochelson, 1910-26, p. 96. 4 Boas, 1897, p. 374. 3 Nelson, 1896-7, p. 309. 

6 ibid. 7 Gusinde, 1937, p. 980 et seq. 




The Principle of Reciprocity 



55 

Radclifle-Brown’s observation on gift exchange among one of the most 
primitive peoples known, the Andaman Islanders, answers the problem posed 
by Turner in the text quoted above, and which concerns a highly developed 
culture: ‘The purpose that it did serve was a moral one. The object of the 
exchange was to produce a friendly feeling between the two persons concer- 
ned .’ 1 The best proof of the supra-economic nature of these exchanges is 
that in the potlatch there is no hesitation in sometimes destroying considerable 
wealth by breaking a ‘copper’ or by throwing it into the sea, and that greater 
prestige results from the destruction of wealth than from its distribution, 
because however liberal it may be distribution always requires a similar 
return. Although it is always limited and qualified by the other aspects of the 
institution of exchange, the economic character still persists. ‘It is not, how- 
ever, the mere possession of wealth which gives prestige; it is rather its 
distribution. . . The amassing of wealth has as its sole aim the buying of high 
status .’ 2 As a matter of fact, ‘the idea of a free gift is alien to Malekula 
culture ... A gift is at most a venture, a hopeful speculation .’ 3 However, 
‘even when pigs are given for pigs and food for food, the exchanges are not 
wholly without economic significance, for they are definitely valuable as a 
stimulus to work and for the need to which they give rise for organized co- 
operative effort ’. 4 



ii 

The idea that a mysterious advantage is attached to the acquisition of com- 
modities, or at least certain commodities, by means of reciprocal gifts, rather 
than by individual production or acquisition, is not confined to primitive 
society. The Alaskan Indians distinguish objects of consumption or pro- 
visions which do not go beyond the circle of production and family consump- 
tion, and wealth - property par excellence - which the Kwakiutl call ‘the 
rich food’. The latter includes painted rugs, horn spoons, bowls and other 
ceremonial containers, ceremonial clothes, and so on, any object whose symbo- 
lical value infinitely outweighs the value of the labour or raw material, and 
which alone can enter into ritual cycles of tribal and intertribal exchange. 
But a similar distinction still operates in modern society. There are certain 
types of object which are especially appropriate for presents, precisely 
because of their non-utilitarian nature. In some Latin countries these objects 
can only be found, in all their luxury and diversity, in stores set up especially 
for this purpose, such as ‘casas de regalias’ or ‘casas de presentes', and which 
are similar to Anglo-Saxon ‘gift shops'. It is hardly necessary to note that 
these gifts, like invitations (which, though not exclusively, are also free 
distributions of food and drink), are ‘returned’. This is an example of recipro- 
city in our society. It is as if in our society certain non-essential goods, such as 
flowers, sweets and ‘luxury articles’, to which is attached a great psychological, 

1 Mauss, 1925, p. 62. 2 Deacon, 1934, p. 199. 

4 ibid. p. 202. 



3 loc. cit. 




56 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



aesthetic or sensual value, are thought to be more properly acquired in the 
form of reciprocal gifts rather than as individual purchases or for 
individual consumption. 

In our society also certain festivals and ceremonies regulate the periodical 
return and traditional style of vast exchange transactions. In North American 
society, which often seems to seek the reintegration into modern society of 
the very general attitudes and procedures of primitive cultures, these occa- 
sions assume quite exceptional proportions. The exchange of gifts at Christ- 
mas, for a month each year, practised by all social classes with a sort of 
sacred ardour, is nothing other than a gigantic potlatch , implicating millions 
of individuals, and at the end of which many family budgets are faced with 
lasting disequilibrium. Richly decorated Christmas cards certainly do not 
attain the value of ‘coppers’, but the refinement shown in their selection, 
their originality, their price (which although individually modest, is none 
the less to be multiplied by the number), and the quantity sent or received, 
are the proof, ritually exhibited on the recipient’s mantelpiece during the 
week of celebration, of the wealth of his social relationships or the degree 
of his prestige. The subtle techniques of gift wrapping must also be mentioned, 
all expressing in their way the personal bond between the giver and the gift, 
and the magical function of the gift, such as special wrapping paper, ribbons 
appropriate to the occasion, heraldic labels and so on. Through the use- 
lessness of the gifts, and their frequent duplication because of the limited 
range of objects suitable as presents, these exchanges also take the form of a 
vast and collective destruction of wealth. Without calling upon the very 
significant theme in modern folklore of the millionaire lighting his cigar with 
bank notes, there are many little facts in this example to remind us that even 
in our own society the destruction of wealth is a way to gain prestige. The 
skilful merchant knows that a way to attract customers is to advertise that 



certain high-priced articles must be ‘sacrificed’. The motive is economic, but 



the terminology retains an air of mystery. 



Doubtless gambling provides, in modern society, the most striking picture 
of these transfers of wealth with the sole purpose of gaining prestige. Gambling 
really requires a special study by itself, but here we shall confine ourselves 
to a brief statement. During the last hundred years, gambling has shown 
exceptional development each time the means of payment were found con- 
siderably to exceed the local availability of commodities. The fabulous gamb- 
ling stories of the Klondyke of Alaska, during the mining expansion, are 
echoed by those of the Amazon region during the great rubber period. Thus 
it seems as if money, which we have become accustomed to regard as a simple 
means of obtaining economic goods, found, when it could not be used up in 
this way, another archaic role, formerly attributed to precious things, viz., 
as a means of gaining prestige by the value of the gift or sacrifice, which 
has actually been made or simply mooted. This ritualization of the use of 



‘surpluses’ corresponds with the regulation, already examined in chapter 




The Principle of Reciprocity 57 

III, of the use of ‘scarce products’. Between these two extremes there is a 
kind of zone of indifference and freedom. Martius’s remarks on the Arawak 
are well known: ‘Although they may have the idea of individual property, 
what each possesses is so common and easy to obtain, that everyone lends and 
borrows without too much concern for restitution.’ 1 The Yakut refused to 
believe that somewhere in the world people could die of hunger, when it was 
so easy to go and share a neighbour’s meal. 2 Thus the refinements of sharing 
or distribution appear with the urgency or the absence of the need. 

But there is still a general model here. In the significant field of the offering 
of food, of which banquets, teas and evening parties are modern examples, 
the language itself, as in ‘to give a reception’, shows that among ourselves, 
as in Alaska or Oceania, ‘to receive’ is to give. The characteristic of recipro- 
city is not the only justification for comparing meals and their rituals with the 
primitive institutions that we have considered: 

‘In economic and social relationships the expression fai te kai , “prepared 
food" is very frequently heard, and signifies the preliminary act of initiating 
the relationship, since a basket of food is the common medium of pre- 
facing a request, atoning for an injury, or fulfilling an obligation. In native 
descriptions of how to act in a variety of situations the words “go to your 
house, prepare food . . .” often begin the instruction.’ 3 

One ‘offers’ dinner to a person whom one wishes to honour, and this type of 
invitation is the most frequent way of ‘returning’ a kindness. The more the 
social aspect takes precedence over the strictly alimentary, the more stylized 
also is the type and presentation of the food offered; the fine porcelain service, 
the silverware, and the embroidered table-cloths, which are usually carefully 
stored away in the family cupboards and buffets, are a striking counterpart 
of the ceremonial bowls and spoons of Alaska, brought out on similar occa- 
sions from painted and decorated chests. The attitudes towards food are 
especially revealing. Even among ourselves what may be called ‘rich food’ 
has a function other than the mere satisfaction of physiological needs. When 
one ‘gives’ a dinner-party, the ordinary daily menu is not served, and the 
literature has copiously conjured up all the banqueting folklore, such as 
saumon-mayonnaise , turbot-sauce mousse line, aspics de foie gras , and so on. 
Moreover, if the occasion requires certain traditional foods, their very 
appearance, by a significant recurrence, calls for shared consumption. A 
bottle of vintage wine, a rare liqueur, a foie gras, pricks the owner’s con- 
science with the claim of someone else. These are some of the delicacies which 
one would not buy and consume alone without a vague feeling of guilt. 
Indeed, the group judges with singular harshness the person who does this. 
During Polynesian ceremonial exchanges it is required that goods be ex- 
changed within the group of near paternal relatives, but must as far as pos- 
sible go to other groups and into other villages. To fail in this duty is called 
1 Von Martius, 1867. 2 Sumner, 1901, p. 69. 3 Firth, 1939, p. 372. 




58 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

sori tar/a, ‘giving into one’s own basket’. And at village dances convention 
demands that neither of the two local groups consume the food which it 
has brought, but that they exchange their provisions and that each shall eat 
the other’s food. 1 The action of the person who, like the woman in the Maori 
proverb, Kai kino ana Te Arahe, would secretly eat the ceremonial food, 
without offering any of it, 2 would provoke from his or her near relatives irony, 
mockery, disgust and even anger, according to the circumstances and persons. 
But each of these sentiments in its way rouses a faint echo of similar emotions, 
which we have referred to in the preceding chapters. It seems that the 
group confusedly sees a sort of social incest in the individual accomplishment 
of an act which normally requires collective participation. 3 

But the ritual of exchange does not take place only at ceremonial meals. 
Politeness requires that the dish, salt, butter and bread be offered to one's 
neighbour before serving oneself. We have often observed the ceremonial 
aspect of the meal in the lower-priced restaurants in the south of France, 
especially in those regions where wine is the principal industry and is sur- 
rounded by a sort of mystical respect which makes it ‘rich food’ par excel- 
lence. In the small restaurants where wine is included in the price of the meal, 
each customer finds in front of his plate a modest bottle of wine, more often 
than not very bad. This bottle is similar to his neighbour’s bottle, as are the 
portions of meat and vegetables which a waitress passes around. Nevertheless, 
a remarkable difference in attitude towards the wine and the food is immedi- 
ately manifested. Food serves the body’s needs and wine its taste for luxury, 
the first serving to nourish, the second, to honour. Each person at the table 
eats, so to speak, for himself, and the noting of a trifling slight in the way he 
has been served arouses bitterness towards the more favoured, and a jealous 
complaint to the proprietor. But it is entirely different with the wine. If a 
bottle should be insufficiently filled, its owner will good-humouredly appeal 
to his neighbour’s judgment. And the proprietor will face, not the demand of 
an individual victim, but a group complaint. In other words, wine is a social 
commodity, while the plat du jour is a personal commodity. The little bottle 
may contain exactly one glassful, yet the contents will be poured out, not into 
the owner’s glass, but into his neighbour’s. And his neighbour will immedi- 
ately make a corresponding gesture of reciprocity. 

1 Firth, 1939, pp. 311, 321. 2 Best, 1924, vol. I, p. 425. 

3 cf. the Greek and Cambodian versions of Ass's Skin, in which the king symbolically 

reveals his incestuous desires towards his daughter: ‘A man has a lamb that he himself has 
raised or nourished. Is it better that he eat it himself or that another man eat it?’ And in 
the Khmer version: ‘Summoning his mandarins one day, he asked them if a man should 
eat or sell the fruit from a tree that he has planted.’ Cosquin, 1922, p. 9. Inversely, among 
the Baiga of central India, incest is expiated by offering great feasts (Elwin, 1938, pp. 237- 
54). And the natives of the Trobriand Islands justify their indignant condemnation of 
father-daughter incest, which in a matrilincal system is not an infraction of the exogamous 
law and which is not punished by ritual illnesses, by saying that it is ‘very bad because 
already he married her mother. Already he caught hold of the first marriage present.’ 
Malinowski, 1929, pp. 530-1. 




The Principle of Reciprocity 59 

What has happened? The two bottles are identical in volume, and their 
contents similar in quality. Each person in this revealing scene has, in the 
final analysis, received no more than if he had consumed his own wine. 
From an economic viewpoint, no one has gained and no one has lost. But the 
point is that there is much more in the exchange itself than in the things 
exchanged. 

The situation of two strangers less than a yard apart, face to face on both 
sides of a table in a cheap restaurant (an individual table is a privilege to be 
paid for, and is not granted below a certain tariff), is commonplace and 
sporadic. Nevertheless, it is highly revealing, for it offers an example, rare 
in our society (but many instances are found in primitive society), of the 
formation of a group, for which, doubtless because of its temporary nature, 
no ready-made formula of integration exists. The French custom is to ignore 
people whose names, occupations and rank are unknown. But in the little 
restaurant, such people find themselves in a quite close relationship for one to 
one-and-a-half hours, and temporarily united by a similar preoccupation. A 
conflict exists, not very keen to be sure, but real enough and sufficient to create 
a state of tension between the norm of privacy and the fact of community. 
They feel both alone and together, compelled to the usual reserve between 
strangers, while their respective spatial positions, and their relationships 
to the objects and utensils of the meal, suggest, and to a certain extent call 
for, intimacy. For a short time these two strangers are forced to live together, 
although not for as long or as closely as if sharing a cabin of a transatlantic 
liner, or a sleeping-car, but for this reason also no clear cultural procedure 
has been established. An almost imperceptible anxiety is likely to arise in 
the minds of these table-companions with the prospect of trifling disagree- 
ments that the meeting might produce. When social distance is maintained, 
even if it is not accompanied by any sign of disdain, insolence or aggression, 
it is in itself a matter of sufferance in that any social contact entails an appeal, 
an appeal which is a hope for response. This is the fleeting but difficult situa- 
tion resolved by the exchanging of wine. It is an assertion of good grace 
which does away with the mutual uncertainty. It substitutes a social relation- 
ship for spatial juxtaposition. But it is also more than that. The partner who 
was entitled to maintain his reserve is persuaded to give it up. Wine offered 
calls for wine returned, cordiality requires cordiality. The relationship of 
indifference can never be restored once it has been ended by one of the table- 
companions. From now on the relationship can only be cordial or hostile. 
There is no way of refusing the neighbour’s offer of his glass of wine without 
being insulting. Further, the acceptance of this offer sanctions another offer, 
for conversation. In this way a whole range of trivial social ties are established 
by a series of alternating oscillations, in which offering gives one a right, and 
receiving makes one obligated, and always beyond what has been given or 
accepted. 

And there is still more. The person beginning the cycle seizes the initiative. 




60 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

and the greater social ease which he has displayed puts him at an advantage. 
For the opening always involves a risk, in that the table-companion may re- 
spond to the drink offered with a less generous glass, or the contrary risk 
that he will take the liberty to bid higher, obliging the one who made the 
first offer (and we must not forget that the bottle is small) either to lose his 
last trump as his last drop, or to sacrifice another bottle for the sake of his 
prestige. We are faced then with a ‘total social fact’ - on a microscopic scale, 
it is true - the implications of which are at once social, psychological and 
economic. This apparently futile drama, which perhaps the reader will think 
has been given a disproportionate importance, seems on the contrary to 
offer material for inexhaustible sociological reflection. We have already 
indicated our interest in the non-crystal lized forms of social life, 1 viz., the 
spontaneous aggregations resulting from crises, or (as in the example just 
discussed) simply by-products of collective life, providing fresh traces of very 
primitive psycho-social experiences, and whose equivalent scale might vainly 
be sought in the irremediably inferior animal life, or in the much superior 
life of archaic or savage institutions. In this sense, the respective attitudes of 
the strangers in the restaurant appear to be an infinitely distant projection, 
scarcely perceptible but nevertheless recognizable, of a fundamental sit- 
uation, that of individuals of primitive bands coming into contact for the 
first time or under exceptional circumstances meeting strangers. The charac- 
teristics of this very tense experience in primitive society have been shown 
elsewhere. 2 Primitive peoples know only two ways of classifying strangers. 
They are either ‘good’ or ‘bad.’ But one should not be misled by a naive 
translation of native terms. A ‘good’ group is one accorded hospitality 
without question, and given the most precious goods. A ‘bad’ group is one 
from which one expects and to which is promised, at the first opportunity, 
suffering or death. With one there is exchange, with the other, fighting. It is 
in this light that the Chukchee legend of ‘the invisible ones’, in which 
mysteriously conveyed goods exchange themselves, must be understood. 
Nothing clarifies this better than a description of their former markets. Every- 
one came armed, and the products were offered on spear points. Sometimes 
a bundle of skins was held in one hand and a bared knife in the other, so that 
one was ready for battle at the slightest provocation. The market was also 
formerly designated by the one word, Elpu rlrkln, ‘to exchange’, which was 
also applied to the vendetta. A new verb, vili'urkln , ‘to trade’, corresponding 
to the Koryak vili'vikln, ‘to make peace with’, has been introduced into the 
modern language. The author to whom we owe these observations adds: 
‘The difference in meaning between the old and the new term is 
very striking.’ 3 



hi 

Exchange, as a total phenomenon, is from the first a total exchange, compris- 
' p. 42. above. 2 Levi-Strauss, 1948a. 3 Bogoras, 1904-9, pp. 53-5. 




The Principle of Reciprocity 6 1 

ing food, manufactured objects, and that most precious category of goods, 
women. Doubtless we are a long way from the strangers in the restaurant, and 
perhaps it will seem startling to suggest that the reluctance of the southern 
French peasant to drink his own flask of wine provides the model by which 
the prohibition of incest might be explained. Clearly, the prohibition does not 
result from this reluctance. Nevertheless, we believe that both are phenomena 
of the same type, that they are elements of the same cultural complex, or 
more exactly of the basic complex of culture. Moreover, this basic identity 
is apparent in Polynesia, where Firth distinguishes three spheres of exchange 
in terms of the relative mobility of the articles involved. The first sphere 
comprises especially food of various types, the second includes plaited cord 
and bark-cloth, and the third, shell fishhooks, rope, turmeric cylinders and 
canoes. He adds: 

‘Apart from the three spheres of exchange mentioned a fourth may be 
recognized where goods of unique quality are handed over. Such for 
instance was the transfer of women by the man who could not otherwise 
pay for his canoe. Transfers of land might be put into the same category. 
Women and land arc given in satisfaction of unique obligations.' 1 

Perhaps we shall be criticized on the ground of having brought together 
two dissimilar phenomena, and we will answer this criticism before proceed- 
ing. Admittedly, the gift is a primitive form of exchange, but it has in fact 
disappeared in favour of exchange for profit, except for a few survivals such 
as invitations, celebrations and gifts which are given an exaggerated import- 
ance. In our society, the proportion of goods transferred according to these 
archaic modalities is very small in comparison with those involved in. com- 
merce and merchandising. Reciprocal gifts are diverting survivals which 
engage the curiosity of the antiquarian; but it is not possible to derive 
an institution such as the prohibition of incest, which is as general and 
important in our society as in any other, from a type of phenomenon which 
today is abnormal and exceptional and of purely anecdotal interest. In other 
words, we shall be accused, as we ourselves have accused McLennan, Spencer, 
Lubbock and Durkheim, of deriving the rule from the exception, the general 
from the particular, and the function from the survival. Perhaps it will be 
added that there is only one common characteristic between the prohibition 
of incest and the reciprocal gift, viz., the individual repulsion and social 
reprobation directed against the unilateral consumption of certain goods, but 
that the essential characteristic of reciprocal gifts, i.e., the positive aspect of 
reciprocity, is entirely missing in the first case, so that strictly speaking our 
interpretation could be valid only for exogamous systems (and particularly 
dual organizations) which present this reciprocal characteristic, but not for 
the prohibition of incest as practised in our society. 

We shall begin with the second objection, already alluded to in the previous 

1 Firth, 1939, p. 344. 




62 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

chapter. We have maintained that the prohibition of incest and exogamy 
constitute substantially identical rules, and that they differ from each other 
only in a secondary characteristic, viz., that reciprocity, present in both cases, 
is only inorganic in the first, while it is organized in the second. Like exogamy, 
the prohibition of incest is a rule of reciprocity, for I will give up my daughter 
or my sister only on condition that my neighbour does the same. The violent 
reaction of the community towards incest is the reaction of a community 
outraged. Unlike exogamy, exchange may be neither explicit nor immediate; 
but the fact that I can obtain a wife is, in the final analysis, the consequence 
of the fact that a brother or father has given her up. But the rule does not 
say in whose favour the person shall be given up. On the contrary, the benefi- 
ciary, or in any case the beneficiary class, is delimited in the case of exogamy. 
The only difference then is that in exogamy the belief is expressed that the 
classes must be defined so that a relationship may be established between 
them, while in the prohibition of incest the relationship alone is sufficient 
to define continually in social life a complex multiplicity, ceaselessly renewed 
by terms which are directly or indirectly solidary. This transformation in 
itself poses a problem. This problem will have to be resolved, and we shall 
do so by showing that exogamy and the prohibition of incest must both be 
interpreted in terms of the simplest pattern, that provided by marriage 
between cross-cousins. But whatever solution will have to be proposed, it 
can be seen that the prohibition of incest does not differ from exogamy and 
from exchanges of prestations of another order. 

The other objection touches an equally important point, for it is a question 
of choosing between two possible interpretations of the term ‘archaic’. The 
survival of a custom or a belief can in fact be explained in two ways. Either 
the custom or belief is a survival without any other significance than that 
of an historical residue spared by chance or as a result of extrinsic causes, 
or else it has survived because through the centuries it has continued to play 
a role and because this role is the same as might account for its initial 
appearance. An institution can be archaic because it has lost its reason for 
existing, or, on the contrary, because this reason for existing is so fundamental 
that any transformation of its ways of acting has been neither possible nor 
necessary. 

Such is the case with exchange. Its role in primitive society is essential 
because it embraces material objects, social values and women. But while 
in the case of merchandise this role has progressively diminished in importance 
in favour of other means of acquisition, as far as women are concerned, 
reciprocity has on the contrary maintained its fundamental function, on the 
one hand because women are the most precious possession (in chap. Ill 
we have justified the exceptional position they occupy in the primitive 
system of values), but above all because women are not primarily a sign of 
social value, but a natural stimulant; and the stimulant of the only instinct 
the satisfaction of which can be deferred, and consequently the only one for 




The Principle of Reciprocity 63 

which, in the act of exchange, and through the awareness of reciprocity, the 
transformation from the stimulant to the sign can take place, and, defining 
by this fundamental process the transformation from nature to culture, 
assume the character of an institution. 

iv 

The inclusion of women in the number of reciprocal prestations from group 
to group and from tribe to tribe is such a general custom that a whole 
volume would not be sufficient to enumerate the instances of it. Let us note 
first of all that marriage is regarded everywhere as a particularly favourable 
occasion for the initiation or development of a cycle of exchanges. The 
‘wedding presents’ of our society are obviously to be included in the group 
of phenomena studied above. 

In Alaska and British Columbia, the marriage of a girl is necessarily 
accompanied by a potlatch, to such an extent that the Comox aristocrats 
organize pseudo-marriage ceremonies with no bride, for the sole purpose of 
acquiring rights in the course of the exchange rites. 1 But the relationship 
which exists between marriage and gifts is not arbitrary. The marriage itself 
is an inherent part of the prestations which accompany it. It forms merely 
the central motive (Fig. 3). Not so long ago it was the custom in our society 
‘to ask for’ a young girl in marriage, and the bride’s father ‘gave’ his daughter 
in marriage. ‘To give away the bride' is an expression still used in English. 
And of the woman who takes a lover, it is also said that she ‘gives herself’. 
The term ‘gift’, in the Germanic languages, still has the two meanings of 
‘present’ and ‘betrothal’. Likewise, in Arabic, sadaqa means alms, bride-price, 
justice and tax. Doubtless, in this last case the comparison can be explained 
by the custom of wife-buying. But marriage by purchase is a special insti- 
tution only in its form. In reality, it is only a modality of that basic system 
analysed by Mauss, according to which, in primitive society and still partially 
in our own, rights, goods and persons circulate within the group according 
to a continual mechanism of prestations and counter-prestations. Malinowski 
has shown that in the Trobriand Islands, even after marriage, the payment 
of mapula represents on the man's part a counter-prestation intended to 
compensate for services provided by the wife in terms of sexual gratification. 
This still seems to be the function of the engagement ring in our society, 
since the custom is for it to be left to the wife in case of divorce, and not to 
be included in the property settlement. 

Although less important than those associated with funerals, the astonish- 
ing complexity of the matrimonial exchanges illustrated in Fig. 3 deserves 
to engage our attention. This complexity is expressed both in the number of 
prestations and in the number of social ties that they involve. In fact, marriage 
involves five different types of family and social relationships. To the right 

1 Barnett, 19386, p. 133. 






from paternal kin 
of bride 

from maternal kin 
of bride 

return gift to mat 



carriers 

to sisters of 
husband 

to women of bride’s 
family" 

— ‘Fishing Oven’ — 




return of 2 





divided among 
mat 

— contributors 

— raw food 



eaten by bride’s 
family 



return of 5 




Fig. 3. Marriage exchanges in Polynesia (after Firth, 1939, p. 323 j. 



The Principle of Reciprocity 65 

of the husband’s lineage there can be seen, firstly, the wife’s lineage, and 
secondly, the wife’s maternal uncle’s lineage. The fact that the latter may 
be distinct from the former indicates that descent is patrilineal, as is actually 
the case in Tikopia from where this example has been taken. 1 To the left of 
the husband’s lineage, the group of ’cooks’ (or rather those called upon to 
play this role in this particular circumstance) is also subdivided, firstly into 
relatives by marriage with the women of the husband’s lineage, and secondly 
into relatives by marriage with the women related to these affines themselves. 
When one of its members marries, the husband’s lineage is then, as it were, 
supported by two groups of sons-in-law, the direct and the indirect sons-in- 
law, and its piestations aie made to, and returned to it by, two groups of 
parents-in-law, viz., parents-in-law proper, and the parents-in-law of these 
parents-in-law. 

In chapter XVIII we shall find this type of structure binding each lineage, 
in a system of directional exchanges, to its ‘near sons-in-law’ and to its 
‘distant sons-in-law’ on the one hand, and, on the other, to its ‘near parents- 
in-law’ and to its ‘distant parents-in-law'. The point of the comparison is 
to show that a society the study of which certainly pertains to complex 
kinship structures (for preferred degrees are unknown in Tikopia, and 
marriage between cousins is prohibited there) nevertheless conforms with 
our methods of analysis and can be defined, at least in a functional way, as 
a society with a long cycle, in the sense given to this term in chapter XXVII. 
From a more general point of view, it will be sufficient to note here that a 
new marriage renews all marriages concluded at other times, and at different 
points in the social structure, so that each connexion rests upon all the 
others and gives them, on its establishment, a recrudescence of activity. 

Finally, it must be noted that the ‘compensation’ ( te malai), which initiates 
the matrimonial exchanges, represents an indemnity for the bride’s abduction. 
Even marriage by capture does not contradict the rule of reciprocity. Rather 
it is one of the possible legal ways of putting it into practice. The bride’s 
abduction dramatically expresses the obligation upon any group holding 
girls to give them up. It shows clearly that they are available. 

It would then be false to say that one exchanges or gives gifts at the same 
time that one exchanges or gives women. For the woman herself is nothing 
other than one of these gifts, the supreme gift among those that can only 
be obtained in the form of reciprocal gifts. The first stage of our analysis 
has been intended to bring to light this basic characteristic of the gift, 
represented by women in primitive society, and to explain the reasons for 
this. It should not be surprising then to find women included among recipro- 
cal prestations; this they are in the highest degree, but at the same time as 
other goods, material and spiritual. This syncretic character of the conjugal 
bond and, over and above the conjugal bond and doubtless before it, of 
the alliance itself, emerges clearly from the protocol of the marriage proposal 

1 Firth, 1936, ch. XV. 




66 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

among the Bushmen of South Africa. Approached by an intermediary, the 
parents of the young girl replied : ‘We are poor, we cannot afford to give our 
daughter away.’ The suitor then visits his future mother-in-law and says: 
‘I have come myself to speak to you. If you die, I will bury you, if your 
husband dies I will bury him.’ And gifts immediately follow. 1 This expresses 
perfectly the total character, sexual, economic, legal and social, of this 
collection of reciprocal prestations which make up marriage. In Ontong 
Java, an island of the Solomon Archipelago, the ceremonial exchanges take 
place in the following way (Fig. 4). 



X 2 X, X 3 

AAA 
i > 1 > , 

A = O A = O 

a c d b 

Fig. 4. Ceremonial exchanges in the Solomon Islands. 

Suppose X t is the headman of the group of a and b; a is married to c, 
whose headman is X 2 , and b is married to d, the headman of whose group 
is X 3 . At one exchange, a and his brothers give fish to X lf and c and her 
husband’s brothers’ wives give puddings to him. In return, a gets puddings, 
and c fish. At the same time, d gives fish to X 2 , and b gives him puddings, 
and they receive the opposite in return. At the other exchange, a gives fish 
to X 2 , and c gives him puddings, and each gets the opposite in return. At 
the same time, d gives fish to X lf and b gives him puddings. 2 Thus, ‘in one 
exchange the headman received fish from his male blood relatives, and taro 
puddings from his female relatives by marriage. In the other he received 
fish from his male relatives by marriage, and puddings from his female 
blood relatives. On both occasions he kept some of the gifts for himself and 
then gave to each person the opposite to what he or she had presented.' 3 
Thus economic exchanges offer an ideal commentary on marriage transactions. 

Analysing a special kinship relationship (to which we shall have to return) 
in force among certain groups in New Guinea, Seligman remarks: 

‘For example the folk of Beipaa (Veifa) feed pigs and bring up dogs but 
these pigs and dogs are not for them, they are for the village of Amoamo, 
their ufuapie, and in return the pigs and dogs from Amoamo come to 
Beipaa . . . The same condition holds in the matter of marriage; the 
girls of a village, according to the accepted rule, should not marry any 
others than the men of the ufuapie .’ 4 

These examples, which might easily have been multiplied almost to infinity, 
show not only that the system of prestations includes marriage, but also 

1 Schapera, 1930, p. 106. 2 Hogbin, 19316, p. 47. 

3 ibid. p. 55. -* Seligman, 1910, pp. 363-4. 




The Principle of Reciprocity 67 

that it keeps it going. In Alaska the rivalry of the potlatch takes place essen- 
tially between the father-in-law and the son-in-law, and in the Andaman 
Islands the son-in-law is bound specially to honour his parents-in-law with 
gifts well after marriage. In New Caledonia, the sister’s name perpetuates 
the memory of these exchanges at the same time that her status as exogamous 
wife guarantees their continuity. She is called puneara, ‘the provider of food’, 
and the expression indicates that any brother is welcome at a meal in the 
territory where his sister has married . 1 

In short, the system of prestations results in marriage. 

On reaching puberty, the Konyak Naga boys begin to look for girls from 
the complementary clan to their own, and they exchange little gifts the value 
and nature of which are strictly fixed by custom. These gifts are of such 
importance that a boy’s first question to the young girl whose favours he 
seeks is as follows: ‘Will you take my gifts or not?’ The answer being, 
perhaps: ‘I will take them’, or ‘I have taken the gifts of another man. I 
don’t want to exchange with you.’ Even the wording of these overtures is 
fixed by tradition. This exchange of gifts initiates a whole series of reciprocal 
prestations which lead to marriage, or, rather, constitute the initial trans- 
actions of marriage, viz., work in the fields, meals, cakes, and so on . 2 

The small nomadic bands of the Nambikwara Indians of western Brazil 
are in constant fear of each other and avoid each other. But at the same time 
they desire contact, because it is the only way in which they are able to 
exchange, and thus to obtain products or articles that they lack. There is a 
link, a continuity, between hostile relations and the provision of reciprocal 
prestations. Exchanges are peacefully resolved wars, and wars are the result 
of unsuccessful transactions. This feature is clearly witnessed to by the fact 
that the transition from war to peace, or at least from hostility to cordiality, 
is accomplished by the intermediary of ritual gestures, a veritable ‘recon- 
ciliation inspection’. The adversaries inspect each other and, with gestures 
which still hint of combat, examine the necklaces, earrings, bracelets and 
feathered ornaments of one another with admiring murmurs. 

And from being arrayed against each other they pass immediately to gifts ; 
gifts are received, gifts are given, but silently, without bargaining, without 
any expression of satisfaction or complaint, and without any apparent 
connexion between what is offered and what is obtained. Thus it is a question 
of reciprocal gifts, and not of commercial transactions. But a supplementary 
stage may be reached. Two bands which have thus come to establish lasting 
cordial relations can decide in a deliberate manner to join by instituting 
between the male members of the two respective bands the artificial kinship 
relationship of brothers-in-law. Given the marriage system of the Nambik- 
wara, the immediate consequence of this innovation is that all the children 
of one group become the potential spouses of the children of the other group 
and vice versa. Thus a continuous transition exists from war to exchange, 
1 Leenhardt, 1930, p. 65. 2 von Furer-Haimendorf, 1938, p. 363. 




68 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

and from exchange to intermarriage, and the exchange of brides is merely 
the conclusion to an uninterrupted process of reciprocal gifts, which effects 
the transition from hostility to alliance, from anxiety to confidence, and from 
fear to friendship. 1 

1 Levi-Strauss, 1943a; 1943ft, pp. 398-409. 




CHAPTER VI 



Dual Organization 

! 

The fundamental characteristic of marriage as a form of exchange is seen 
particularly clearly in the case of dual organizations. This term defines a 
system in which the members of the community, whether it be a tribe or a 
village, are divided into two parts which maintain complex relationships 
varying from open hostility to very close intimacy, and with which various 
forms of rivalry and co-operation are usually associated. These moieties are 
often exogamous, that is, the men of one moiety can choose their wives 
only from the other, and vice versa. When the division into moieties does not 
regulate marriages, this role is frequently assumed by other forms of grouping. 
There may be a second bipartition of the group, parallel or perpendicular to 
this earlier division, the moieties may embrace exogamous clans, sub-clans 
or lineages, or, lastly, the modalities of marriage may depend upon specialized 
forms called marriage classes. 

Dual organizations have numerous features in common apart from this 
direct or indirect exogamy. Descent is most often matrilineal; two culture 
heroes, sometimes older and younger brothers, sometimes twins, play an 
important part in the mythology; the bipartition of the social group is often 
continued into a bipartition of the universe into animate and inanimate 
objects, and the moieties are connected with such characteristic opposites 
as Red and White, Red and Black, Clear and Dark, Day and Night, Summer 
and Winter, North and South or East and West, Sky and Earth, Terra 
Firma and Sea or Water, Left and Right, Upstream and Downstream, 
Superior and Inferior, Good and Evil, Strong and Weak, Elder and Younger. 
Along with dual organizations there is sometimes a dichotomy of power 
between a secular chief and a sacred chief, or a secular chief and a military 
chief. Finally, the moieties are linked not only by the exchange of women, 
but by the furnishing of reciprocal prestations and counter-prestations of an 
economic, social and ceremonial nature. These links are frequently expressed 
in ritual games, which clearly show that double attitude of rivalry and solidar- 
ity which is the most striking feature of relationships between moieties. 
Sports races in North-east and Central Brazil, and ball games, with exactly 
the same function, in Australia and North, South and Central America 



69 




70 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



provide examples of these. These similarities in detail have often suggested 
the hypothesis that dual organizations have spread from a single point of 
origin. We believe rather that these similarities rest on a common basis, 
reciprocity, which has a functional character and which must have an 
independent existence in countless human communities. As we shall try to 
show, the dual system does not give rise to reciprocity, but merely gives it 
form. This could at times have been a local discovery, subsequently imposed 
by conquest or borrowed for its convenience. It could never have spread if 
the basic conditions making its adoption desirable or facilitating its imposition 
had not been present everywhere. 

The distribution of dual organizations has features which make this type 
of organization particularly remarkable. These features are not apparent 
among all peoples but are encountered in all parts of the world, and generally 
at the most primitive levels of culture. This distribution therefore suggests 
a functional character peculiar to archaic cultures rather than a single unique 
origin. Naturally, there are exceptions, but in support of this view it may be 
pointed out that in more numerous cases still it is possible to discern vague 
outlines or survivals of dual organization among neighbours evolved from 
groups which exhibit this organization more definitively. Thus in Indonesia, 
traces of dual organizations may be found among the Sakai of Sumatra, in 
the Macassar region, and in central and southern Celebes, on Sumba, 
Flores, Timor, and in the Moluccas. There is evidence and some suggestion 
that they existed, and still exist, in the Carolines and Palau of Micronesia. 
They are found in New Guinea, in the Torres Straits and the Murray Islands. 
In Melanesia, Codrington, Rivers, Fox and Deacon express their agreement 
in almost the same words, that dual organizations are the most archaic 
social structure. Finally, traces or embryonic forms have been observed in 
the Banks Islands, the New Hebrides, Fiji (by Hocart), Samoa, Tahiti, and 
perhaps even on Easter Island: ‘The ten tribes or mata were split into two 
groups that were probably nothing more nor less than two hostile con- 
federations’, writes Mdtraux of the former social organization of this island . 1 
Meanwhile, in another work, the same author points to the belief in a mythi- 
cal dichotomy which accounts for the very origin of these tribes , 2 and he 
describes the forms of ritual co-operation between Tuu and Hotu-iti . 3 It 
is unnecessary to dwell on Australia, for the division into exogamous 
moieties is known to be a frequent feature of Australian aboriginal cultures 
and has nowhere else been subject to such refinements. 

Writers of the sixteenth century had already pointed out forms of dualism 
in Central America and Mexico, and during the same period similar indi- 
cations were forthcoming for Peru. In North America, moieties extend 
widely throughout the whole eastern zone, notably among the Creek, 
Chickasaw, Natchez, Yuchi, Iroquois and Algonquins. They are found in 
the cultures of the Plains, distinctly or as survivals, among the Sauk-Fox, 
1 Metraux, 1941, p. 70. 2 ibid. 1942. 3 ibid. 1940, pp. 124-5. 




71 



Dual Organization 

Menomini, Omaha, Kansas, Osage and Winnebago, and as less and less 
clear vestiges among the western groups. They are lacking in particular 
among the Arapaho and the Cheyenne, but reappear in the primitive cultures 
of central California. Finally, it has been only in the last ten years or so, but 
with a richness which has all the force of a proof, that dual organization has 
been observed in the most primitive cultures of South America. If dual 
organization, which is present at least in principle among the Nuer, the tribes 
of the Lobi branch, and the Bemba of Northern Rhodesia , 1 nevertheless 
seems less common in Africa than elsewhere, it could be shown that even 
where there is no dual organization certain mechanisms of reciprocity persist 
which are functionally equivalent to this type or organization. Among the 
Nuer of the White Nile, whose clans are still split even today into exogamous 
pairs, their origin is explained in the following myth : 

‘A certain Gau, who descended from heaven, married Kwong (according 
to one account an even earlier arrival from heaven), by whom he had 
two sons, Gaa and Kwook, and a number of daughters. As there was no 
one with whom these could marry, Gau assigned several daughters to each 
of his sons, and to avert the calamities that follow incest he performed the 
ceremony of splitting a bullock longitudinally, decreeing that the two 
groups might intermarry but that neither might marry within itself .’ 2 

This myth obviously accounts for the theoretical origin of exogamous pairs. 
The same author tells us that among the Bari, where this dichotomy is 
unknown, the same ‘splitting ceremony’ is observed when there is some 
uncertainty as to the kinship relationships of the two who are engaged to be 
married. Here then, the theoretical risk of incest is avoided by an ideal 
reconstitution of a correlative and antagonistic couple. Moreover, the 
sacrifice of the bullock or goat to ward off an abnormal relationship between 
the spouses is widely spread throughout Africa, and elsewhere it has signifi- 
cant equivalents. 

It is true that we might be guilty here of begging the question, since we 
seem to assume, instead of proving, as is our object, the basic identity of 
dual organization and customs which on the surface vary greatly. Nothing 
is more dangerous to a sound method of research than to adopt such a 
vague and elastic definition of the institution under examination that after- 
wards it is difficult not to read everything into it. The study of dual organi- 
zation has especially suffered from this type of excess. 

Wherever dual organization appears, it has a certain number of con- 
sequences. The most important of these is that individuals are defined in 
relationship to each other essentially by whether they belong or do not 
belong to the same moiety. This feature does not change, whatever the mode 

1 Evans-Pritchard, 1940; Labouret, 1931; Richards, 1937, pp. 188-93; Haekel, 1938, 
p. 654. 

2 Seligman and Seligman, 1932, p. 207. 




72 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

of transmitting the moiety’s name may be. Whether it be through the male 
or the female line, the mother's collaterals will always be grouped in one 
category, and the father's in another. Consequently, a single term will usually 
serve to designate the mother and her sisters, and likewise another for the 
father and his brothers. This system, which is usually far more complex, 
has been called ‘the classificatory kinship system’, and it can be seen that its 
specific nature is very readily accounted for by dual organization. For this 
reason, Tylor and Frazer have suggested that dual organization can always 
be postulated at the origin of the classificatory system. As the classificatory 
system exists, or can be found in almost all human societies, the seriousness 
of this hypothesis can be seen, since it implies nothing less than the univer- 
sality of dual organization. We believe it impossible to hold this hypothesis 
in such a strict form, for we have already indicated that the essential thing, 
as we see it, is not dual organization but the principle of reciprocity of which 
it constitutes, in some way, the codification. But we agree that the classifi- 
catory system can be seen as proof of the generality, if not of dual organi- 
zation itself, then at least of mechanisms, potentially more flexible and 
capable of functioning independently of any systematic apparatus, which 
none the less attest to the fundamental role of this principle of reciprocity. 

n 

Where does dual organization begin and where does it end? Moieties have 
this in common with clans, that descent is always unilineal. But we know of 
societies divided into clans and being without dual organization, societies 
with clans grouped into moieties, and lastly, societies with moieties not 
subdivided into clans. The principal difference between moieties and clans 
seems then to be one of size. 

Let us take the simplest hypothesis - and the most favourable one - viz., 
that in which both clans and moieties are exogamous. An immediate dis- 
tinction has to be made. For a clan to be exogamous does not inform us as 
to the marriage rules in the society considered. We would only know that 
an individual cannot seek his spouse in his own clan. To which clan should 
he turn? What degrees of closeness are permitted? Do preferential unions 
exist? This we do not know. The Crow Indians are divided into thirteen 
exogamous clans. All we learn from this is that a man can regard twelve out 
of every thirteen women as a possible spouse. Apart from the scale, the 
marriage rule is as indeterminate as in our own society. 

The situation is wholly different in a society similarly divided into several 
unilineal groups, each of which, however, maintains defined marriage 
relationships with one or several others. For example, suppose that group A 
and group B always intermarry, and that it is the same for group C and 
group D, group E and group F, and so on ; or else, that group A gives women 
to group B , which gives its women to group C, which in turn gives its women 




73 



Dual Organization 



to group D , and so on . . . or any other analogous combination. In every 
instance here, the groups together represent a system, which was already true 
in the case of the previous hypothesis. But the system now has a stable 
structure, and a marriage law may be isolated for every combination, in- 
forming us completely as to the nature of the exchanges in whatever group 
is being considered. The term clan will be reserved for unilineal groupings 
which, in that they are exogamous, permit a purely negative definition, and 
the term class , or more exactly, marriage class , to those groupings which 
permit a positive determination of the modalities of exchange. 

The distinction between the two forms is not always easy to make. There 
are clans which have none of the characteristics peculiar to classes. The 
Tupi-Cawahib of the Upper Madeira have such clans, each comprising one 
or more villages occupying an hereditary territory. There are twenty clans, 
and the only marriage rule is a recommendation to take a wife from outside. 
Thus each clan finds itself in the position of maintaining marriage relation- 
ships with several others, there being no limit to the number, no permanency 
in the alliances, and no marked preference for any particular combination. 
Obviously, in cases of this type, it cannot be said that the clan is not a func- 
tional unit. Its exogamous nature alone makes it such. But this functional 
role is reduced to a minimum and the factors determining the number of 
clans, their appearance and disappearance, their geographical location and 
their numerical importance, are more historical than anything else. 1 

With the Bororo, who have already been referred to, 2 the situation is more 
complex. The clans are unequal in number and importance. Their distribution 
and even their internal structure vary from village to village. Nevertheless, 
the clans are always distributed among two exogamous moieties and two 
other ceremonial moieties. Furthermore, the clans are linked in twos, or in 
more complex combinations, through marriage preferences which yet are 
not strict. Consequently, we are dealing with social categories possessing 
the characteristics of both clans and classes, without these characteristics 
completely overlapping. By contrast, among the Kachin of Burma marriage 
is regulated by two large groupings which are simultaneously both clans 
and classes. 3 Finally, in Australia there are marriage classes which are not 
clans, since the successive members of the same line of descent can be assigned 
to different classes. 4 

The distinction, however, is of great theoretical importance. If we try to 
interpret dual organization as a particular case of clan organization, and, 
more precisely, to compare moieties with a system with n clans in which 
n = 2, we meet with insoluble difficulties. As long as n> 2, the notion of 



1 Levi-Strauss, 1948 b. 

2 cf. pp. 48-9. The Mundurucu likewise have exogamous moieties, one (White Moiety) 
composed of nineteen clans, the other (Red Moiety) of fifteen clans. According to legend, 
these clans, formerly rival tribes, became ‘brothers’. There are also clans which maintain 
closer relationships and arc called i-barip , ‘related’, Kruse, 1934, pp. 50-7. 

3 cf. ch. XV. 4 cf. ch. XI. 




74 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

dan is not bound up with any positive determination, or only with very 
vague determinations. But when the number of groups falls to two, everything 
changes, negative determinations become positive, and instead of it being 
impossible for a man to marry into one group, he learns that he must marry 
into the other. Generally speaking, for every act of social life governed by 
dual organization, a partner is immediately identifiable. Hence Lowie’s 
embarrassment in trying to treat moieties as clans: ‘It is a puzzling question 
how this reciprocity is to be interpreted ’, 1 and his subsequent abandonment 
of this position . 2 

But moieties belong in fact, not to the ‘clan’ series, but to the ‘class’ series, 
and it is not enough that the number of clans be reduced to two, through 
demographic extinction or for any other reason, for a dual organization to 
emerge. Lowie rightly quotes the case of the Crow who today have only two 
military societies, the ‘Foxes’ and the ‘Lumpwoods’. There were seven when 
Maximilian visited them . 3 The pseudo-dualism on this occasion has no 
significance from the dual organization standpoint. It would be the same if, 
as exemplified in South America, two clans surviving from a more complex 
organization together sought alliance with other villages or tribes. Thus the 
much discussed problem of whether clan organization resulted from a sub- 
division of moieties, or whether moieties were formed by an aggregation of 
clans has no significance whatsoever. Both are possible, as examples given 
below will show. Moreover, they are not the only possible methods. Dual 
organization may result from the establishment of organic ties between two 
villages, and even between two tribes. I myself have seen this happen between 
two tribes which did not speak the same language, and develop to such a 
point that only the names of the moieties were missing for there to be a 
characteristic and definite dual organization . 4 

These considerations perhaps provide an answer to a recent polemic on 
the unique or multiple origin of dual organization. Against Olson, who 
supports the former interpretation , 5 Lowie points out that institutions which 
are to all appearances heterogeneous are confused under the title of dual 
organization . 6 In North America alone the Iroquois have exogamous 
moieties consisting of several clans; the Hidatsa, non-exogamous moieties 
but also consisting of several clans; the Fox and the Yuchi, non-exogamous 
moieties, organized without any reference to clans; the Crow and the Kansas, 
indeterminate phratries; the Creek, ceremonial and non-exogamous moieties; 
the Keres and the Tewa, ceremonial moieties, tending to endogamy with 
the transfer of the wife to the husband’s moiety if she does not belong there 
in the first place; and so on. In short, the one common characteristic of 
moieties is that there are two of them, and the duality is called upon to play 

1 Lowie, 1961, p. 133. 2 ibid. 1934, p. 325. 3 ibid. 1924, p. 87. 

4 L£vi-Strauss, 19436; legend, as has been seen, attributes the same origin to the Mundu- 

rucu clans (cf. note 2, previous page). 

5 Olson, 1933, pp. 351-422. 



6 Lowie, 1961. 




Dual Organization 75 

highly varying roles as the circumstances require. Sometimes it governs 
marriages, economic exchanges and ritual, sometimes just some of these, 
and sometimes only sporting contests. There would thus appear to be as 
many different institutions as there are distinguishable modalities. Lowie 
even goes so far as to treat systems with patrilineal moieties and systems 
with matrilineal moieties, systems with exogamous moieties and systems with 
non-exogamous moieties, as virtually independent ‘species’. 1 

The American sociologist is no doubt right in attacking certain abuses. 
Yet this attack must extend to the very nature of these abuses. Olson and his 
predecessors, principally Perry, 2 were doubly wrong. They defined dual 
organization in the most complex and most developed form that it is capable 
of attaining, and whenever they observed a hint or embryo of dualism they 
interpreted it as a vestige of this complex form and as a sign of its former 
existence. In that case, as Lowie once jokingly observed, the duality of 
political parties in the United States might be the survival of a former dual 
organization in which Democrats and Republicans acted as moieties. 

But if dual organization rarely reaches the institutional stage, it neverthe- 
less has to do with the same psychological and logical roots as all those 
sketchy or partial forms, sometimes simply outlines, which are formulations 
of the principle of reciprocity for the same reason (though not always as 
systematically) as dual organization is just such a formulation. Accordingly, 
dual organization is not in the first place an institution. If we wished to 
interpret it in this way, our search for its beginning and its end would be 
doomed as hopeless, and we would risk being thrown back on Lowie’s 
atomism and nominalism. It is, above all, a principle of organization, 
capable of widely varying and, in particular, of more or less elaborated, 
applications. In some cases, the principle applies only to sporting compe- 
tition. In others, it extends to political life (and the question of whether the 
two-party system is not an indication of dualism can be put without fear 
of absurdity), in others again, to religious and ceremonial life. Finally, it 
may extend to the marriage system. In all these forms, there is a difference 
of degree, not of kind ; of generality, and not of type. To understand their 
common basis, inquiry must be directed to certain fundamental structures 
of the human mind, rather than to some privileged region of the world or 
to a certain period in the history of civilization. 

It has been pointed out that we are ignorant of the origin and evolution of 
dual organizations, as well as their forms of decomposition. However, must 
the edict setting them up in some particular case be known for their functional 
validity to be affirmed ? Inversely, must certain definite cases of dual organi- 
zations having undergone changes due entirely to contingent events such as 
wars, migrations, internal struggles, and so on, necessarily lead to the affir- 
mation of their historical origin? American ethnologists were pleased to 
show how interpretations which are too theoretical can come to grief, when 

1 ibid. 1940, p. 427. 2 Perry, 1923. 




76 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

it was established that the number and distribution of exogamous units 
in certain systems had varied in a relatively short space of time. They con- 
cluded that such unstable structures elude all systematic analysis. 1 But this 
is to confuse the principle of reciprocity, which is always at work and always 
oriented in the same direction, with the often brittle and almost always 
incomplete institutional structures continually used by it to realize the same 
ends. The contrast, the apparent contradiction, we might almost say, between 
the functional permanence of systems of reciprocity, and the contingency of 
the institutional matter placed at their disposal by history, and moreover 
ceaselessly reshaped by it, is supplementary proof of the instrumentality of 
these systems. Whatever the changes, the same force is always at work, and 
it is always to the same effect that it organizes the elements offered or aban- 
doned to it. 

In this respect, discussion is no substitute for the three examples analysed 
in the following pages. They are drawn from three different regions, and 
reveal, firstly, how dual organization can arise, secondly, the crises to which 
it is exposed, and thirdly, the specific modifications which it causes in a 
social system which may be observed independently of its action. 



hi 

The Motu and the Koita of New Guinea were originally two different tribes. 
Nevertheless, they tended to bring their villages together. The new village 
was either formed simply from two groups of houses, or the two villages 
remained distinct although contiguous. In certain cases, the Motu penetrated 
into Koita territory, and in others the opposite happened. However, marriage 
exchanges have in general been so frequent that it is difficult to find ‘in the 
eastern moiety any considerable number of people of Koita blood who have 
remained pure for three generations’. 2 In particular, the social structure is 
so organized that one may no longer dare to distinguish the legacy of history 
from the conscious or unconscious ends of the system. Thus the centre of 
Poreporena today consists of four villages grouped into two sub-divisions, 
each comprising a Koita village and a Motu village. 



Hohodai (K.) ^ 

Hanuabada (M.) r 

Tanobada (M.) \ 

Guriu (K.) f 



Hanuabada 



Tanobada 




Poreporena 



The reasons for each particular migration are to be found in demographic, 
political, economic or seasonal circumstances. Nevertheless, the general 
result gives proof of integrating forces which are independent of such 
1 Lowie. 1940; Kroeber, 1938, pp. 305 -7. 2 Seligman, 1910, p. 45 et seq. 




Dual Organization 



77 



conditions, and under the influence of which history has tended towards 
system. 

The Mekeo, also studied by Seligman, provide an even more striking 
example. The plan of their social organization is a subtle and complex 
symmetry, and the historical vicissitudes to which its component elements 
have been exposed have never succeeded in abating its strictness. Legend 
connects the origin of the Mekeo with successive migrations caused in the 
first place by a quarrel as to the ongoye bird’s laugh, which some said was 
oral and others supposed to be anal. In addition to the fights between factions 
and migrations, apparently alluded to in this legend, Seligman cites war, 
revenge, and transfers of territory. The history of the Inawi and Inawae 
villages is crammed full of such factors . 1 

And yet the villages coincide with social units whose nature, number and 
distribution cannot be the mere results of chance. The Mekeo are divided 
into two groups, OJ'a and Vee. Each group is in turn subdivided into two 
ngopu , meaning ‘group of common descent', and named Inawi and Inawae 
for the Of a, and Ngangai and Kuapengi for the Vee. Each ngopu consists 
of one. two or several pangua , clans or local groups within the village, while 
the clan is divided into sections, each characterized by a men’s house or ufu. 

To a certain extent it is known how a pangua subdivides and gives rise to 
new units. A pangua normally consists of several ikupu or enlarged families. 
An ikupu can acquire a jural personality by proclaiming itself the ‘younger 
section’ ( ekei ) of a pangua , and the other ikupu of the pangua are then known 
as the ‘older section’ ( jaangiau ). It can also break completely with its clan 
and found a new pangua. There is a third process of subdivision whereby 
the pangua gives rise to two groups, on the one hand faa aui or lopia aui , 
which is always a segment of the older section and includes the political 
chief, and, on the other, io aui, which can be a segment of the younger 
section but always includes the war chief. Demographic pressure, internal 
quarrels, economic inequalities, political ambition or the desire for prestige, 
seem to be the principal motives in these processes of fission, and Seligman 
gives detailed examples of them . 2 

And yet, each pangua , or ikupu group within the pangua , maintains a 
particular type of relationship with certain pangua, or ikupu groups in the 
same or different pangua. Pangua or ikupu interjoined by this special tie are 
called ufuapie, or ‘men's house from the other side of the village'. The 
ufuapie exchange prestations which are economic, legal, matrimonial, 
religious, or ceremonial as the case may be, and it is no exaggeration to say 
that the ufuapie relationship is the regulating principle for the whole social 
life of the Mekeo. In one sense, then, the ufuapie structure is the final cause 
of the complex system of ngopu , pangua, ikupu and ufu. There is so much 
truth in this that, in referring to the native theory which reduces the disorder 
and apparent confusion of present-day groups to two sections ( Biofa and 

1 ibid. pp. 315 -19. 2 ibid. pp. 328-46. 




78 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

Vee), each consisting in two ngopu which arc ufuapie in relationship to one 
another, Seligman, at the end of a detailed analysis, acknowledges that 
‘the conditions actually existing . . . are almost exactly those required by the 
hypothesis founded upon native history’. 1 

Thus the social structure of the Mekeo has been modified by two factors, 
firstly, by migratory movements which have introduced allogeneous elements, 
and secondly, by an internal tendency: ‘There is, and apparently always has 
been, a centrifugal tendency which, with the absence of a central dominating 
authority, has permitted the formation of a large number of pangua by 
fission from the parent stock.’ 2 The ancient organization of the Biofa and the 
Vee, each divided into two exogamous moieties with reciprocal prestations, 
has been complicated and diversified. However, it is still revealed in the 
ufuapie relationship, which can be explained less as a historical survival than 
as a regulating principle which, though no doubt imperfectly, has nevertheless 
continued to exist. 



iv 

This respective independence of the principle of reciprocity and the temporary 
institutions in which it is expressed, whatever the society and whatever the 
moment in its history, stand out equally clearly among the Naga of Assam. 
Their northern and eastern representatives, the Konyak, are divided into 
two linguistic groups, Thendu and Thenkoh, and are also distinguished by 
peculiarities of clothing. Both groups are endogamous, whether they live in 
the same village 3 or in different villages. 4 But each village has a men’s house 
or morung, some having two, others more. Each morung corresponds to a 
khel or subdivision of the village, and groups together several hierarchized 
clans among which marriage is forbidden. In certain cases at least, then, the 
morung functions as an exogamous unit. Nevertheless, the existence of clan 
exogamy does not prejudice the exogamy of the morung, and in certain villages, 
Wakching for example, the morung are coupled to form two exogamous 
pairs, viz., Oukheang and Thepong, on the one hand, and Balang and Bala 
on the other. Marriage is concluded by an exchange of gifts between the 
bridegroom and his parents-in-law ‘which is repeated at intervals until his 
death and in some cases for even longer’ . 5 This system of prestations between 
morung regulates the whole economic and ceremonial life of villages practising 
it. Thus, ‘the morung of the Konyak Nagas are the centres of village life and 
the pillars of their social and political organization. The morung system 
regulates the relations of every man and woman with the other members of 
the community, and forms a framework for the numerous mutual obligations 
between individuals and groups. It strengthens the sense of social unity . . . 
and at the same time encourages competition . . . thus stimulating the 
activities of the whole village.’ 6 

1 Seligman, 1910, p. 352. 2 ibid. p. 367. 3 Hutton, 1921ft, p. 114 ct seq. 

4 von Fiirer-Haimendorf, 1938. 5 ibid. p. 362. 6 ibid. p. 376. 




79 



Dual Organization 

This basic system of reciprocal rights and duties is at the constant mercy of 
conflicts and quarrels which necessitate a complete reorganization of the 
structure. According to custom, the Thepong boys once rebuilt the yo (the 
girls’ dormitory) for the Bala girls. They thus acquired the privilege of 
courting these Bala girls in the yo. The Thepong boys became aware that the 
girls also received visits from some Ang-ban boys who had no such right. 
Their reproaches being ineffectual, the Thepong invaded the yo and cut 
down the bamboo bed platforms. The girls, outraged, then demanded a fine, 
which the boys refused to pay unless the girls also paid a fine for having 
illegally received the Ang-ban. Tempers were lost on both sides, and relations 
were completely broken off between the Thepong boys and the Bala girls. 
The two groups no longer sing or dance together, they go separately to the 
fields, and they no longer exchange gifts. In these circumstances, the Ang-ban 
clan has maintained good relations with both the Thepong and the Bala, 
and by interposing itself between the two has prevented interruption of the 
circuit of prestations. For their part, the Bala and Thepong have opened 
a new cycle of relationships with other morung} 

Another incident, which its narrators traced back to the beginning of 
the century, is equally typical. The men of the Bala morung had made them- 
selves unpopular because of their arrogance and quarrelsome nature. One 
day one of them fell into a game pit dug by a man from Chingtang, and 
died from his wounds. Although this was only an accident, the Bala swore 
to take revenge. The other morung intervened with the Bala, asking that they 
be content with a heavy fine. The Chingtang said they were quite willing to 
pay, but the Bala refused, lay in ambush, and inadvertently killed a Wakching 
woman instead of the Chingtang they were expecting. 

The other morung then lost their patience and demanded that the 
Bala should deliver the two culprits to Wakching, in order to avoid a war 
between the two villages. However, the culprits escaped, and the Bala 
satisfied Wakching by buying a slave whose head served to avenge the 
murder. 

The incident might then seem to have been settled. However, relations 
between Bala and Thepong continued to worsen, and a quarrel about the 
rights in a certain song ended in an open fight. Both morung fought des- 
perately, not only with clubs, which are generally used in fights of this type, 
but also by throwing stones. The Bala even attacked their adversaries with 
spears and wounded several of them. Furious at such a violation of the 
rules, the Thepong killed a Bala. 

From then on all hope of peace was lost. The four morung, Oukheang, 
Thepong, Balang and Ang-ban, decided to finish once and for all with the 
trouble-makers. But since it is forbidden to destroy a khel of one’s own 
village, they asked the Ang of Chi to do the job for them. The Ang of Chi 
agreed on condition that the people of Wakching place one of Chi’s younger 

1 ibid. p. 364. 




8o 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

brothers at the head of their own Ang. It was in these circumstances that the 
Bala khel was burnt down and its members driven out. 

However, the Bala did not entirely disappear. Some found refuge among 
the Balang, although the latter had participated in the conspiracy. But the 
Balang had attacked the Bala as a different morung to their own, not as their 
fellow-clansmen in that morung. As such, the Bala had a right to be protected 
by the Balang, and knowing this took refuge only with those morung with 
which they could not intermarry, and not with their relatives-in-law. The 
Bala morung had disappeared, but a good half of its numbers were accepted 
among the Balang and treated as such. Only fifteen years later was the Bala 
morung rebuilt and reopened . 1 

There is no doubt that in most cases such events do account for the 
present-day form of a social structure, but it would be singularly shortsighted 
not to sec beyond this. Despite incident, conflict and destruction, the 
structures just considered still remain structures of reciprocity. Their true 
nature derives from those factors which cause them to survive as such, and 
not from the spasmodic history which continually forces them to readapt. 



The Yokut and the Western Mono of California provide just as striking an 
example, since here is a group in which only certain elements are aflccted 
by dual organization, and then not to the same extent. In particular, where 
this dual organization does exist, it is superimposed upon a more general 
form of organization which it specifies and amplifies without being incon- 
sistent with or replacing it. This general form of organization consists firstly 
in a system of patrilineages which it is agreed today is basic to the social life 
of Californian tribes, and secondly, in a continual demand for reciprocal 
prestations between persons, families, lineages, villages, or tribes: ‘On all 
occasions of . . . jubilance or sorrow' there was always a reciprocal group 
who supplied services or gifts which were balanced with gifts of equivalent 
value in the form of bead money, baskets, feather ornaments, furs, or 
foodstuffs .’ 2 Roughly speaking there are, on the one hand, groups (or more 
exactly partners, since relationships of reciprocity exist between two groups, 
two persons, or even a person and a group, as in the case of propitiatory 
rites to the totem of an animal which has been hunted and killed), and on 
the other, a network of bilateral relationships between these partners. At 
the same time, marriage is prohibited between all the ta.a'li or kin, including 
all cousins up to the second and sometimes even the third degree. 

What happens in the Mono or Yokut tribes which superimpose a division 
into moieties upon this general organization? Nothing changes and nothing 
is omitted, but the moieties do add something: firstly, a further type of 
correlative opposition with a function analogous to the previous types; 

1 von Furer-Haimcndorf, 1938, pp. 366-7. 2 Gay ton, 1945, p. 416. 




Dual Organization 8 1 

secondly, a principle of systematization allowing the grouping and simplifi- 
cation of the previous network of relationships; and, finally, a common 
method for handling relationships (such as marriage) which prior to this had 
not been consciously assimilated to reciprocity. 

The moieties, like the lineages, are patrilineal, and the grouping of the 
lineages into moieties does not prevent them from keeping their respective 
totems. Nevertheless, the totems acquire an order or arrangement which 
they previously lacked, for they too are divided between the two moieties. 
‘For example, the Tachi assigned Eagle, Crow, Falcon, etc., to the TokelyuwiS 
moiety, Bear, Raven, Coyote, etc., to the Nutuwis moiety.’ 1 A man whose 
patrilineage has the crow as its symbol is then both Crow (with respect to 
lineage) and Tokelyuwis (with respect to moiety). He shows the customary 
respect for his own symbol, and at least perfunctory respect for all other 
symbols of his moiety. Likewise, on ceremonial occasions, the bipartite 
tribes classify the products from collecting and hunting into Tokelyuwis 
(seeds and mushrooms) and Nutuwis (berries, birds, game). The moiety 
‘owning’ the food would collect the first fruits and offer them to the other 
moiety. This second moiety must take its share in order to lift the alimentary 
prohibition that would otherwise be imposed upon the first group. In the 
tribes without moieties redemption ceremonies for an animal killed during 
hunting are observed by the eponymous lineage. In tribes with moieties, 
these ceremonies become the business of one of the two principal divisions, 
the interested family having no more than an officiating role. 2 

There are other changes also. The official titles (‘chief’ and ‘messengers’) 
are the prerogative of the Eagle and Dove lineages in the tribes without 
moieties. In tribes with moieties, the Eagle lineage ( Tokelyuwis moiety) 
keeps the first place in the hierarchy. But a second chief, from the Coyote 
lineage, appears in the Nutuwis moiety, and the Eagle-Coyote duality 
becomes characteristic of the whole organization. In this way, authority 
acquires a dual structure that it otherwise lacks. But the marriage system 
merits special attention. There is no complete rupture with the rules pre- 
viously described. Cross-cousin marriage remains prohibited, and marriage 
within the moiety is possible when there is no known relation of kinship. 
However, a person tends to apply the term ta.a'ti to all members of his 
moiety. Moiety exogamy, without being compulsory, corresponds to a 
general tendency, 70 to 75 per cent of marriages among the Yokut being 
exogamous. The Yokut and Western Mono observe the annual mourning 
ceremony in conjunction with a neighbouring tribe which acts as partner 
for the exchange of prestations and counter-prestations. The guest tribe 
does not have to be the same one every year, but in tribes with moieties 
the reciprocal pairing must always be a Tokelyuwis moiety of the host tribe 
and a Nutuwis moiety of the guest tribe, or vice versa. However, reciprocity 
is not all embracing. It is not one moiety accepting another, but rather a 

1 ibid. p. 420. 2 ibid, pp 420-2. 




82 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

general principle applying to all the constituents (families and persons) of 
both the respective groups. The family of the host chief receives the family 
of the guest chief, and, depending upon their particular relationship, the 
families are thus grouped into host and guest pairings. Thus the principle 
remains whereby the lineage continues to be the fundamental social unit, 
cutting across hamlet, village, homogeneous tribe, or tribe divided into 
moieties . 1 

As the author of these observations rightly says, the Californian moieties 
are not crystallized institutions corresponding to rigorously defined concepts. 
Rather, they reveal a principle of reciprocal grouping, according to associated 
or opposed poles, of the very same constituents found among peoples without 
moieties in the same region, viz., the person, the family, the lineage, or the 
tribe. There is a general preponderance of the patrilineage, and where there 
are moieties these serve only to intensify and extend the mechanisms of 
reciprocity which arc equally characteristic of the whole region, without 
prejudice to the forms of organization which everywhere correspond to them . 2 

vi 

These facts tally with others which might have been added in revealing dual 
organization less as an institution with certain precise and identifiable 
features than as a method for solving multiple problems. It is from this 
multiplicity of content that dual organizations draw their apparent hetero- 
geneity. However, it would be wrong to confuse this basic diversity with the 
simple and constant form imposed upon it. On the contrary, the extreme 
generality of this form can be recognized without falling into those two traps 
of purely historical ideas, viz., general history and the monographic study. 

Even in societies where the clan (as defined above) is the predominant 
form or organization, rough outlines of classes can be seen appearing when 
the normal system does not provide any ready-made solution to unexpected 
problems. Few people seem so far removed from dual organization as the 
Ifugao of the Philippines, who prohibit marriage between first cousins, and, 
apart from exceptions, between second and third cousins. Furthermore, in 
the case of such exceptions, a special ritual beginning with a sham fight 
must be observed. The bridegroom’s family would proceed in arms to the 
bride's village, where her family, likewise armed, were waiting for them. 
The two groups would then start an argument more or less as Barton has 
reconstructed it : 3 

boy’s kindred: We have come for the debt you owe us. 

girl’s kindred: Debt? We owe you nothing. We borrow only within 
our own family! 

boy’s kindred : Is it lost? Have you forgotten? 



1 Gayton, 1945, pp. 420-4. 



2 ibid. p. 425. 



3 Barton, 1946, pp. 164-5. 




Dual Organization 83 

girl’s kindred: Yes, of course it’s lost because we never borrowed. 
Take your impudence to your own village and get out ! 
boy’s kindred: What? Are you quarrelsome? Well, let’s fight it out. 

A sham fight would then ensue, but with real weapons, and although the 
weapons were not aimed at anyone in particular, the natives recount that it 
was best for a man ‘to keep his eyes open because there might be bad shots’. 
A short time later someone would cry out: ‘Enough, enough! Let’s arrange 
it by an intermarriage, else a pity for our bodies.’ Rites of pacification would 
then be celebrated, followed by invocations to the gods and ancestors: 
‘Ye ancestors are involved because we who were enemies are making peace 
. . . Let not the children who introduce an intermarriage (to terminate their 
enmity) become rusty or fat-sided.’ 1 Consequently, for marriage to be possible 
within the exogamous group, there has to be a real, or at least, a simulated 
rupture of this group. This brings to mind those peoples of New Britain 
where the moieties are referred to as ‘the boundaries of marriage’, 2 or the 
people of Guadalcanal, who are divided into exogamous moieties, and who 
refer to marriage between members of the same division as having broken 
the moiety. 3 In Africa, as we have seen, the same mechanisms have a very 
general field of application. 

This functional aspect of dual organization is not always as obvious as 
in the following example from a region where marriage is usually concluded 
between villages, and where the whole village helps pay the price for the 
marriage of each of its members. However, 

‘in one village where marriage within the village had occurred a row of 
logs across the centre of the village divided it into halves. These halves 
acted to each other with all the forms used between separate villages 
connected by marriage ... In validating the marriage of another of their 
village members who had married normally outside the village both halves 
sank their division and worked together, the one for the other’s business 
and reciprocally co-operating and pooling their wealth, instead of halving 
it and exchanging their half’s respective pools, as they did when validating 
the marriage within the village.’ 4 

Thus we can see emerge, on a purely empirical level, the notions of opposition 
and correlation basic to the definition of the dualistic principle, which is 
itself only one modality of the principle of reciprocity. 



1 loc cit 

3 Hogbin, 1937, p. 78. 



3 Trevitt, 1939, p. 355. 

4 Fortune, 1932, pp. 60-1. 




CHAPTER VII 



The Archaic Illusion 

i 

Up till now we have sought, though no doubt provisionally and schematically, 
to define certain very general frameworks of social life with which that 
universal institution, the prohibition of incest, and the various systems for 
regulating marriage, which are its modalities, might be connected. We are 
still at the stage of outlining and putting these frameworks into perspective, 
and it is not yet time to offer a complete proof of them. This proof is to be 
found in the book as a whole and is to be judged by the degree of coherency 
with which the facts have been interpreted. Nevertheless, we should pause 
and reflect for a moment on our premises. To assert, as we did in the last 
chapter, that a historical or geographical study could not exhaust the problem 
of the origin of dual organizations, and that for a better understanding of 
these organizations we must take into consideration certain fundamental 
structures of the human mind, would be a meaningless proposition if we 
were unable to perceive exactly how these structures were made up and what 
the method was by which we might apprehend and analyse them. Without 
wishing to undertake a task for which the sociologist is as yet imperfectly 
prepared, we believe a cursory look in this direction is essential, and it will 
be more than enough if the first results indicate that this undertaking is not 
completely without purpose. 

What are the mental structures to which we have referred and the univer- 
sality of which we believe can be established? It seems there are three: the 
exigency of the rule as a rule ; the notion of reciprocity regarded as the most 
immediate form of integrating the opposition between the self and others; 
and finally, the synthetic nature of the gift, i.e., that the agreed transfer of a 
valuable from one individual to another makes these individuals into partners, 
and adds a new quality to the valuable transferred. The question of the origin 
of these structures will be taken up later. Whether or not they can account 
for the phenomena can only be answered from the whole work. Our sole 
intention at this point is to find out if they do exist, and to grasp them in 
their concrete and universal reality. Moreover, it is to this end that in the 
setting up of our hypothesis we have so far purposely avoided exceptional 
examples, or examples which, because their realization in some native society 



84 




The Archaic Illusion 



85 

or other has been pushed to a very high degree of perfection, appear excep- 
tional. By referring to our own society and to what appear to be trifling 
daily incidents, in an attempt to isolate certain basic structures, we have 
already outlined a demonstration of their generality. 

But there is one field of experience which is even more universal than that 
resulting from the comparison of manners and customs. This is the field of 
infant thought, which provides a common basis of mental structures and 
schemes of sociability for all cultures, each of which draws on certain 
elements for its own particular model. Observations made on infant psy- 
chology reveal, in a concrete and striking form, mechanisms which, corres- 
ponding as they do to needs and very basic forms of activity and which for 
this reason are buried in the deepest recesses of the mind, are somewhat 
difficult to arrive at through theoretical analysis. These are apparent in 
the child not because his mind represents an alleged ‘stage’ of intellectual 
development, but because his experience has been less influenced than an 
adult’s by the particular culture to which he belongs. Susan Isaacs's obser- 
vations are particularly valuable from this point of view. 

She begins by emphasizing ‘the strength and urgency of the common wish 
of little children to have exclusive possession or at least the biggest share or 
main use of whatever properties are the centre of interest at the moment. 
The satisfaction of having things all one's own is deep, the chagrin at others 
having more than oneself very bitter .' 1 This attitude is felt not only for 
material objects, but also for immaterial rights, such as the hearing or 
singing of a song. Furthermore, ‘taking turns’ is one of the hardest lessons 
for children under five years to learn. All that the child ‘knows is that the 
others “have got it”, and he hasn’t. A few minutes is an eternity when one 
is eagerly waiting ’. 2 

Few ethnographic analyses arc as engrossing as those of this author in her 
disentangling of the psychological mechanisms by which the notion of 
arbitration or intervention comes to be imposed on the infant mind. Susan 
Isaacs notes, with regard to a quarrel between two children about the ex- 
clusive use of a tricycle, ‘that neither child was willing to accept arbitration 
until she had proved conclusively her inability to gain her will ... by her 
own efforts '. 3 And she adds: ‘Here the two children could teach each other 
that lesson, because they were so equally matched in power and persistence .’ 4 
This is the interpretation : 

‘If my enjoyment has to suffer limitations for someone else’s pleasure, 
then I must have at the least as much as he. If / cannot be supreme, we 
must all be equal. My wish for exclusive possession is tamed by my fear 
of his encroachments and the hope that if I admit to equal rights he will 
take no more .’ 5 

1 Isaacs, 1933, p. 221. 2 ibid. p. 223. 3 loc. cit. 

4 loc. cit. 5 loc. cit. 




86 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

In other words: ‘Equality is the least common multiple to these conflicting 
wishes and fears.’ 1 

If this psychological development is possible, it is because, as Susan Isaacs 
has very clearly perceived, the desire to possess is not an instinct, and is never 
based (or very rarely) on an objective relationship between the subject and 
the object. What gives the object its value is the ‘relation to the other person \ 2 
Only food has any intrinsic value for someone who is starving. But few 
objects afford a constant interest at all times and in all circumstances. ‘What 
is so desperately desired may be wanted only because someone else has 
it.’ 3 An important object assumes ‘great value ... if another person begins 
to take an interest in it’. 4 

The desire to possess ‘is essentially a social response’. 5 And this response 
should be ‘understood in terms of power -or, rather, of powerlessness. I want 
to own it because if I do not it may not be there when 1 need it. . . . If another 
has it, he may keep it for ever.’ 6 Hence, there is no contradiction between 
property and community, between monopoly and sharing, between the 
arbitrary and arbitration. All these terms designate the various modalities 
of one tendency, or of one primitive need, the need for security. 

It can thus be said that the capacity for sharing or ‘taking turns’ is a 
function of the growing feeling of reciprocity, itself the result of a living 
experience of the collective fact, and of the deeper mechanism of identification 
with another. 7 

‘One of the commonest and naivest grounds for feeling friendly to other 
children is gratitude for gifts received.’ But children ‘do not so much love 
for the gift, as feel that the gift is love. They love for the giving, even more 
than for the gift. Both giving and gift are to them love itself.’ 8 

Hence, ‘the making and receiving of gifts remains the clearest, most 
unequivocal sign of love. ... In a thousand ways, every patient shows that 
the deepest layer of meaning of “being loved’’ is still receiving a gift; and the 
primal meaning of being hated is being deprived, being robbed, since to the 
infant this means being destroyed.’ 9 Beyond the intrinsic value of the thing 
given, there is the gift itself as a sign of love, and beyond that, the gift as a 
sign of the fact of being worthy of love: 

‘He who is denied feels that he has been denied because he is bad, because 
he is or has been hostile to the giver. This it is which brings poignancy to 
the child’s gratitude for gifts, and bitterness to his sense of loss when he 
is left out of the giving. The gift is not only a sign that the giver loves and 
does not hate; it is also a sign that the recipient is believed to be loving, 
not hating and hateful.’ 10 

This explains the child's desire to make enormous and magnificent gifts, 
‘a polar bear ... a real one’, ‘a big large engine’. It is essentially a wish to be 

' Isaacs, 1933, pp. 223-4. 2 loc. cit. 3 loc. cit. 4 loc. cit. 9 ibid. p. 225. 

6 loc. cit. 7 ibid. p. 276. 8 ibid. p. 272. * ibid. pp. 272-3. ,0 ibid. p. 273. 




The Archaic Illusion 



8 7 

potent in giving: ‘If one has “big large engines” to give away, one is indeed both 
safe and good. One is no longer the helpless puling infant, dependent upon the 
gifts of others, and driven by helpless anxieties to rage and jealousy. ... It is 
more blessed to give than to receive, because to be able to give is not to need.' 1 

These feelings apply to services, too: ‘How warmly the children appreciated 
services done them . . . Tommy . . . calls out to the children who are 
jointly carrying a large plant pot “Don’t go too quickly, so that I can help”.’ 
Such is the intensity of the ‘great pleasure from being able (i.e., powerful 
enough) to be unselfish ’. 2 

But this apparent generosity is merely the transposition of an initial 
situation which should not be overlooked. One loves, one hates; or more 
exactly, one loves because one hates: ‘All children . . . feel other children 
to be actual or potential rivals .’ 3 Children waver continually between 
desperate love and fierce hatred: ‘There is no balanced feeling, no stable 
attitude .’ 4 The steady friendship relationship begins only with the establish- 
ment of a steady hatred for someone else, and this may be spoken of as ‘the 
reciprocal relation between loving one’s friends and hating one’s enemies ’. 5 
But hostility is still the primitive and fundamental attitude. ‘It is hostility 
which provides the drama in the lives of little children, as in that of adults .’ 6 
There is no need for us either to compare this infantile attitude towards 
gifts with the attitude of the Eskimo shamans that ‘presents give strength ’, 7 
or to recall the Hindu marriage hymn, ‘It is love which has given her, it is 
to love that she has been given, etc.’, to which we shall return later , 8 to show 
that we are not completely digressing here. Ethnographic inquiry could 
provide an almost unlimited commentary on all the preceding observations : 
an appeal to the rule to escape the intolerable suspense of the arbitrary; 
the desperate need for security which entails that one should never promise 
too much to another, and that one be ready to give everything to gain the 
assurance of not losing everything, and of receiving in one’s turn; the 
personalization of the gift; the correlative opposition between the notions 
of antagonism and reciprocity ; the division of beings into friends, to whom 
nothing is refused, and enemies: ‘I shall take the first opportunity of killing 
him for fear he will kill me .’ 9 All these attitudes reveal such a close analogy- 
except when pushed to its ultimate conclusions -between infant society and 
so-called primitive society that we cannot exempt ourselves from seeking 
reasons for them without running the risk of the most tragic mistakes. 

ii 

The problem of the relationship between primitive and infant thought is 

1 ibid. p. 274. 2 loc. cit. 3 ibid. p. 231. 4 ibid. p. 251. 5 ibid. p. 252. 

« ibid. p. 266. 7 Birket-Smith, 1936, p. 172. 8 cf. ch. XXIX. 

9 Radcliffe-Brown, 1913, p. 151. Compare with the observations of Searl (1932, vol. II, 
pp. 276-95), who describes among children the same pressing dichotomy being applied to 
beings and things. 




88 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



not new, and has been posed in almost hard-and-fast terms by authors as 
divergent in other respects as the psychoanalysts and certain psychologists 
such as Blondel and Piaget. It is indeed tempting to sec primitive society as 
approximating more or less metaphorically to man’s infant state. The 
principal stages of this state, for both man in general and man the individual, 
would then also reappear in the intellectual development of the child. Freud 
was repeatedly attracted to this schema , 1 and some of his students accepted 
it categorically: ‘Freud has shown that the sexual theories of children are a 
phylogenetic heritage .’ 2 Roheiin's handling of this interpretation is well- 
known. Blondel's work compares primitive, infant, and morbid conscious- 
ness, and constantly treats them as interchangeable realities . 3 

In this regard, Piaget’s attitude is more subtle, but often lacks clarity. He 
unearths magic, animism and myths in infant thought, and he remarks that 
as regards sacrifice, analogies between the thought of the child and the 
primitive can be expected at every step . 4 Nevertheless, he believes that the 
child's idea of ‘participation’ differs from that of the primitive .' 1 However, 
he admits to ‘a certain parallelism between ontogeny and phylogeny’, but 
‘we have never dreamt of seeing child thought as an hereditary product of 
the primitive mentality’, for ‘ontogeny explains phylogeny, as much as the 
imerse'. Nevertheless, Piaget maintains that ‘child thought has a different 
structure from the adult's ’, 6 and at times the attraction of phylogeny seems 
to carry him away: 



‘Our belief that the day will come when child thought will be placed on 
the same level in relation to adult, normal, and civilized thought, as 
“primitive mentality”, defined by Levy-Bruhl, as autistic and symbolical 
thought as described by Freud and his disciples, and as “morbid con- 
sciousness” in the event of this last concept, which we owe to Blondel, 
being eventually identified with the former .’ 7 



It is true he immediately adds: ‘But we must beware of the danger of drawing 
parallels in which functional divergences are forgotten .’ 8 This is wise and 
prudent advice that one would like to see followed more systematically. 

Indeed, any foolhardy attempt at assimilation would run up against the 
very simple fact that not only are there children, primitives and lunatics, but 
also primitive children and primitive lunatics, and both primitive and civilized 
psychopathic children. This objection is valid, firstly against recent studies 
devoted to ‘primitive’ children, so-called not because they belong to different 
societies from ours, but because they reveal an inability to carry out certain 
logical processes. Moreover, these studies reveal a difference and not a 

1 cf. for example, Totem and Taboo , chs. II and IV. 

2 Klein, 1932, pp. 188, 196. Similarly, ‘schizophrenic logic is identical with primitive, 
magical thinking, that is, with a form of thinking that also is found in the unconscious 
of neurotics, in small children, in normal persons under conditions of fatigue, as “ante- 
cedents” of thought, and in primitive man’. Fenichel, 1945, p. 421 ; cf. also p. 46 et seq. 

3 Blondel, 1914. 4 Piaget, 1929, pp. 88 and 138-40. s ibid. p. 132. 

b ibid. 1928a, pp. 38 40. 7 ibid. 19286, p. 256. » loc. cit. 




The Archaic Illusion 



89 

resemblance between the anomalies of infant thought and normal primitive 
thought: ‘Contrary to the magical thinking of a primitive man when the 
connexion between ideas is mistaken for the connexion between things, in 
this case the child takes the connexion between things for the connexion 
between ideas .’ 1 

It is unnecessary to emphasize that primitive societies are composed, 
as ours is, of children and adults, and that the problem facing them of 
relationships between the two age groups is no different from ours. Primitive 
children differ from primitive adults, just as these differences exist among 
civilized peoples, and contemporary ethnology and psychology arc devoting 
an increasing number of studies to them . 2 Some particularly striking examples 
of this can be found in a fine native autobiography which allows the laborious 
adaptation of a Hopi child to the demands of his particular culture to be 
followed step by step . 3 

The extent to which normal child thought differs irreducibly from normal 
adult thought in any given society remains moreover open to controversy. 
It has been noted that a child, of whatever age, may be incapable of per- 
ceiving the relative nature of a certain idea, while being perfectly able to 
grasp the same characteristic in some other idea. Young children often 
demonstrate indirectly that they have acquired the idea of relationship as 
such well before the eleven or twelve age-limit indicated by Piaget . 4 The 
relation of opposition seems to be acquired spontaneously from the eighth 
or ninth year, and one out of every two children can formulate it when he is 
five . 5 Inversely, Piaget’s experiments were repeated on nineteen-year-old 
subjects, and the results obtained were identical with those provided by 
subjects six or seven years of age . 6 Even Buhler, who said he was prepared 
to use infantile language to reconstruct the history of human language, 
restricts the philosophical import of such an undertaking to its just pro- 
portions when he says: 

‘[The influence of ancient logic] has been exaggerated and given an un- 
justifiable place in the development of the individual and mankind in 
general. I am of the opinion that the ethnology of today, applied to some 
psychological data of the child and some quite sound general considerations 
. . . would be in a position to demonstrate that the theory commencing 
with this sentence: “In the beginning flourished ancient logic pure and 
whole”, commits the fault of hysteron proteron .’ 7 

The conclusions reached by Wallon 8 are almost identical to those of 
Guillaume : 

1 Vygotski, 1929, p. 425. 

2 Dennis, 1940a, pp. 202-18; 19406, pp. 305-17; 1941; Griaule, 1938; Kluckhohn, 
1939; 1945; Leighton and Kluckhohn, 1948. 

3 Simmons, 1942. 4 Deshaies, 1937, pp. 113, 131. 

5 Kreezer and Dallenbach, 1929, pp. 432-41. 6 Abel, 1932, pp. 123-32. 

7 Buhler, 1933, pp. 1 18-19. 8 Wallon, 1934. 




90 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

‘There is no need to believe in some mysterious internal necessity whereby 
the development of the individual must pass through all the tortuous paths 
of history . . . Ontogenic “repetition” is a spurious history only: it is 
rather a selection of models offered by the language in its actual state.’ 1 

Doubtless Piaget has always sought to protect himself from possible 
reproaches of this type, but his general scheme of interpretation is not 
proof against criticism. A recent quotation, which I believe should not be 
abridged, clearly summarizes its uncertainty. Affirming the existence of 
convergences ‘more numerous than it would seem’ between ‘the clearly 
conceptual thought of the child and the thought of primitive or ancient 
societies’, Piaget writes: 

‘Wc can, however, refer to the striking resemblances between the be- 
ginnings of rational thought in the child of from seven to ten and in the 
Greeks. We find, for example, explanation by identification of substances 
(stars which are produced by air or clouds, air and earth coming from 
water, etc.), by atomism resulting from this identification and the use of 
the ideas of condensation and rarefaction, and even the exact explanation 
of certain movements by reaction of the air (avnirtpioTaai^) used by 
Aristotle. Are we then to conclude that the archetypes which inspired 
the beginnings of Greek physics are inherited by the child? In our opinion 
it is infinitely simpler merely to assume that the same genetic mechanisms 
which account for the development of the thought of the child today were 
in action also in the minds of those who, like the pre-Socratics, were just 
emerging from mythological and pre-logical thought. As for the schema 
of “reaction of the air”, it seems to have been borrowed by Aristotle 
from current representations, which may have been as widespread in a 
civilization prior to mechanization as they are among the children of today. 

To sum up, where there is convergence between the thought of the child 
and historical representations, it is much easier to explain the latter by 
the general laws of infantile mentality than by reference to a mysterious 
heredity. However far back we go in history or pre-history, the child has 
always preceded the adult, and it can be assumed that the more primitive 
a society, the more lasting the influence of the child’s thought on the 
individual’s development, since such a society is not yet capable of trans- 
mitting or forming a scientific culture.’ 2 

This whole passage is a criticism of Jung’s hypothesis of the collective 
unconscious, but its interest for us is something else entirely. The author 
asserts that primitive societies are nearer to the infantile mentality than is 
our own. The facts we quoted at the beginning of the chapter seem to confirm 
this viewpoint. However, we believe that they must be given a different 
interpretation. 



1 Guillaume, 1927, p. 229. 



2 Piaget, 1951, pp. 197-8. 




The Archaic Illusion 



9 * 



Far from the logical thought of the child being irreducible to the thought 
of the adult, Isaacs establishes that the ‘cognitive behaviour of little children 
even in these early years, is after all very much like our own ’. 1 The notion of 
maturation which Piaget so constantly appeals to is ‘strictly confined to 
those aspects of growth which cannot be shown to be a function of ex- 
perience ’. 2 Basov reaches the same conclusion: 

‘In other terms, lower structures from the very beginning serve for the 
formation of higher ones. . . .Yet [this] . . . does not preclude the possi- 
bility of such lower structures’ being formed as such and remaining in this 
mould without any alteration. If environment did not place the child 
under conditions which require higher structures, perhaps the lower 
structures might be the only ones it would be able to produce .' 3 

It is interesting to see psychologists make independent but similar criticisms 
of the ‘primitive mentality’ thesis, and fundamentally Piaget’s formulation 
is no more than a formal equivalent of this thesis. Undoubtedly, there are 
some differences between primitive and civilized thought, but these are due 
solely to the fact that thought is always ‘situational’. The differences dis- 
appear as soon as the stimuli (social, economic, technical, ideological, etc.) 
change . 4 

Isaacs criticizes Piaget for using the concept of maturation - as an 
irreducible ‘structure’ of child thought - without sufficient precautions, and 
thus coming ‘to attribute to maturation certain phenomena which can be 
shown to be to a real extent a function of experience ’. 5 Symptoms of phases 
of development associated by Piaget with more advanced age groups are 
actually found in very young children under suitable conditions. In particular 
Piaget fails to answer the question, vital to the sociologist, of the origin of 
social development. He distinguishes broadly between four main phases in 
the development of the child, firstly, the period of autism, secondly that of 
egocentrism, and thirdly, social life proper which begins about the age of 
seven, during which the child learns to adapt himself to others and acquires 
knowledge of his own mental processes. The key to this development is 
held to be the appearance of ‘social instincts’ at seven to eight years. But as 
Isaacs notes, this appearance is a real mystery , and Piaget offers no psycho- 
logical interpretation at all for their genesis . 6 Freud has shown himself more 
clear-sighted in this regard, for these ‘social instincts’ undoubtedly have an 
individual history and a strictly psychological genesis, the roots of which 
plunge, not only into experience of the social world, but also into the 
pressure exercised by the physical world, which arouses an ardent and very 
positive interest in children who are less than five years old. 

‘Isaacs, 1930, p. 57. a ibid. p. 57. 3 Basov, 1929, p. 288. 4 Luria, 1934. 

5 Isaacs, 1930, p. 58. 6 ibid. pp. 77-8. 7 ibid. pp. 79 80. 




02 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



If the mind of the child is egocentric and precausai, it is so ‘in large part 
because of its ignorance and lack of organized experience . . . The child 
has not yet the organized body of knowledge to be able to resist being 
pushed back into the realm of fantasy and egocentricity, below relational 
thought .' 1 Two conclusions can be drawn from these remarks, firstly, that 
the child's thinking is substantially no different from the adult's; and, 
secondly, that all the elements of social life are present from the beginning 
of infant life: ‘The threads of social development can be traced backwards 
and forwards, and whilst the total picture at the age of, say, six or seven 
years is in many respects very different from that presented at, say, tw'o years, 
it is nowhere essentially new .' 2 

Consequently, it is not because children differ from adults both in their 
individual psychologies and in their social lives that they are of exceptional 
interest to the psychologist and sociologists, but because, and to the degree 
that, they resemble them. The child is not an adult, not in our society nor 
in any other. In all societies the level of child thought is equally remote from 
the adult level of thinking, such that the distinction between the tw'o might 
be said to cut along the same line in all cultures and all forms of organization. 
No coincidence can ever be established between the two levels, even if 
examples are chosen as distant in time and place as one could wish. The most 
primitive culture is still an adult culture, and as such is incompatible with 
infantile manifestations in even the most highly developed civilization. 
Likewise, psychopathological phenomena in the adult remain an adult fact 
with nothing in common with the normal thinking of the child. In our 
opinion, the examples of ‘regression' to which psychoanalysis has given so 
much attention must be considered in a new light. 

These examples - those which we ourselves have quoted at the beginning 
of this chapter, and those upon which Jung has based his theory of the 
collective unconscious - are impossible to interpret and can lead only to 
incredible or contradictory hypotheses if recognition is not given to the 
fact that adult and infantile thought differ in extension rather than in 
structure. Let us allow, once and for all, that a child is not an adult. But let 
us remain loyal to this assertion and not proceed to contradict it, as so many 
psychologists and psychiatrists seem to have done, by insinuating that the 
thinking of a civilized child resembles the thought of a primitive adult, or 
that the thinking of a normal child resembles that of an adult lunatic. Every 
field-worker who has had concrete experience of primitive children will 
undoubtedly agree that the opposite is more likely to be true and that in 
many regards the primitive child appears far more mature and positive than 
a child in our own society, and is to be compared more with a civilized adult. 
But this is not the question. 

Once the distinction between the child and adult has been propounded - 
and, as we have seen, it must not be overestimated - what is the basic 

1 Isaacs, 1930, p. 94. 2 ibid. 1933, p. 388. 




The Archaic Illusion 




relationship to he established between their respective mental manifes- 
tations? Adult thinking is built around a certain number of structures which 
it specifies, organizes, and develops from the single fact of this specialization, 
and which are only a fraction of the initial summary and undifferentiated 
structures in the child’s thought. In other words, the mental schemata of the 
adult diverge in accordance with the culture and period to which he belongs. 
However, they are all derived from a universal resource which is infinitely 
more rich than that of each particular culture. Every newborn child provides 
in embryonic form the sum total of possibilities, but each culture and period 
of history will retain and develop only a chosen few' of them. Every newborn 
child comes equipped, in the form of adumbrated mental structures, with all 
the means ever available to mankind to define its relations to the world in 
general and its relations to others. But these structures are exclusive. Each 
of them can integrate only certain elements out of all those that are offered. 
Consequently, each type of social organization represents a choice, which 
the group imposes and perpetuates. In comparison with adult thought, which 
has chosen and rejected as the group has required, child thought is a sort of 
universal substratum the crystallizations of which have not yet occurred, 
and in w hich communication is still possible between incompletely solidified 
forms. 



Can this hypothesis be proved? We shall merely indicate the direction 
in which we believe it could be verified. The first stage would have a still 
negative validity, viz., that the thinking of the child appears from the earliest 
years with characteristics which are completely and integrally human, and 
this serves to separate them entirely from animal activity. The difficulties 
are well known which Brainard encountered when he wanted to repeat on 



his little daughter the experiments that Kohler conducted with monkeys, 
for example, to put a candy outside a window and see whether the child 
would discover a way of reaching it. But the experiments are impracticable, 
because the child reacts socially. Instead of trying, the child protests: ‘Hi! 
Daddy, get it!’ The father’s attitude is thought perverse, and the theoretical 
problem can only be resolved later. As Brainard puts it: ‘The chief difference 
between these experiments and those of Kohler lies in the fact that the child 
has already a high social development, particularly in the use of language 
and in getting others to do things for her .’ 1 In fact, all the experiments are 



turned into discussions such as T can’t’, ‘Yes you can’, ‘It’s too hard’, etc.; 
and when the child succeeds, she says to her father: ‘I’m fooling on you . 



If we have recalled these facts it is because learning a language presents 
the same problems as the infant’s first steps into social life, and because 
these problems have received the same solution. The variety of sounds 
that the speech organs can articulate is almost unlimited. However, each 
language retains only a very small number of all the possible sounds. During 
the prattling period, before the introduction to articulated language, the 



1 Brainard, 1930, p. 268. 





94 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

child produces the total range of sound realizable in human language while 
his own particular language will retain only some of them. In the first few 
months of its life every child has been able to emit sounds which later he will 
find very difficult to reproduce, and which he will fail to imitate satisfactorily 
when he learns languages very different from his own . 1 Every language makes 
a selection and from one viewpoint this selection is regressive. Once this 
selection is made, the unlimited possibilities available on the phonetic plane 
are irremediably lost. On the other hand, prattling is meaningless, while 
language allows people to communicate with one another, and so utterance 
is inversely proportional to significance. 

Likewise, the multifarious structures outlined in the thought and attitudes 
of the child in the realm of inter-individual relations still have social value, 
since they constitute the raw material for the formation of heterogeneous 
systems. However, each of these systems can only retain a small number of 
them to have any functional value. It is through the child’s incorporation 
into his particular culture that this selection takes place. 

If this interpretation is correct, it must be allowed that infantile thought 
represents a sort of common denominator for all thoughts and all cultures. 
This is what Piaget has frequently expressed in speaking of the ‘syncretism’ of 
child thought, which, however, seems dangerous to us since it admits of two 
different interpretations. If by syncretism is meant a state of confusion and 
undifferentiation in which the child’s distinction between himself and another, 
between people and objects, and between the objects themselves, is poor, 
there is a risk of being content with a highly superficial view of things and 
overlooking the main point. This seeming ‘primitive undifferentiation’ is not 
so much an absence of differentiation as a different system of differentiation 
from ours, and furthermore the result of several systems being in co-existence, 
and the constant transition from one to another. But there are systems. 
The further we penetrate towards the deeper levels of mental life, the more 
we are presented with structures diminishing in number but increasing in 
strictness and simplicity. For this reason we should speak more readily of 
the ‘polymorphism’ of child thought, using this term as does the psycho- 
analyst when he describes a child as a ‘polymorphous pervert’. But what is 
really meant by this? It means that the child presents in a rudimentary form, 
and co-existently, all the types of eroticism among which the adult will seek 
his specialization on the normal or pathological plane. Considering the 
relationship between the social attitudes of the child and the different types 
of organization in human societies the anthropologist should be similarly 
inclined to say that the child is a ‘polymorphous socialite’. 

When we compare primitive and child thought, and see so many resem- 
blances between them, we are victims of a subjective illusion, which doubtless 
recurs whenever adults of one culture compare their children with adults 
of another culture. Indeed, being less specialized than the adult’s thinking, 

1 Jakobson, 1941. 




The Archaic Illusion 



95 

the thought of the child always provides the adult not only with a picture of 
his own synthesis, but also of all the syntheses possible elsewhere and under 
different circumstances. It is not surprising that in this ‘panmorphism’ the 
differences strike us more than the similarities, so that a society’s own 
children always provide the most convenient point of comparison with 
foreign customs and attitudes. In the normal course of things, customs varying 
greatly from our own always seem puerile. The reason for this prejudice 
has been shown, but it must be added that it deserves to be called such only 
in so far as we refuse to acknowledge that there are just as valid reasons 
why our own customs must appear in exactly the same light to outside 
observers. 

The analogies between primitive and child thought are not based on any 
so-called archaism of primitive thought, but merely on a difference of 
extension which makes child thought a sort of meeting place, or point of 
dispersion, for all possible cultural syntheses. The basic structures of primitive 
societies are better understood when compared with the social attitudes of 
our own children. But primitives do not abstain from the use of the same 
procedure, and from comparing us with their own children. Indeed, infantile 
attitudes provide them also with the best introduction to strange institutions, 
the roots of which are intermingled, at this level alone, with their own. 
Consider, for example, the following observation where the native applies 
to the white man the same method of infantile assimilation as we so often 
use as regards him : 

‘In the Navaho family, the art of weaving or jewellery-making is learnt 
from example. To the young native, to look is to learn . . . Whence the 
complete absence of a way of life so common among us, even among 
adults. ... I mean the habit of asking questions such as “And that, why 
do that?” or “After that, what are you going to do?” It is this habit more 
than any other which has given natives their strange opinion of white 
men, for the Indian is convinced that the white man is fool .’ 1 

For the primitive, the attitudes of the civilized man correspond to what 
we should call infantile attitudes, for exactly the same reason that we find 
hints or outlines, in our children, of attitudes whose full and developed picture 
is provided in primitive society. Consequently, the importance of child 
psychology studies for the anthropologist can be seen. In their freshest 
form they give him access to that common capital of mental structures and 
of institutional schemata which are the initial resources at man’s disposal in 
the launching of social enterprises. For proof that he must take his stand at 
this very elementary level to penetrate the nature of institutions which appear 
strange on the surface, but the underlying principles of which at least are 
in fact very simple and universal, we need only the remarkable observa- 
tion, communicated to me at the end of one of my courses of lectures by 

1 Reichard, n.d., p. 674. 




96 



The Elementary Struetures of Kinship 



a woman listener who was hearing of dual organization for the first time: 

‘Johnny A., aged four, of Alexandria (Egypt), lives in two imaginary 
countries, Tana-Gaz and Tana-Pe, where everything is magnificent. Tana- 
Gaz is above and is better than Tana-Pe. His mother lives in Tana-Gaz , 
but his father lives in Tana-Pe. When the sea is calm, and Johnny can go 
swimming, it is in Tana-Gaz. When it is rough, and bathing is prohibited, 
it is in Tana-Pe. People also move from one country to the other. Originally 
both countries were good. Subsequently, Tana-Gaz has remained good, 
while Tana-Pe has become inferior to Tana-Gaz , sometimes neutral, some- 
times openly evil. 

‘When Johnny was seven years old, he was asked whether he remembered 
Tana-Gaz and Tana-Pe. He then became embarrassed and said he had 
forgotten.’ 

The interesting nature of this observation does not lie merely in the 

«r r 

reconstruction of a dual system by a four-year-old child, with the division 
of things and beings into two categories, the inequality of moieties, the 
stylistic creation of place-names, so evocative of a Melanesian onomastic 
system, and even the curious suggestion of exogamy. If Johnny had been 
a little Australian aborigine he could have elaborated the same fantasy, but 
he would not have been ashamed of it later. It would have progressively 
found basis in the official dualism of his society. The logical requirements 
and social attitudes expressed in dual organization would have been satisfied 
normally in an institutional activity conforming approximately to the infantile 
model. But Johnny grows up in a group which does not use bipolar structures 
to express antagonisms and reciprocities, except superficially and ephemerally. 
In it, the model proposed by the infantile mind cannot acquire any instru- 
mental value. Furthermore, in many ways it is contradictory to the selected 
model, and because of this it must be abandoned and repressed. 

In these circumstances, it is easy to understand why ethnologists, psycholo- 
gists and psychiatrists have each been tempted to set up parallelisms between 
primitive, infantile and pathological thought. In so far as psycho-neurosis 
can be defined as the highest form of mental synthesis on a purely individual 
level, 1 the sick person’s thought resembles the thought of the child. These 
forms of thought no longer conform, or do not yet conform, to the selective 
structure of the particular group to which they belong. Consequently, the 
child and the sick person are both relatively free to elaborate their own 
particular synthesis. This synthesis is probably doomed to remain unstable 
and precarious, because its realization is on an individual plane and is not 
within the framework of any social environment. All the same, it is a 
synthesis, or if one prefers, a turning kaleidoscope of sketchy or deformed 
syntheses, never an absence of synthesis (except perhaps in the special case 

1 Delay, 1942, p. 123. The reservation formulated below for hebephrenia lost much of 
its value after the publication of the work of S£chehaye (1960). 




The Archaic Illusion 



97 



of hebephrenia). Accordingly, the apparent ‘regression’ is noi a return to 
an archaic ‘stage’ in the intellectual development of the individual or species. 
It is the reconstitution of a situation analogous to that presiding over the 
beginnings of individual thought. Pathological and primitive thought con- 
trast with child thought in being adult, but, in their turn, pathological and 
child thought have something in common which distinguishes them from 
primitive thought. Primitive thought is as completely and systematically 
socialized as our own, while the others have a relative and individual 
independence which, of course, has a different explanation in each case. 




CHAPTER VIII 



Alliance and Descent 

i 

Let us return to our investigation of the concomitants of dual organization 
when it appears in its most explicit form. Whether descent is matrilineal or 
patrilineal, the children of the father’s brother and of the mother’s sister are 
found in the same moiety as Ego, while those of the father’s sister and of the 
mother’s brother always belong to the other moiety. Consequently, in an 
exogamous system, the latter are the first collaterals with whom marriage is 
possible. This remarkable feature is expressed in several ways. Firstly, the 
cousins descended from the father’s brother or from the mother’s sister 
cannot marry, for the same reason as brothers and sisters (in that they 
belong to the same moiety), and are designated by the same term as for 
brothers and sisters. Secondly, the cousins descended from the mother’s 
brother or the father’s sister belong to the opposite moiety and are called 
by a special term, or by the term for ‘husband’ or ‘wife’, since the spouse 
must be chosen from their division. Finally, the father’s brother and the 
mother’s sister, whose children are called ‘brothers’ and ‘sisters’, are them- 
selves called ‘father’ and ‘mother’, while the mother’s brother and the 
father’s sister, whose children are potential spouses, are called by special 
terms, or by a term for ‘father-in-law’ or ‘mother-in-law’. This terminology, 
of which we have given only the broad outlines, satisfies all the requirements 
of a dual organization with exogamous moieties. In fact, it might be an 
expression, in terms of kinship, of the social organization based on moieties. 
However, this same relationship may be expressed differently. Indeed, the 
dichotomous terminology we have just described coincides also with another 
very prevalent institution in primitive society, viz., preferential marriage 
between cross-cousins. It has just been seen how this terminology classes 
together as ‘parents’ the father’s brother and the mother’s sister (parallel 
uncle and aunt), and distinguishes them from the father’s sister and the 
mother’s brother (cross-uncle and aunt) who are designated by special terms. 
Members of the same generation are also divided into two groups: on the 
one hand, cousins (whatever their degree) who are kinsmen descended from 
two collaterals of the same sex, and who call each other ‘brothers’ and 
‘sisters’ (parallel cousins), and, on the other hand, cousins descended from 



98 




Alliance and Descent 



99 



collaterals of different sex (whatever their degree), who are called by special 
terms and between whom marriage is possible (cross-cousins). As the dual 
organization, the kinship system we have just discussed, and the rules of 
marriage between cross-cousins are in perfect harmony, it might just as 
easily be said, reversing the previous proposition, that dual organization is 
the expression, on an institutional plane, of a system of kinship which itself 
derives from certain rules of alliance. Sociologists have generally favoured 
the first interpretation. These include Tylor, Rivers and Perry, who writes 
concerning cross-cousin marriage: ‘This form of marriage probably is 
derived from the dual organization of society as defined in its sociological 
aspect .’ 1 Why is this? Perry continues: ‘It seems to be found only in cases 
where the dual organization exists or has existed in the past .’ 2 To be true, he 
immediately makes this prudent reservation: ‘But on this point there cannot 
be entire certainty .’ 3 Indeed, for we do not believe that the relationship 
between the two institutions can reasonably be interpreted simply as a 
derivation. If most writers have thought differently it seems to have been 
for two reasons. 

Firstly, in the light of our own ideas on prohibited degrees, the system of 
marriage between cross-cousins appears profoundly irrational. Why set up 
a barrier between cousins descended from collaterals of the same sex, and 
cousins from collaterals of different sex, when in respect to proximity both 
cases are the same? Nevertheless, to pass from one to the other makes all 
the difference between clearly marked incest (parallel cousins being likened 
to brothers and sisters) and unions which are not only possible but even 
those which are enjoined upon everybody (since cross-cousins are designated 
by the term for potential spouses). The distinction is incompatible with our 
biological criterion for incest. There has been no intrinsic reason isolated for 
the peculiar cross-cousin relationship, and from this it has been concluded 
that the whole institution must have been the indirect consequence of a 
different order of phenomena. 

In the second place, the striking thing was that as often as not the native 
mythology described the institution of moieties as a deliberate reform 
(although this would certainly not give sufficient reason for believing that 
this was actually the case) and moreover that, in certain cases at least, this 
seemed to be affirmed by more authoritative evidence (e.g., Howitt for 
Australia, and ancient documents for the Huron of North America 4 ). From 
this it has been inferred that dual organization was conceived of as a partially 
if not completely effective means of preventing incest. Indeed, the moiety 
system always prevents incest between brothers and sisters, and also between 
father and daughter in a patrilineal system, and mother and son in a matrilineal 
system. The irrationality of the division of cousins into two groups is then 
regarded as a fault in the system. 

These very imperfections gave the defenders of this theory a feeling of 

1 Perry, 1923, p. 281. 1 loc. cit. 3 loc. cit. 4 Barbeau, 1917, pp. 392-405. 




100 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

security because it would have been difficult for them to imagine barbaric 
peoples finding a perfect solution to their problems. If, on the contrary, the 
distinction between cousins had been taken as the starting-point in tracing 
the origins of dual organization, firstly, it would have been impossible, or 
at least very difficult, to deduce the prohibitions in the reverse order. Secondly, 
and more particularly, in its systematic nature and the coherency with which 
its full consequences have developed in almost all groups, cross-cousin 
marriage reveals a logical power and a theoretical capacity which we are 
particularly unwilling to concede to the primitive in the present instance 
because we seem incapable of discerning the reason for the system. The 
diffusionist school of Elliot Smith and Perry affirms the priority of dual 
organization over cross-cousin marriage for reasons which are quite different, 
but there is no point in our discussing them here, for we are not so much 
concerned with dual organization in its codified form as with certain basic 
mechanisms which we believe to be universally subjacent. 

The reader is no doubt aware that the hypothesis of the secondary charac- 
ter of cross-cousin marriage, which we have endeavoured to expound, 
involves certain postulates which played a considerable role in the human 
sciences during the latter half of the nineteenth and early twentieth centuries. 
These postulates may be summarized as follows. A human institution has 
only two possible origins, either historical and irrational, or as in the case 
of the legislator, by design; in other words, either incidental or intentional. 
Consequently, if no rational motive can be found for cross-cousin marriage 
it is because it is the result of a series of historical accidents which in them- 
selves arc insignificant. Psychology once argued along these lines. It argued 
that mathematical concepts were either innate properties, testifying to the 
superiority and irreducible nature of man’s mind, or that they must have 
derived from experience by an automatic process of association. This 
antinomy was resolved once it was realized that even the lowly fowl can 
apprehend relationships. Once this was acknowledged, both associationism 
and idealism found themselves non-suited . 1 There was no longer any need 
for highly complex historical reconstructions to account for really primitive 
concepts. But at the same time it w'as realized that such concepts were 
in no way the crowning point of the structure, but merely its basis and 
the humble raw' material of its foundations. It had been believed that the 
only choice was between accepting the origin of the concept as transcen- 
dent or reconstructing it from bits and pieces, which w'as impossible. This 
antithesis vanished before the experimental discovery of the immanence of 
relation. 

The same change in attitudes is beginning to appear in the study of human 
institutions, which are also structures whose whole - in other words the 
regulating principle - can be given before the parts, that is, that complex 
union which makes up the institution, its terminology, consequences and 

1 Kohler, 1930, p. 7. 




Alliance and Descent 



ioi 



implications, the customs through which it is expressed and the beliefs to 
which it gives rise. This regulating principle can have a rational value without 
being rationally conceived. It can be expressed in arbitrary formulas without 
being itself devoid of meaning. It is in the light of such considerations that 
the relationships between dual organizations and cross-cousin marriage 
should be defined. We do not simply propose to inverse the hypothesis of 
the priority of dual organizations over this form of marriage. We believe 
that they both have their origin in the apprehension, by primitive thought, 
of those completely basic structures on which the very existence of culture 
rests. In this sense, it can be said, but can only be said, that cross-cousin 
marriage and dual organization correspond to different stages in the growing 
awareness of these structures, and that the practice of marriage between 
cross-cousins, which appears more as an attempt than as a codified system, 
constitutes, from this psychological viewpoint only, a process which does not 
require so complete and definitive an awareness as the institution of dual 
organizations. However, we have absolutely no intention of posing problems 
of anteriority which lose much of their importance when the common reality 
underlying both institutions is pursued rather than the institutions themselves. 



ii 

In common with the dual system, cross-cousin marriage, without being 
universal, nevertheless does extend to almost every part of the world. But 
cross-cousin marriage is far more frequent than exogamous moieties. Indeed, 
as we have shown, a system of exogamous moieties necessarily authorizes 
cross-cousin marriage, which exists, moreover, in many groups which are 
not divided into moieties. Rivers has even shown that in Melanesia it is 
precisely the tribes without dual organization that practise this form of 
marriage. We shall return to this later. The wider distribution of cross-cousin 
marriage can be explained in two ways. Cross-cousin marriage is either the 
more basic system with dual organization appearing in certain parts only of 
its distribution area as a secondary development, or else it was cross-cousin 
marriage which was the derivative phenomenon, with the explanation for the 
more restricted distribution of dual organization to be found in its archaic 
nature. Both interpretations are obviously riddled with evolutionism, and 
their essential preoccupation is with which of the two phenomena preceded 
the other. We, on the contrary, believe that it is not the hypothetical succession 
of the two institutions which should be considered, but rather their structure. 
From this point of view, cross-cousin marriage has a less organized structure, 
for it merely represents a tendency, whereas the organization into exogamous 
moieties is more coherent and rigid. This assertion needs to be elaborated 
upon since the objection might be raised that the contrary is true, that dual 
organization sanctions marriage within a very broad category, including 
not only ‘real’ cross-cousins, but also more distant kinsmen. By contrast, the 




102 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

obligation for cross-cousins, defined in the strictest sense, to marry, is 
sometimes a striking feature of the other marriage system. 

Dual organization, therefore, defines a very general class within which it 
is permissible to choose a spouse, while, in certain cases at least, the system 
of cross-cousin marriage determines very precisely the individual whom one 
is obliged to marry. But the difference is not exactly this, for dual organization 
defines a class with very strictly fixed boundaries, while the cross-cousin 
system attaches importance to a relationship between individuals, which is 
capable of being reinterpreted again and again. Even among the Toda and 
the Vedda, who attach a great importance to kinship, an individual who has 
no cross-cousins can contract another marriage, it being understood that 
the possible marriages are arranged in a preferential order, according to 
how far they conform with the ideal model. That only 30 per cent of the 
Fijian marriages analysed by Thomson complied with the strict definition 
of cross-cousins establishes the same thing. 1 It is exactly the same in Australia. 2 
Thus, if the system of cross-cousins defines the relationship between the 
individuals more strictly, the individuals themselves are not so strictly defined. 
The opposite happens with dual organization, which leaves the relationship 
very vague, but strictly defines the class, and the individuals included within 
this class. What is the result of this analysis? Dual organization is a global 
system, binding the group in its totality. Marriage between cross-cousins, 
on the contrary, seems a very much more special process; it is a tendency 
rather than a system. Among the Hottentots, Hoernte tells us, 3 marriage 
between cross-cousins does not seem to have been the object of any positive 
obligation; it was only that marriage between parallel cousins was strictly 
prohibited. And yet, it is rare to find a kinship system so faultlessly built up 
about the dichotomy of cousins and the intermarriage of two classes as the 
Hottentot system. In South America, where we find kinship systems which 
are equally precise, such as the Nambikwara, the same fact holds true. 

Accordingly, it can now be seen what in our opinion is the theoretical 
relationship between dual organization and the marriage of cross-cousins. 
Both are systems of reciprocity, and both result in a dichotomous terminology 
which is broadly similar in both cases. But while dual organization with 
exogamous moieties defines the actual spouse vaguely, it determines the 
number and identity of possible spouses most closely. In other words it is 
the highly specialized formula for a system which has its beginnings, still 
poorly differentiated, in cross-cousin marriage. Cross-cousin marriage 
defines a relationship, and establishes a perfect or approximate model of 
the relationship in each case. Dual organization delimits two classes by 
applying a uniform rule guaranteeing that individuals bom or distributed 
into these two classes will always stand in this relationship in its widest 
sense. What is lost in precision is gained in automation and simplicity. 

The two institutions are in contrast, one being crystallized, the other 

1 Thomson, 1908, p. 187. 2 Radcliffe-Brown, 1913, p. 158. 3 Hoernld, 1925«, pp. 1-24. 




Alliance and Descent 



103 

flexible. The question of chronology is completely foreign to this distinction. 
There is no reason why some groups should not have acquired the whole 
formula right away, while others adopted it as the result of a growing 
awareness of the structural law of cross-cousin marriage, which alone they 
had practised previously. There is no reason, either, why a group should 
not have made the transition from dual organization to the marriage of 
cross-cousins, which has the same fundamental functional value but acts 
deeper down in the social structure, and so is more sheltered from historical 
transformations. 

The relationship just suggested between dual organization and cross- 
cousin marriage gives a satisfactory explanation to Rivers’s remark on 
Melanesian institutions, that cross-cousin marriage appears (or reappears) 
precisely where dual organization is missing. As their functional value (viz., 
to establish a system of reciprocity) is identical, it can indeed be understood 
how the absence of dual organization can be compensated for by the presence 
of cross-cousin marriage. 



hi 

The foregoing considerations will help us guard against an inflexible inter- 
pretation which has grown up in the last ten years, and which threatens to 
compromise not only the progress of studies in primitive sociology, but in 
sociology generally. It has become explicit more recently in connexion with 
the interpretation of cross-cousin marriage and the relationships of this form 
of marriage to dual organization. Accordingly, let us dwell on a question 
which is prejudicial only in appearance, for the answer given to it will imply 
a basic standpoint with regard to all the problems to be examined in this book. 

For a long time sociologists have considered that there is a difference in 
nature between the family, as found in modern society, and the kinship 
groups of primitive societies, viz., clans, phratries and moieties. The family 
recognizes descent through both the maternal and paternal lines, while the 
clan or moiety reckons kinship in one line only, either the father’s or the 
mother’s. Descent is then said to be patrilineal or matrilineal. These defini- 
tions have been understood in the strictest sense, as indeed the observation 
of the obscured facts often suggested. A system with matrilineal descent does 
not recognize any social kinship link between a child and its father, and in 
his wife’s clan, to which his children belong, the father is himself a ‘visitor’, 
a ‘man from outside’, or a ‘stranger’. The reverse situation prevails in a 
system with patrilineal descent. 

This regulation seems so schematic and arbitrary that certain writers, who 
have consciously or unconsciously accepted it as the true picture, have 
concluded that such unnatural customs could not have arisen spontaneously 
in different regions and at different times, and that they must rather be 
connected with some great cultural upheaval which occurred at some precise 




1 04 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

moment, and at some single point in the world, from which they spread by 
diffusion. Nevertheless, as early as 1905, S wanton observed that the other 
line was never completely ignored even in what seemed to be the most 
unilineal of tribes. On the one hand, the conjugal family is always recognized, 
sometimes in a limited sort of way, but always effectively, even when it is 
not expressed in the institutions. On the other hand, the subordinate line 
regularly plays its own peculiar role reflected indirectly by custom . 1 

The flood of monographic studies in the last thirty years has largely 
confirmed Swanton's remarks. Today we know that societies as matrilineal 
as the Hopi take account of the father and his line, and that this is so in most 
cases. Furthermore, there are societies whose unilineal character is more 
apparent than real, since the transmission of functions and rights operates 
partly through one line and partly through the other. Some writers, there- 
fore, have been induced to discard the conclusions of traditional sociology 
and to consider that strictly unilineal societies, supposing them to exist, 
can only be considered as exceptions, whereas bilinealism, by contrast, 
through its highly varied modalities, offers an extremely general formula . 2 

The truth seems more complex to us, since the one term, bilinealism, is 
being used for quite different phenomena. If what is meant is that all human 
societies recognize that a link, if not juridical then at least psychological and 
sentimental, does exist between the child and each of its parents, we agree. 
It may readily be conceded also that the recognition of this double link is 
expressed at all times and places in spontaneous practices, and even in the 
non-crystallized forms of social life. Finally, there are certainly some societies 
for which these flexible structures might provide a sufficient basis for insti- 
tutional structures which are destined to remain very simple, as among the 
Andamanese, Fuegians, Bushmen, Semang and Nambikwara. Far more 
uncommon are those groups which base a complex and systematic juridical 
apparatus on the recognition of the two lines. In 1935, Radcliffe-Brown had 
only one case of this, that of Germanic law, which he considered an 
exception.' However, other examples were quick to appear, such as the 
Abelam of the Sepik River, where if there is no son, the daughter inherits 
the landed property, and if there is no daughter, the sister’s son inherits . 4 
In the first edition of this book, we added: ‘In any case, the list would not 
be very long .’ 5 Today we have to acknowledge that this assessment was 
incorrect. Following Murdock, many writers have proved that cognatic 
systems, those in which both lines are equally recognized, do exist, especially 
in Polynesia (the field of Firth’s early work), and also in Melanesia and 
Africa. Davenport calls them ‘non-unilineal systems ’ 6 and they are certainly 
far more common than was suspected around 1940. They probably form at 

* Swanton, 1905a, pp. 663-73; 1906. 2 Murdock, 1942, pp. 555-61. 

3 Radcliffe-Brown, 1935a, pp. 286-303. 

4 Kaberry, 1941, pp. 233-58, 345-67; 1942, pp. 209-25, 331-63. 

5 First edition, p. 135. 6 Davenport, 1959, pp. 557-72- 




Alliance and Descent 



105 

least a third of the descent systems now known. Nevertheless, the principles 
of our interpretation do not seem to need any substantial modification. In 
1947, we suggested leaving such systems aside, because, like Radcliffe- Brown 
we thought that they were exceptional. Although this no longer seems so, 
our reservations still remain justified. Even though they are common, these 
systems should not be considered here, because they have nothing to do with 
elementary structures. As Goodenough has already pointed out, 1 and as 
opposed to what Murdock seems still to believe, 2 such systems do not belong 
to the same typology as those which we call ‘elementary structures of kinship’. 
Indeed, they introduce an additional dimension, for they no longer define, 
perpetuate and transform the method of social cohesion with regard to a 
stable rule of descent, but to a system of land rights. The difference between 
societies where these are found and societies where there is only unilineal 
descent is somewhat the same as between arthropods and vertebrates. In 
one, the skeleton of the society is internal. It consists in a synchronic and 
diachronic interlocking of personal statuses in which each particular status 
is strictly a function of every other status. In the other, the skeleton is ex- 
ternal. It consists in an interlocking of territorial statuses, i.e., in a landed 
society. These real statuses are external to the individuals who can, from this 
fact, and within the bounds imposed by these constraints, define their own 
status with a certain margin of freedom. In justification of the preceding 
comparison, note that it is precisely such extra-skeletal organisms which can 
undergo several morphological changes in the one lifetime. It follows that 
cognatic systems differ from unilincal systems in a second way. viz., in them 
the diachronic and the synchronic are, to a certain extent, dissociated by the 
freedom of choice that they give each individual. They enable societies 
possessing them to achieve historical existence in so far as the statistical 
fluctuations cumulatively effected by the individual choices happen to be 
oriented in a certain direction. 

But the principal thing is that these diffuse or precise forms of bilinealism 
should be clearly distinguished from one other with which they tend to be 
confused. In the examples quoted in the previous paragraph, the recognition 
of the two lines indicates that they are both fitted to play the same role, the 
transmission of the same rights and the same obligations. Name, social 
status, property and prerogatives can be received from both the father and 
the mother, or from either one or the other. It is not that each lineage is 
assigned a special role, such that, if certain rights are transmitted exclusively 
in one line, then other rights will always be transmitted exclusively in 
the other. This second system has been observed in many regions of the 
world, notably in West and South Africa, India, Australia, Melanesia and 
Polynesia. But this formula can immediately be seen to be very different from 
the preceding one, and it seems essential that they should be distinguished 
terminologically. We shall call systems in which the two lines of descent can 
' Goodenough, 1955, pp. 71-83. 2 Murdock 1960. 




io6 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



be substituted one for the other, and in which these may be merged in a joint 
exercise of their functions, systems with undifferentiated descent. Bilineal 
descent is reserved for very precisely defined systems, examples of which will 
be found below, their characteristic being the juxtaposition of two unilineal 
rules of descent, each governing exclusively the transmission of certain rights. 

There are certainly no watertight bulkheads between unilineal, bilineal and 
undifferentiated descent. Any system has the coefficient of diffuse non- 
differentiation resulting from the universality of the conjugal family. To a 
certain extent, moreover, a unilineal system always recognizes the existence 
of the other line. Conversely, it is rare to come across an example of strictly 
undifferentiated descent. Our society, which has gone far in this direction 
(inheritance comes equally from the father and the mother, and social status 
is received, and prestige derived from both lines, etc.), keeps a patrilineal 
inflection in the mode of transmitting the family name. Be that as it may, the 
importance of undifferentiated systems for anthropological theory is today 
unquestionable. They prove that the dividing line between societies which 
are traditionally called primitive and so-called civilized societies is not the 
same as between ‘elementary structures’ and ‘complex structures’. We are 
deeply aware that so-called primitive societies include heterogeneous types, 
and that the theory of some of these types still remains to be worked out. 
Let us acknowledge then that a good number of so-called primitive societies, 
in fact, have complex kinship structures. However, as this book is limited 
to the theory of elementary structures, we consider we are right in leaving 
on one side examples of undifferentiated descent. 

Furthermore, it is not so much these undifferentiated systems as the 
bilineal systems that have recently been used in a revival of the classical 
interpretation of cross-cousin marriage in terms of dualism. But here the 
dualism has been redoubled. To explain the origin of cross-cousin marriage 
by the supposition that the group is, or was at one time, divided into exo- 
gamous moieties is to run up against a serious difficulty. Dual organization 
accounts for the dichotomy of cousins into cross-cousins and parallel cousins, 
and explains why cross-cousins are possible spouses, and why parallel 
cousins are prohibited. But it does not make it clear why, as is often the 
case, the cross-cousins are preferred to all other individuals who, like them, 
belong to the opposite moiety to Ego. A man finds women in the opposite 
moiety to his own not only with the status of cross ‘cousins’, but also - among 
others - of cross ‘aunts’ and cross ‘nieces’. All these women have the same 
quality of being exogamous. Why then are cross-cousins privileged spouses? 

Suppose now that a second unilateral dichotomy of the dual organization 
is added to the first unilateral dichotomy, but follows the other line; e.g., 
let there be a system of matrilineal moieties, A and B, and a second division, 
this time patrilineal, between two groups, X and Y. Each individual will 
hold a status A or B from his mother, and a status X or Y from his father. 
Hence, each will be defined by two indices: AX, AY, BY, or BX. If the mar- 




Alliance and Descent 



107 

riage rule is that the possible spouses shall differ as to both the maternal 
index and the paternal index, it can easily be established that only cross- 
cousins satisfy this requirement, while uncles or aunts, and cross-nephews 
or nieces, differ in one index only. For a detailed proof, the reader may be 
referred to chapter XT. Here we shall confine ourselves to a few examples. 

The dual organization of the Ashanti, perhaps also of the Ga, the Fanti, 
and even the negroes of Surinam, 1 rests on the crossing of a patrilineal 
factor, the ntoro or ‘mind’, with a matrilineal factor sometimes called mogya 
or ‘blood’, or sometimes abusua , ‘clan’. In fact, the natives say, abusua bako 
mogya bako meaning ‘one clan, one blood’. It is the ntoro of the man mixed 
with the mogya of the woman which produces the child. 2 The terminology 
emphasizes the correlation between this system and the marriage of 
cross-cousins in the equations: 

ase mother’s brother’s wife = mother-in-law 
overe mother’s brother's daughter = wife 
akonta mother’s brother’s son = brother-in-law. 3 

The Toda of India are divided into exogamous patrilineal groups called 
mod, and into exogamous matrilineal groups called poljo. 7 . Because of this 
dichotomy, the two great endogamous classes which form the principal 
social units of this tribe are themselves subdivided, as follows: the to:rhas 
into five exogamous groups {poljo. 7 ), the tbuvilj into six. Accordingly, 
cross-cousin marriage seems to result from the prohibition of marriage 
between individuals whose kinship relationship is established exclusively in 
the maternal or in the paternal line. 4 A similar type of organization is found 
among the Yako of Nigeria, who are divided into exogamous patrilineal 
groups, the yepun , and into less strictly exogamous matrilineal groups, the 
yajima. Rights and duties are divided between the two groups, without any 
possible conflict in ascription: ‘a man eats in his kepun and inherits in his 
lejima', asserts the native maxim. 5 As the prohibited degrees are defined by 
the exogamy of the kepun and the lejima , they are practically confined to 
parallel cousins in the maternal line. But if the exogamy of the lejima were 
as strict as the other, obviously all the parallel cousins would be excluded. 6 
Finally, the Herero have a positive predilection for cross-cousin marriage, 
which might result from the intersection of about twenty patrilineal, patrilocal 
and exogamous clans called otuzo by six to eight non-localized matrilineal 
clans called eanda (pi. omaanda ). 7 

From these and many other examples it might easily be concluded that, 
at all times and in all places, cross-cousin marriage is to be explained by a 
double dichotomy of the social group, consciously expressed in the 
institutions, or acting as the unconscious spring of customary rules. 

1 Herskovits, 1928. 3 ibid. 1937, pp. 287-96. 

3 Mead, 1937, pp. 300-1. 4 Emeneau, 1937, p. 104. 

5 Forde, 1939a, p. 529; 19396, pp. 129-61. 6 loc. cit. 7 Luttig, 1934, pp. 85-6. 




lo8 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

IV 

We do not wish to contest that this may sometimes be the case. But we do 
not believe it possible to give an account of a system as general as cross- 
cousin marriage by extrapolation from precise and limited instances, or by 
using a dichotomy which is seldom attested to in institutions and the native 
consciousness. What then is the connexion between the two phenomena? 

Let us anticipate our examination of the Australian aborigines to which 
the final chapters of this first part are devoted. We do not hesitate to interpret 
the Kariera or Aranda systems in terms of a double and sometimes more 
complex dichotomy. But the whole point is whether Australia provides a 
special case by which the final nature of the rules of kinship and marriage, 
as they exist universally, may be unveiled, or whether we are not faced with 
some local theory (isolated examples of which are known elsewhere) which 
has been developed by the native as a formulation of his own problems, 
and is a sort of rationalization of existing phenomena. Here we are con- 
fronted by the fundamental problem of explanation in the social sciences. 
If it is true, as Boas has heavily emphasized, that all types of social pheno- 
mena (language, beliefs, techniques and customs) have this in common, 
that their elaboration in the mind is at the level of unconscious thought, 1 
the same question must always be raised as to their interpretation. Does the 
way in which man has apprehended them truly reflect how they originated, 
or must it be seen merely as an analytical procedure which provides a handy 
account of the phenomenon's appearance and results, yet does not necessarily 
correspond to what has really happened? Let us clarify our thoughts on this 
point. 

There is another field where individual statuses are interpreted in terms of 
a simple or complex dichotomy, and where the combined physical charac- 
teristics of a given subject are regarded as resulting from the combination of 
certain elementary characteristics inherited from the parents. This is the 
field of genetics. For example, if the characteristics carried by the sexual 
genes are considered, the analogy with the phenomena described above is 
striking. The female bears two identical sexual genes, and the male, one 
gene similar to these genes, and another, which is the differential charac- 
teristic of masculinity, namely, a double matrilineal index, XX, and a double 
patrilineal index, XY. Each individual necessarily receives a maternal and a 
paternal index. As the sons must have the differential masculine charac- 
teristic, their paternal index would be Y, and their X would always come 
from the mother, while the daughters would have the paternal X and one of 
the two maternal X. 2 All the characteristics carried by the sexual genes will 
thus be distributed among the descendants in accordance with the dialectic 
of this double dichotomy. 3 

1 Boas, 1911, p. 67 et seq. 2 Jennings, 1935. 

3 In Critique de la raison dialectique (p. 744), Sartre has called attention to this formula, 
in which he sees a confusion between dialectical and analytic reasoning. But we do not 




Alliance and Descent 



109 

But in genetics there is a strict correspondence between the process of 
analysis and its object. The analysis is conducted on the premise that chromo- 
somes and genes exist, and the microscopic examination of reproductive cells 
shows that this is really the case. The Mendelian idea that the hereditary 
characteristics of individuals result in a perpetually renewed combination of 
elementary particles, does not merely provide a convenient method for 
statistical prediction. It provides a picture of reality. Likewise, the ‘distinctive 
features’, used by the phonological linguist to explain the characteristics 
of a phenomenon, have an objective existence from the psychological, 
physiological and even physical points of view . 1 

By contrast, consider a mathematician attacking a problem by the 
algebraic method. According to the rule of the Discourse, he also would 
divide the difficulty ‘into as many parts as may be required for its adequate 
solution’, and the value of the method would be gauged by the extent to 
which the result conformed with the facts. But the analysis of the difficulty 
into ‘unknowns’ does not imply that each of them has a corresponding 
objective reality. In other words, this analysis is purely ideological, and its 
legitimacy is to be weighed in terms of the result, rather than by how faithfully 
the real process, resulting in the situation studied, is reproduced in the mathe- 
matician’s mind. It will be seen below that Weil uses sixteen elementary 
units representing the types of marriage in his determination of the charac- 
teristics of an Australian aboriginal system with eight marriage classes . 2 It 
is certain that he is justified in doing so, since it allows him to isolate some of 
the system’s consequences which had not been seen by fieldworkers. However, 
one can be sure that in elaborating this system, the aboriginal mind never 
had recourse to these sixteen categories. Furthermore, we shall show that 
the eight classes themselves were a secondary development, and that the 
beginnings of the system can be very satisfactorily explained by an 
unconscious division into four categories . 3 Whenever a system of this type is 
encountered, i.e., where the position of the individual in the social structure 
seems to result from the combination of several elementary characteristics, 
the question must always be asked whether the sociologist - and on occasion 
also, the native - has acted like the geneticist, or like the mathematician. 
In other words, are these objective characteristics of the social structure, or 
do they merely provide a convenient method for ascertaining certain of its 
characteristics? There are always three possible answers to this question. 



1 Jakobson, 1938, pp. 34-41; 1 ,evi-Strauss, 1945a, pp. 33-53. 

2 ch. XIV. 

3 ch. XII. It can be seen that in contrast to the criticism levelled at us on occasion by 
writers who obviously have not read what we have written (Berndt, Goody), we exclude 
in advance all interpretations akin to that of Lawrence. 



conceive of dialectical reasoning in the same way as Sartre. As we see it, the dichotomous 
approach is in no way incompatible with dialectical thought, but clearly the contrary. 
Sec on this subject, L6vi-Strauss, 1966, ch. IX. 



1 10 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



In certain cases, the elementary units do exist. There are matrilineal dans 
and patrilineal sections, both denoted by the terminology, by the rules by 
which rights and obligations are transmitted, and by certain other aspects 
of custom and institutions. When a detailed and critical examination of the 
facts leads to a positive conclusion, there is no reason to doubt the role of 
corresponding mechanisms. In most cases, however, nothing of the sort is to 
be found. It is the sociologist who, in order to account for a complicated law 
of division into possible and prohibited spouses, invents a hypothetical 
division of the group into unilateral classes. These classes embody all that 
is needed to interpret the marriage system as resulting from their interaction. 
This method of analysis may be suitable as one stage in the demonstration ; 
but this appears dubious when one refers to works of this type leading to 
schemata which are made suspect by their very complication . 1 More particu- 
larly, these works contravene a well-known principle of logic, viz., a class 
which can be defined in extension can never be postulated. The existence of 
a class may be established, but it can never be deduced. 

But there are more embarrassing predicaments. It may sometimes be the 
native himself, and not the sociologist, who is guilty of methodological 
contrivance. Indeed, certain cultures have indulged in a real labour of 
categorization in their own social institutions. Established in this way, the 
system cannot claim, on pretext of its native origin, to be a faithful repre- 
sentation of a reality which is just as likely to be revealed, in its unconscious 
and collective aspect, to the subject’s as to the observer’s analysis. Australia 
provides striking examples of this situation. The sociologist to whom it 
might give doubts should remember that he is not the first to have en- 
countered it. The Logic of the Schoolmen was the work of people who 
thought, and believed, that they had discovered the laws which their own 
thinking obeyed. Despite the fact that in certain cases thought develops 
consistently with the models of classical logic, and that any intellectual 
processes may be interpreted in keeping with its requirements, it is known 
today, through closer observation, that in most cases, the laws governing 
the processes of thought are governed by very different laws. The gram- 
marians of Port Royal believed they had discovered the true laws of speech, 
but we have since learnt that syntax and morphology rest on a substructure 
which has few points in common with the frameworks of traditional 
grammar. 

The fact that classes exist elsewhere than in the mind of the sociologist has 
the same value as the fact that syllogisms exist for others than the logician, 
but no more than this. The existence of both forms must be acknowledged 
when attested to by experiment and observation. It does not follow from this 
that they are always the raison d'etre for phenomena analogous to those 
produced when they are thus attested to. We shall propose a demonstration 
which seems to the point when we tackle the problem of alternate generations. 

1 e.g., the two articles by B. Z. Seiigman : 1927, pp. 349-75; 1928, pp. 533-58. 




Alliance and Descent 



in 

This phenomenon, which corresponds so perfectly with a double patrilineal 
and matrilineal dichotomy that there has not generally been any doubt that 
the latter dichotomy was the cause of the former, will be seen under altogether 
different circumstances which are brought about by very short cycles of 
reciprocity . 1 

When the thesis that cross-cousin marriage results in a double dichotomy 
of the group is examined closely, it is realized that except in a few precise 
and determined cases the facts do not stand up to analysis. The Wa-Nyanja 
of Portuguese Africa are divided into exogamous matrilineal groups called 
kamu, cut across by similarly exogamous patrilineal groups called chilawa. 
As is to be expected, this system excludes parallel cousins as possible spouses, 
but it does not make cross-cousins preferred spouses . 2 Forde has been led 
to make a similar reservation about the Yako whose social organization is 
described above . 3 

A rough analysis of the Ashanti facts shows the extent to which the bilateral 
thesis should be mistrusted, even when it seems firmly established. As 
Seligman 4 has rightly pointed out, the dialectic of the ntoro and of the 
abusua would entail the marriage of bilateral cross-cousins only if each 
category comprised two and only two exogamous groups. This is certainly 
not the case among the Ashanti, who have an indefinite number of clans and 
ntoro, and consequently, the structure of their system does not entail that the 
grandsons shall automatically reproduce the patrilineal and matrilineal 
affiliations of their grandfather. This point is essential, because Rattray 
believed he could explain cross-cousin marriage and its particular relationship 
to the social organization of the Ashanti, by metaphysical beliefs . 5 Cross- 
cousin marriage is necessary because in a bilineal system the grandson 
reproduces the grandfather and re-embodies his social status, in this way, 
every soul can be reintegrated with its clan and ntoro after skipping a 
generation. This dialectic of alternate generations will be analysed below, 
and we shall not linger here on its theoretical implications. It should merely 
be noted that when there is an indefinite number of exogamous, patrilineal 
and matrilineal groups, the rule of double exogamy is not sufficient to make 
all marriages conform to the ideal model of marriage between bilateral 
cross-cousins. Marriage with the mother’s brother’s daughter (matrilateral 
cross-cousin) is an absolute barrier to the reproduction of alternate genera- 
tions (indeed, the descendants preserve the patrilineal or matrilineal group 
of their male or female ascendant, according to sex, and indefinitely acquire 
a new alternate group). Finally, if, as Rattray says, the purpose of the system 
lies in the metaphysical necessity of reincarnation through alternate genera- 
tions, Seligman has rightly noted 6 that, given the concomitant social organi- 

1 chs. XIII and XXVII. 2 Barnes, 1922, pp. 147-9. 3 Forde, 1941, p. 15. 

4 B. Z. Seligman, 1925, pp. 114-21. 

5 cf. Clark, 1930, pp. 431-70. 

* B. Z. Seligman, 1925, pp. 1 14-21. 




1 1 2 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

zation, this necessity can only be met if marriage is with the father’s sister's 
daughter (patrilatcral cross-cousin). 

The theoretical reasons for this phenomenon will be given below. 1 But, to 
confine ourselves to the present case, two observations are indispensable. 
The negroes of Surinam, descendants of escaped slaves, have developed an 
autonomous civilization in the Guianas, with borrowings from European 
and Indian cultures which, however, do not conceal the African basis. Their 
social organization is still reminiscent of the social organization of the 
Ashanti. The clan is matrilineal, but from their father children inherit the 
tcina, the whole of the hereditary alimentary prohibitions which if violated 
can lead to leprosy. However, marriage prohibitions affect only the maternal 
line. One can marry freely into the father's brother’s lineage, or the father's 
sister's lineage. 2 Must the conclusion now be drawn that girls and boys 
inherit the tcina from the father, as Herskovits's text would have us suppose? 3 
This is perhaps the case among the negroes of Surinam, but by contrast, we 
have a formal account concerning the Ashanti. Bosman wrote in 1795 that 
the son never eats what is forbidden to his father, and in these matters the 
daughter follows her mother's example. 4 It would seem then that there are 
not two but three different methods of hereditary transmission: where sons 
and daughters follow their father’s nloro; likewise, where sons and daughters 
follow their mother's clan; and, by contrast, where sons follow' the tcina of 
their father, and daughters the tcina of their mother. 

The objection might be raised that this third form of descent has no 
influence on the rules of marriage, and consequently that there is no need to 
take it into account. The objection w'ould be justified if the dichotomy of 
the sexes were not such a common characteristic of unilateral systems of 
marriage, precisely because in such systems brothers and sisters do not marry 
in the same way. In a system of marriage with the patrilateral cross-cousin, 
the son reproduces his mother's marriage, and the daughter that of her 
father. Hence it is understandable that each receives from the other parent 
that fraction of status, in other words, personal duties, which are unrelated 
to the marriage. In this way we should discover the existence of marriage 
with the father's sister’s daughter which had already been suggested by 
the metaphysical beliefs. The reader to whom this analysis seems too schema- 
tic should refer to Chapter XXVI, where a Hindu example of the same 
ambiguity is discussed more extensively. 

Certainly we do not claim that Ashanti marriage does in fact conform to 
the suggested model. Our only aim is to show that if there is no categorical 
evidence of forms of grouping that lead automatically to a double dichotomy, 
the explanation of cross-cousin marriage by ‘double descent’ is an idle one. 

1 ch. XXVII. 2 Herskovits, 1928. 

3 \ . . the children inherit their personal food taboos . . and further on, the whole 
passage devoted to the personal attachment that the son or the daughter can have for their 
father fibid. 1928, pp. 719 20). 

* ibid. p. 719, n. 14. 




Alliance and Descent 



I n 



Should this be surprising? It is striking to see that even with the most 
precise and explicit examples of organizations with marriage classes (e.g., 
the moieties of the Australian aborigines) these classes are much less con- 
ceived of in extension, as groups of objectively designated individuals, than 
as a system of positions whose structure alone remains constant, and in 
which individuals may change position, and even exchange their respective 
positions, provided that the relationships between them are maintained. 

Among the aborigines of South Australia, the function of the custom of 
kopara seems to be to maintain the balance of exchange between the groups 
with regard to material goods, women, human lives, injuries, or initiation 
rites. The kopara is a debt, which must be regulated according to an estab- 
lished formula, and which varies according to the nature of the injury: e.g., 
a gift not returned, a woman not provided in exchange for a girl of the clan, 
an unavenged death, or a non-compensated initiation. This custom is of 
particular interest to us in that a murder or an initiation ‘debt’ is normally 
settled by the gift of a woman. Moreover, there is temporary exchange of 
wives to celebrate the settlement of each kopara, and, except for near kins- 
folk, men and women of the same exogamous group can on this occasion 
have sexual relations: ‘Thus . . . Tiniwa husbands send their Kulpuru wives 
to Kulpuru men, and vice versa .’ 1 Likewise, the members of a revenge party 
normally belong to the deceased person's moiety, but they can oblige the 
men of the other moiety to help them, by lending their wives, which again 
means to say that under these circumstances sexual relations are permissible 
between members of the same moiety. This is the analogous but inverse 
situation to that in Guadalcanal, where the greatest insult is to tell a man 
‘to eat the excreta of his sister'. It can be wiped out only by the blood of the 
offender. But if the offender belongs to the opposite moiety, it is the sister 
herself who must be killed, and the original offender must also kill his sister 
if he wishes to re-establish his reputation . 2 This native evidence is perhaps 
based upon myths but it corresponds to very similar observations made by 
Warner among the Murngin . 3 

These facts are important for several reasons. Firstly, they emphasize 
that matrimonial exchange is only a particular case of those forms of multiple 
exchange embracing material goods, rights and persons. These exchanges 
themselves seem interchangeable, viz., a woman replaces a payment for a 
debt which was in the first place completely different, say, a murder or 
ritual privilege; not giving a woman takes the place of vengeance, etc. 
Furthermore, no other custom can more strikingly illustrate the point, which 
seems crucial to us, concerning the problem of marriage prohibitions: the 
prohibition is defined in a fashion which is logically prior to its object. If 
there is a prohibition it is not because there is some feature of the object 

1 Elkin, 1931o, p. 194. 2 Hogbin, 1937, p. 68. 3 Warner, 1931, pp. 172-98. 




1 1 6 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

marriage service, this cycle of reciprocity is only a secondary mode of a wider 
cycle of reciprocity, which pledges the union of a man and a woman who is 
cither someone's daughter or sister, by the union of the daughter or sister 
of that man or another man with the first man in question. If this fact is kept 
in mind, the apparent anomaly indicated by Malinowski is very simply 
explained. In the total prestations of which a woman is only a part, there is 
one category whose fulfilment depends primarily on her goodwill, viz., 
personal services, whether they be sexual or domestic. The lack of reciprocity 
which seems to characterize these services in the Trobriand Islands, as in 
most human societies, is the mere counterpart of a universal fact, that the 
relationship of reciprocity which is the basis of marriage is not established 
between men and women, but between men by means of women, who are 
merely the occasion of this relationship. 

The first consequence of this interpretation should be to prevent an error 
which is likely to occur if too strict a parallelism is established between 
systems of mother-right and systems of father-right. At first sight, the 
'matrilineal complex', as Lowie calls it, leads to an extraordinary situation. 
No doubt there are systems with matrilineal descent and permanent and 
definitive matrilocal residence, e.g., the Menangkabau of Sumatra, where 
a husband is called orang samando , 'borrowed man ’. 1 Over and above the 
fact that in such systems - and there is scarcely need to recall it - it is the 
brother or eldest son of the mother's family who holds and wields authority, 
examples of them are extremely rare. Lowie gives only two (Pueblo and 
Khasi), but even then with reservations about the second . 2 In all other cases, 
matrilineal descent is accompanied by patrilocal residence, after a more or 
less short delay. The husband is a stranger, ‘a man from outside’, sometimes 
an enemy, and yet the woman goes away to live with him in his village to 
bear children who will never be his. The conjugal family is broken and 
rebroked incessantly. How can the mind conceive of such a situation? How 
can it have been devised and established? It cannot be understood without 
being seen as the result of the permanent conflict between the group giving 
the woman and the group acquiring her. Each group gains the victory in 
turn, or according to whether matrilineal descent or patrilineal descent is 
practised. The woman is never anything more than the symbol of her lineage. 
Matrilineal descent is the authority of the woman’s father or brother 
extended to the brother-in-law's village. 

The correlation established by Murdock between patrilineal institutions 
and the highest levels of culture 3 changes nothing in the absolute priority of 
these institutions over matrilineal institutions. It is true that in societies where 
political power takes precedence over other forms of organization, the 
duality which would result from the masculinity of political authority and 
the matrilineal character of descent could not subsist. Consequently, societies 
attaining this level of political organization tend to generalize the paternal 

1 Cole, 1936, p. 20. 2 Lowie, 1919, p. 35. 3 Murdock, 1937, pp. 445-70. 




Alliance and Descent 



1 17 

right. But it is because political authority, or simply social authority, always 
belongs to men, and because this masculine priority appears constant, that 
it adapts itself to a bilineal or matrilineal form of descent in most primitive 
societies, or imposes its model on all aspects of social life, as is the case in 
more developed groups. 

To treat patrilineal and matrilineal descent and patrilocal and matrilocal 
residence as abstract elements combined in chance pairings is a complete 
misappreciation of the initial situation, which includes women among the 
objects in the men’s transactions. There are as many matrilineal systems as 
patrilineal systems, if not more. But the number of matrilineal systems which 
are also matrilocal is extremely small. Behind the variations in the type of 
descent, the permanence of patrilocal residence attests to the basic asym- 
metrical relationship between the sexes which is characteristic of human 
society. 

If further proof were necessary, one would need only to consider the 
expedients that a matrilineal and matrilocal society, in the strictest sense, 
must employ so as to establish an order roughly equivalent to that of a 
patrilineal and patrilocal society. The taravad of the Nayar of Malabar is a 
matrilineal and matrilocal lineage, the owner of the land, and the repository 
of rights over things and people. But to put this formula into effect a marriage 
must after three days be followed by a divorce. Henceforth a woman has 
only lovers . 1 It is not sufficient to say, as Radcliffe-Brown puts it, that ‘in all 
societies there is a general difference between the status of a man and that 
of a woman ’. 2 The extreme maternal unilateralism of the Nayar is not 
symmetrical with the extreme paternal unilateralism of the Kaffirs, as 
Radcliffe-Brown also suggests . 3 Strictly maternal systems are not only more 
rare than strictly paternal systems, but they are never a pure and simple 
inversion of the second. The ‘fundamental difference’ is a one-way difference. 

We shall risk then advancing a suggestion based on the preceding con- 
siderations, and perhaps containing an explanation for a peculiar phenome- 
non, viz., why dual organizations are more frequently matrilineal than 
patrilineal. If these systems were strictly symmetrical, the problem would be 
resolved only with great difficulty unless use were made of diffusionist 
theories. But we have just seen that the number of societies with matrilineal 
descent and matrilocal residence is very limited. Consequently, the only 
alternatives are, on the one hand patrilineal and patrilocal systems, and on 
the other, matrilineal and patrilocal systems. The exceptional cases of 
matrilineal and matrilocal systems, which are in conflict with the asymmetri- 
cal relationship between the sexes, may be assimilated to the latter. If the 
functioning of the first raises few practical problems, this is not so of the 
second. This is clearly recognized by ethnographers, for whom the study of 
a matrilineal society represents the promise of a complicated social organiza- 
tion, rich in strange institutions, imbued with an atmosphere of the dramatic, 

1 Radcliffe-Brown, 1935a, p. 291. 2 loc. cit. 3 ibid. p. 295. 




1 1 8 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

and very different in this regard from what is to be expected of a society with 
father-right. These special characteristics, from the specialist’s viewpoint, are 
explained only in part by the greater differences which separate these societies 
from our own. To a large extent, the characteristics depend on their specific 
structure, and it is no coincidence that almost all monographs which have 
had wide repercussions have been about matrilineal societies. 

For a matrilineal society, even though patrilocal, and without marriage 
classes, has peculiar problems to resolve. Its exogamy can only be of the local 
clan, or the village. In other words, the woman will go to live in her husband’s 
village, sometimes far from her own people, while she and her children will 
always be strangers within the group with which they are nevertheless 
associated. If a society is both matrilineal and matrilocal, either permanently 
or temporarily, as often happens, the husband belongs to the despised class 
of ‘those-resulting-from marriage’ or ‘strangers’, as opposed to ‘the owners 
of the village’. Consequently, he is always aware of the precariousness of his 
residential title as compared with his wife and children . 1 It can easily be 
imagined that groups under pressure of the psychological and social conflicts 
attached to such systems may determine, more easily than groups which are 
not, to wipe out the opposition between rule of descent and rule of residence 
by the local juxtaposition of exchange units, whether pre-existing clans or 
villages. We have referred to an evolution of this type, precisely in a society 
which seems condemned by its structure to otherwise insoluble conflicts . 2 
Dual organization provides a very simple solution to the problems which 
afflict such societies as Dobu or, in a different sense, Kiriwina. The geo- 
graphical proximity of social units eliminates the difficulties inherent in 
residence. The latter can remain patrilocal, or even matrilocal, without the 
conjugal society being perpetually broken down. And the men’s house, by 
reuniting husbands and brothers-in-law in a ritual and political collaboration, 
resolves the conflict between ‘owners’ and strangers. The ‘reign of women' 
is remembered only in mythology, an age, perhaps more simply, when men 
had not yet resolved the antinomy which is always likely to appear between 
their roles as takers of wives and givers of sisters, and making them both 
the authors and victims of their exchanges. 



1 Fortune, 1932, pp. 5-7. 



2 ibid. p. 106 et seq. 




CHAPTER IX 



The Marriage of Cousins 



i 

The very nature of the principle of reciprocity allows it to act in two different 
and complementary ways, either by setting up classes which automatically 
delimit the group of possible spouses, or by the determination of a relation- 
ship, or a group of relationships, so that in each instance it can be said whether 
a prospective spouse is to be desired or excluded. Both criteria are given 
simultaneously, but their relative importance varies. The class is of the 
greater importance in dual organizations or in societies with marriage 
classes, whereas on the other hand the relationship is used first of all, in a 
negative form, with the simple prohibition on incest. 

But there is one special case in which both aspects of the principle of 
reciprocity co-exist, or rather have the same relative importance, and where 
they overlap exactly and cumulate their effects. This is marriage between 
cross-cousins. In this, more than any other, the class and the group of 
individuals determined by the relationship are co-extensive. This is why 
Morgan, Tylor and Frazer were led to observe that dual organization had 
the same kinship terminology as systems of cross-cousin marriage, and that 
the cross-cousins were distributed as if they belonged to different moieties. 
In fact, cross-cousin marriage is to be distinguished from the prohibition of 
incest in that the latter employs a system of negative relationships, and the 
marriage of cross-cousins a system of positive relationships. The incest 
prohibition says who cannot be married, while the other establishes which 
spouses are preferred. At the same time, cross-cousin marriage is to be 
distinguished from dual organization in that the latter has an automatic 
procedure (unilineal descent) for sorting out individuals into the two cate- 
gories, while the other has a discriminatory procedure which it applies 
separately to each individual. Finally, cross-cousin marriage is the only type 
of preferential union which can function normally and exclusively and still 
give every man and woman the chance to marry a cross-cousin, wherever the 
kinship terminology divides all the members of the one generation, and of 
the other sex, into two approximately equal categories, viz., cross-cousins 
(real or classificatory) and brothers or sisters (including real brothers and 
sisters and parallel cousins). To our way of thinking, whenever sociologists 



119 




120 



The Elementary Structures oj Kinship 

have grouped cross-cousin marriage with other systems, such as the levirate, 
the sororate, or avuncular marriage, under the general title of preferential 
union, they have failed to show the real importance and place of this form 
of marriage. The levirate, the sororate, and avuncular marriage are not 
preferential unions, because for obvious reasons they cannot constitute the 
exclusive or even preponderant rule of marriage in any group. We would 
prefer to call them privileged unions, since they presuppose other modes of 
marriage on to which they themselves are grafted. 

For example, take the Miwok of California, Gifford supported the thesis 
that the marriage of cross-cousins in this group is a recent innovation, and 
that the former system of marriage was with the wife's brother's daughter. 
The first point will not be discussed here. In our opinion, the fact that the 
marriage system is or is not reflected in the kinship terminology (and Gifford 
establishes that it is not) cannot legitimately be used to support the anteriority 
or the posteriority of a system . 1 However, it is certain that marriage with 
the wife's brother’s daughter has never been the normal form, for the simple 
reason that for someone to marry his wife's brother’s daughter he must 
already have a wife. The wife, similarly, cannot be thus defined without there 
being a vicious circle. Consequently, this form of marriage can never have 
been more than a privileged form, and doubly so, firstly, because it is a 
privilege for a married man, whose wife has a brother, and whose brother 
has a daughter, to be able to claim this daughter as a second wife, and 
secondly, because this system has the quality, which struck Gifford so 
forcefully, of being reflected in twelve different forms of designation. 

But for it to be possible to invoke this last fact in favour of the anteriority 
and generality of the system, it must needs be, as in our society, that indi- 
viduals should never be united by just one kinship relationship. There are 
rare cases of this in societies with classificatory systems, but never in groups 
with a relatively low population density and in which marriages take place 
within a restricted circle. In such societies individuals must choose from 
among the multiple kinship ties which join each of them to all the others . 2 
For example, there is nothing to prevent the father’s sister from being at one 
and the same time the mother’s brother’s wife, if she marries her cross- 
cousin ; a grandmother (if the father’s mother’s brother has a marriage claim 
to the sister’s daughter); a mother-in-law (if someone marries the father’s 
sister’s daughter); and a wife (if someone has a marriage claim to the 
maternal uncle’s widow). In this way the system allows five different terms 
to be applied to the one individual. In these circumstances, what determines 
the term chosen ? It may be the fact that a form of marriage is old or general. 
Perhaps, however, it may also be the fact that it is exceptional. The holders 
of a privilege may wish to enshrine the principle of the matter by bringing 

1 cf. pt. II, ch. XXII. 

2 R. Firth has made similar observations concerning Polynesian societies, cf. Firth 
1930, pp. 235-68; 1936, p. 266 et seq. 




121 



The Marriage of Cousins 

the corresponding term into common usage, or it may please the whole 
group to emphasize any marked oddity arising from the conflict between an 
exceptional form of marriage and a normal form. 

For example, most of the kinship systems of South American tribes 
practising cross-cousin marriage identify grandparents with parents-in-law. 
This custom is easily explained by the practice of avuncular marriage. When 
a girl marries her maternal uncle, her parents-in-law and her grandparents 
are identical. However, this purely feminine perspective ought, from the 
male point of view, to result symmetrically in identifying the parents-in-law 
with the sister and the brother-in-law. Yet this does not happen. For a 
reason open to many different interpretations the feminine perspective is the 
one imposed upon the group. On the other hand, cross-cousin marriage 
establishes a third system of identification which is generally adopted, 
namely, that which groups the cross-uncle and the cross-aunt under the one 
term with the spouse’s father and mother. 

The Nambikwara have only one term for grandfather, mother’s brother 
and father-in-law, and only one term for grandmother, father’s sister and 
mother-in-law. The conclusion to be drawn is certainly not that in South 
America avuncular marriage is older than cross-cousin marriage, or vice 
versa, but that, in accordance with the circumstances and the groups, it is 
one possible solution to conflicts of terminology, and one which has pre- 
vailed over other equally acceptable solutions. Perhaps the adoption of the 
feminine perspective, identifying grandparents with parents-in-law, should 
even be interpreted as a reaction of- the cross-cousin terminology to that of 
avuncular marriage. The status of cross and parallel cousins would remain 
as it was if the terminological confusions resulting from avuncular marriage 
were transferred to the previous generation. It would not be so if this asym- 
metrical terminology prevailed in the generation in which the potential 
spouses, the brothers-in-law and the sisters-in-law, are bound together in 
reciprocal relationships. If this interpretation is correct it follows, not only 
that the system of nomenclature peculiar to avuncular marriage proves 
nothing in support of the priority of this form of marriage in South America, 
but that the peculiar modalities of this system reveal a concomitant and 
opposed form. 

However, the exceptional importance of cross-cousin marriage, as we see 
it, does not derive merely from its unique position at the very hub of matri- 
monial institutions. Its importance is no longer limited to its role as the 
‘pivot’ between the incest prohibition and dual organization. The interest of 
cross-cousin marriage lies especially in the fact that the division that it 
establishes between prescribed and prohibited spouses cuts across a category 
of relatives who, from the viewpoint of biological proximity, are strictly 
interchangeable. This point has often been used to prove that marriage 
prohibitions have no biological basis, but it seems to us that its full signifi- 
cance has never been clearly perceived. 




122 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

It is precisely because cross-cousin marriage disregards the biological 
factor that it should be able to establish that the origin of the incest pro- 
hibition is purely social, and furthermore to reveal what its real nature is. 
It is not enough to repeat that the prohibition of incest is not based on 
biological grounds. What then is its basis? This is the real question, and 
while it remains unanswered the problem cannot be said to have been re- 
solved. For the most part, an answer to this is very difficult to give because 
the prohibited degrees of kinship, taken as a whole, are biologically closer 
than the permitted degrees. Consequently, there is always a doubt as to 
whether it is the biological degree, or the social degree, which is the basis 
of the institution. The difficulty is completely eliminated only in the case of 
cross-cousin marriage, for if we can understand why degrees of kinship 
which are equivalent from a biological point of view are nevertheless 
considered completely dissimilar from the social point of view, we can claim 
to have discovered the principle, not only of cross-cousin marriage, but of the 
incest prohibition itself. 

This method seems so obvious to us that it may be wondered why it was 
not used in the first place, and why cross-cousin marriage was regarded as a 
marriage system like any other, instead of as a phenomenon of another 
order, as we have proposed. The answer is simple. Sociologists have trapped 
themselves in their own argumentation. Because cross-cousin marriage is an 
arbitrary regulation from the biological viewpoint, they have proceeded to 
assert that it is arbitrary in the absolute, whatever viewpoint is adopted. 
Alternatively, but to the same effect, they have tried to reduce it to a secondary 
consequence of heterogeneous institutions, just as some people explain the 
Jewish and Moslem prohibition of the eating of pork by the risk of it being 
bad in old unhygienic civilizations. It is denied that the raison d'etre of an 
institution might be found within the institution itself ; instead, it is reduced 
to a series of contingent connexions, derived as often as not from dual 
organization and the practice of exogamy. 

This intellectual position is particularly apparent in one of the extreme 
writers, who, in a highly tendentious frame of mind, it is true, has made a 
close analysis of cross-cousin marriage: 

‘The first form of exogamy, that of the dual organization, bears every 
trace of artificiality; certain groups of relatives are possible mates, while 
others are forbidden ; the children of brother and sister, cross-cousins may 
marry, while those of two brothers or of two sisters may not marry. Such 
a rule is not founded on any prohibition devised for some other purpose .’ 1 

We realize clearly that Perry, in making this statement, is merely attempting 
to find a basis for a preconceived system, and that this is even more riddled 
with historicism than are those of his predecessors. It is not a bad thing, 
however, to borrow a quotation from a writer whose work is generally 

1 Perry, 1923, p. 381. 




The Marriage of Cousins 123 

denounced as an extravagant abuse of the historical method, for, from our 
present viewpoint, such illustrious predecessors as Tylor and Morgan are 
guilty of just as great an error in method, since it has led them to an analo- 
gous conclusion. Perry identifies cross-cousin marriage with dual organiza- 
tion, and he claims to explain them both historically. But Morgan and Tylor 
are no different, for when they analysed cross-cousin marriage they saw it 
simply as a residue of exogamous customs and dual organization. What 
should have been done, on the contrary, was to treat cross-cousin marriage, 
rules of exogamy, and dual organization as so many examples of one basic- 
structure. This structure should have been interpreted in terms of its total 
characteristics, instead of being broken up into bits and pieces and set 
alongside one another in a juxtaposition which might justify an historical 
interpretation but would have no intrinsic significance. It was especially 
necessary to see that, of the three types of institution, cross-cousin marriage 
is the most significant, making the analysis of this form of marriage the 
veritable experimentum crucis in the study of marriage prohibitions. 



If cross-cousin marriage is not a consequence of dual organization, what is 
its real origin? Swanton 1 has suggested that the origin is to be found in a 
desire to keep the most valuable possessions within the family. However, 
even if such an explanation were conceivable for the tribes of British Columbia 
or India, how could it be extended to the semi-nomadic bands of the Nambik- 
wara of western Brazil, whose members are equally poor in material goods 
and in social prestige to hand on to their descendants? It is true that some 
people do not see any reason to treat the marriage practices of widely 
differing societies as the one and the same phenomenon. For example, Lowie 
concluded his analysis with these words: ‘Cross-cousin marriage is in all 
probability not a phenomenon that has evolved from a single cause but one 
that has independently arisen in several centres from diverse motives .’ 2 

A multiplicity of origins would in no way be excluded if the institution 
of cross-cousins were nothing but a highly specialized form of preferential 
marriage. For example, cross-cousin marriage is frequently encountered in 
the form of preferential marriage with the maternal uncle's daughter, and it 
is by no means certain a priori that, wherever this type of marriage is met 
with, its explanation should rest on a single unique cause. Rivers has given 
a plausible if not indubitable account of it, in the Banks Islands, as a form 
of matrimonial privilege over the girls of the group, handed on to the sister's 
son by the mother’s brother. Also plausible but no more certain is Gifford’s 
explanation for it among the Miwok, as a privilege over the wife’s brother’s 
daughter handed on to his sons by their father. But the question is not 

1 Swanton, 19056, p. 50 et seq. In the same sense, Wedgwood, 1936a, pp. 612-13; 
Richards, 1914, pp. 194-8. 2 Lowie, 1961, p. 31. 




1 24 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

altogether posed in this way. Side by side with marriage with the mother’s 
brother’s daughter, there is, less frequently it is true, marriage with the 
father’s sister’s daughter. Moreover, in the great majority of cases, there is 
marriage with the father’s sister’s daughter who is at the same time the mother’s 
brother’s daughter (when the father’s sister has married the mother’s brother); 
there are innumerable cases, nevertheless, even where cross-cousin marriage 
does not exist, of the mother’s brother’s children and the father’s sister's 
children falling into a common category, to be distinguished from the father’s 
brother’s children and the mother’s sister’s children who are called brothers 
and sisters. There are even more frequent cases of special terms, or a common 
term, being used to isolate the mother’s brother on the one hand, and the 
father’s sister on the other, from parallel uncles and aunts who are generally 
identified with the father and the mother. There are symmetrical cases - but 
not always - in which nephews and nieces descended from a brother or a 
sister of the same sex as the speaker are called sons and daughters, or are 
simply distinguished from nephews and nieces descended from a kinsman of 
the opposite sex and are called by different terms. There are the matrimonial 
privileges of the maternal uncle over the sister’s daughter, and more rarely, 
of the brother’s son over the father’s sister. Finally, even when there are no 
matrimonial preferences and privileges, and sometimes when they are both 
expressly denied, there is a whole range of special relationships between 
cross-cousins, between cross-aunts and cross-uncles and cross-nephews and 
cross-nieces, characterized by respect or familiarity, authority or licence. 

No doubt each of these features has its own particular history, and 
doubtless also its history can vary from group to group. At the same time, 
however, no feature is to be seen as an independent entity isolated from all 
others. On the contrary, each appears as a variation on a basic theme, as a 
special modality outlined against a common backdrop, and it is only the 
individual qualities in each which are to be explained by reference to causes 
peculiar to the group or the cultural area under consideration. What, there- 
fore, is this common basis? The only one possible is a general kinship struct- 
ure, more or less completely reflected in every system, but which all systems 
with any of the features enumerated in the preceding paragraph partially 
exemplify, though in differing degrees. As systems without any of these 
features are far less common than systems with at least one of them and 
probably more, and as the latter systems are scattered all over the world, 
no region being completely devoid of them, it is this general structure, of all 
the rules of kinship, which, second only to the incest prohibition, most nearly 
approaches universality. 



in 

The idea that kinship must be interpreted as a structural phenomena, and 
not simply as the result of a juxtaposition of terms and customs, is not new. 




The Marriage of Cousins 125 

Goldenweiser asserted it when he remarked that there must be a way to 
approach the study of kinship systems which avoids their apparent and 
impossible complexity, and when he outlined how a particular example 
could be subjected to this structural analysis. 1 Spier has not only shown that 
this ought to be the sociologist’s point of view, but that it might also be that 
of the natives. He says that it is with very good reason that the word ‘system’ 
is used for the collection of terms which serve to describe kinship relation- 
ships. It seemed clear to him that the Maricopa themselves conceived of 
kinship terms as a clearly defined system. He adds that the female informant 
needed to know only the sex and relative age of the brothers and sisters 
composing the lineages to give, without any hesitation whatsoever, the terms 
employed between any two kinsmen belonging to subsequent generations, 
however distant the degree. 2 

‘In fact, it is partly as a theoretical formula that subsections are carried 
intertribally’, says Stanner 3 of the Murinbata of Australia, and he adds: 
‘Those who doubt the aborigines’ power of such abstract reasoning can 
never have heard them expounding to their tribe’s fellows how qinipun 
(subsections) should work, by inference from the theory to the case under 
attention. In this way an abstraction becomes a flesh-and-blood reality.’ 4 
The same writer has given a fascinating description of how a complex system 
with marriage classes can be borrowed and learned in a theoretical form: 

‘One or two exceptionally intelligent natives are regarded by their tribes 
as experts in the new fashions. Each of them is a traveller, having roamed 
beyond the tribal homelands, often over very great distances. They have 
been schooled in alien camps until they know perfectly these verbal 
accounts of how the subsections work. One described to me how he had 
sat down for days at a time near the mosquito-ridden Victoria River and 
had been patiently instructed by his Djamindjung friends . . . His in- 
structors had drawn marks in the dust, or broken twigs, each mark or 
twig a subsection or a man. This man was pointed out to him as his kaka , 
this one as his r/atan (brother), that woman whose name was not even to 
be whispered was his pipi ijinar. Each one was this or that “skin" who in 
turn “made” another “skin”. In this way he learned. The formulae are 
in a real sense a book of rules.’ 5 

Deacon gives evidence which helps to throw light on the theoretical 
nature of the native’s conception of his own marriage system. Deacon’s 
description is all the more significant because it refers to one of the most 
complex systems known, the six-class system of Ambrym. 6 On two different 
occasions the natives gave Deacon demonstrations, using diagrams. Once 
an informant placed three white stones equidistant on the ground, each 

1 Goldenweiser, 1913, pp. 281-94. 2 Spier, 1933, p. 209. 

3 Stanner, 1936, p. 202. 4 loc. cit- 3 ibid. p. 208. 

6 The Ambrym system will be studied and discussed in another work. 




126 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

representing a line joined to the other two by a unilateral marriage relation- 
ship. Another informant drew three long lines on the ground (D, E, F), 
each representing a man from one of the three lines (Fig. 5). The marriage 
of each man and his children were represented by lines of different lengths 
placed to the left of the principal line for the spouse and to the right for the 
children. Boys and girls were distinguished by the length of the linear symbols 
given them. The two marriage cycles were indicated by two circles closing 
in opposite directions. This diagram revealed the whole functioning of the 
system and agreed perfectly with hypotheses to be made from the theoretical 
system : 



Fig. 5. 

Diagram traced by 
the Ambrym natives 
to explain their kin- 
ship system. (The long 
lines stand for men, 
and the short for 
women ; the arrows 
separate the 'lines’ 
within the same bila- 
teral group ( bwelem ). 



‘It is perfectly clear that the natives (the intelligent ones) do conceive of 
the system as a connected mechanism which they can represent by dia- 
grams . . . The way they could reason about relationships from their 
diagrams was absolutely on a par with a good scientific exposition in a 
lecture-room.’ 1 

The same author describes similar experiences in Malekula, in the New 
Hebrides, and he adds: 

‘The old men explained the system [of marriage] to me perfectly lucidly; I 
could not explain it to anyone better myself ... It is extraordinary that a 




1 Deacon, 1927, pp. 329-32 and n., p. 329. 




The Marriage of Cousins 127 

native should be able to represent completely by a diagram a complex 
system of matrimonial classes ... I have collected in Malekula, too, some 
cases of a remarkable mathematical ability. I hope ... to be able to prove 
that the native is capable of pretty advanced abstract thought .’ 1 

Bateson seems to be of the same opinion with regard to the New Guinea 
natives: ‘Thus the culture is to a great extent in the custody of men trained 
in erudition and dialectic ’, 2 which are put to use in such quarrels as between 
the Sun and the Mother moieties. It is a question of which of these two great 
social units can claim ownership of the Night. One moiety claimed that 
Night was a positive reality in itself and could thus be appropriated freely, 
while the other moiety defined it as the negation of day, the consequence of 
the absence of the Sun totem, whence any claim by the Sun moiety must be 
a contradiction in terms . 3 

This logical versatility is ultimately reflected in the terminology. The study 
of kinship vocabularies shows that the native conceives of kinship phenomena 
as a system of relations rather than as a collection of statuses. Later we shall 
see how Radcliffe- Brown was induced to interpret Australian aboriginal 
kinship systems using an analysis, the basic elements of which are relation- 
ships (e.g., ‘pairs', ‘cycles’ and ‘couples’ 4 ), and not terms. But native theory 
preceded him in this discovery. The Kanakas have special terms for the 
combinations formed respectively by : 

husband and wife (pair): duawe 
father and son (couple): duanoro 
mother and daughter (cycle): duaduwe 

and even for relationships which are still obscure for the theoretician : 

grandfather and grandson (alternate generations): duaeri 
maternal uncle and nephew (avuncular relationship): duarha . 5 

Likewise the Fijian system has nine dual terms each expressing a specific 
relationship between two persons, or two groups of persons, rather than the 
persons themselves; father and child; mother and child; brothers; sisters; 
brother and sister; grandfather and grandchild; grandmother and grand- 
child ; uncle and nephew ; cousins of the same sex ; cousins of different sexes ; 
husband and wife . 6 To this list may be added the term veiqaravi, ‘those who 
stand opposite one another ’, 7 which expresses the relationship of partners 
which is implied in any ritual: between god and worshipper, victim and 
sacrificer, priest and acolyte, king and priest, etc . 8 

Primitive thought, therefore, is not incapable of conceiving of complex 
structures and apprehending relationships. Lowie called explicitly on these 

1 ibid, 1934, pp. xxii-xxiii. 2 Bateson, 1936, p. 227. 3 ibid. p. 230. 

* cf. ch. XI. 5 Leenhardt, 1 930, p. 59. 

* Hocart, 1929, p. 34. 7 ibid. 1933. 8 loc. cit. 




128 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

capacities when, in a now classic article, 1 he set out to question Rivers’s 
interpretation of cross-cousin marriage in the Banks Islands, replacing 
Rivers's local and historical explanation with the permanent function of 
exogamy. In this particular case we believe such an appeal is most unreliable, 
but this is no place to start a debate on the problem. At all events, the general 
direction which Lowie gave to the study of kinship problems was right, just 
as he was right in showing that exogamy as a regulating principle, stripped of 
its historical or local modalities, is always likely to follow two different 
courses in its action, firstly confusing direct and collateral lines, and secondly 
confusing generations. It is in the same spirit that attention must be drawn 
to a third structural orientation, not limited to exogamy, although a necessary 
concomitant of it, and found also in a great number of systems without clans 
and dual organization. We mean the distinction between collaterals of the 
same degree, according as kinship is established through a relative of the 
same or of different sex. In other words, it is the idea that the brother-sister 
relationship is identical with the sister-brother relationship, 2 but that these 
both differ from the brother-brother and the sister-sister relationships, which 
are identical with one another. Even more succinctly, it is the principle 
whereby there are considerable differences of status attached to whether the 
structure of collateral relationships (from the point of view of the arrange- 
ment of the sexes) is symmetrical or asymmetrical. 

In this way we arrive at the most general formula for the phenomena 
studied in the previous chapters. An uncle does not have the same status for 
his nephews if he is the brother of a father who is his own brother, or the 
brother of a mother who is for him a sister, and it is the same with the aunt. 
Nephews and nieces are distinguished according as they are the children of 
my sister (if I am a man), or of my brother (if I am a woman), or according 
as they are the children of my brother whose brother I am, or of my sister, 
whose sister I am. Finally, a female cousin or a male cousin, the child of a 
brother's brother, or a sister’s sister, is to me, as it were, a brother or a 
sister, while if we are kinsfolk in an asymmetrical structure, sister’s brother 
or brother’s sister, he, or she, becomes something else entirely, perhaps even 
the person farthest removed from a kinsman, i.e., a spouse. In a very great 
number of societies there are consequences , ranging from a mere difference 
in terminology to a transformation in the whole system of rights and duties , 
following from the fact that there is or is not a change of sex in passing from 
the direct line to the collateral line. Let us repeat: undoubtedly, this principle 
and all the consequences arising from it coincide perfectly with dual organi- 
zation; nevertheless, they cannot be explained as resulting from this type 
of social organization. Firstly, such an interpretation, as we have seen, would 
lead to cross-cousin marriage itself being made a consequence of dual 

1 Lowie, 1915, pp. 223-39. 

2 Except in the most endogainous systems in which marriage with the (older) sister is 
permitted only because the two relationships are not reciprocal; cf. ch. I, p. 9-10. 




The Marriage of Cousins 129 

organization, but neither the facts nor the analysis of the respective theoretical 
characteristics of the two institutions would justify such a conclusion. 
Secondly, this distinction of the relationships between the direct line and 
the collateral line, according as they reproduce symmetrical structures or 
asymmetrical structures, is met with in societies which do not practise 
cross-cousin marriage and which have no division into moieties. 1 

It would be just as useless to invoke the levirate and the sororate, which are 
very widespread, because these institutions, for the same reason as the features 
listed earlier, are elements of an original complex to which they owe their 
existence but of which they embody but few of the characteristics. Therefore, 
supposing it were alleged that some of the characteristics of the complex 
could be explained by one institution, and some by another, and so on until 
they had all been exhausted, it would still have to be shown how this complex 
can have the structural nature on which we have insisted, and how this 
structure can be both simpler but richer in possibilities than the isolated 
elements which are claimed to be primary. Before the institutions, and as a 
condition of their existence, there is in fact the apprehension of a relationship, 
or more exactly the apprehension of the opposition between two relation- 
ships. These relationships concern both the direct line and the collateral 
line, and the difference emerges from the fact that these two lines can be 
linked through relatives of the one sex, or relatives of different sexes. Why is 
this difference seen as an opposition ? 

The characteristic feature of cross-cousin marriage cannot merely be 
reduced to the existence of a social barrier between biologically identical 
degrees. Neither is it a purely negative limit merely excluding parallel cousins 
from marrying, but a complete reversal in direction. The antipathy shown to 
parallel cousins does not simply disappear in the presence of cross-cousins; 
it is transformed into its opposite, that is to say, into affinity. Consequently, 
it is not enough to give a separate explanation for the prohibition of parallel 
cousins, nor would it serve any useful purpose to give an interpretation 
ignoring the fact that cross-cousins are included among the possible spouses. 
Positive and negative phenomena mean nothing by themselves, but form 
parts of a whole. If our general concept is correct, cross-cousins are recom- 
mended for the same reason that parallel cousins are excluded. 

These difficulties are clarified if cross-cousin marriage is seen as the elemen- 
tary formula for marriage by exchange, and if exchange is seen as the raison 
d'etre of the system of oppositions the structural qualities of which were 
emphasized in the previous paragraphs. In our opinion, the source of all 
the uncertainties surrounding the problem of incest and the study of marriage 
prohibitions is none other than our tendency to think of marriage in terms 

1 By comparing the relationships of reciprocity between cross-cousins among the Azande, 
and father and son among the Pawnee, Hocart has clearly seen that both forms derive 
from a basic relationship between a male individual and a female individual. (Hocart, 
1935, pp. 149-51.) 




1 30 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

of our own institutions, as a unilateral act of transfer and as an asymmetrical 
institution, when in fact (and even among ourselves) it is a bilateral act and 
a symmetrical institution. The only difference is that preponderantly in 
primitive societies the symmetrical structure of the institution involves two 
groups, while in modern societies the symmetrical elements are on the one 
hand a class tending to be reduced solely to the individual, and on the other 
a class which extends so far as to be confused with the social group as a 
whole. We have already come across an analogous formula in accounting 
for polygamous marriage and the relationship of reciprocity between the 
chief and his band. 1 In this regard, the juridical basis of modern marriage 
appears as the generalization or democratization of a model with a more 
limited application. However, let us begin by determining the true nature of 
cross-cousin marriage. 

Suppose there are two patrilineal and patrilocal family groups, A and B , 
united by the marriage of a h girl and an a man. From the viewpoint of group 
A, the b woman represents an acquisition, while for group B, she represents 
a loss. Thus, for group A, which benefits, the marriage is expressed by a 
change to a debit position, and for group B, which is decreased by the loss of 
one female member to the profit of group A, by the acquiring of a credit. 
Similarly, the marriage of each of the men of group B and of group A 
represents a gain for his respective group, and thus places the group in 
general, and the family involved in particular, in the position of debtor. By 
contrast, the marriage of each of the a or b women represents a loss, and 
thus opens up a right to compensation. Related women are women lost; 
women brought in by marriage are women gained. Each family descended 
from these marriages thus bears a sign, which is determined, for the initial 
group, by whether the children’s mother is a daughter or a daughter-in-law. 
Families descended from a daughter and a son-in-law result from an im- 
poverishment of the group, and, from the initial group’s viewpoint, have a 
credit to their account. Families which derive from the marriage of a son 
and daughter-in-law are families of acquisition, and since they have gained, 
they must give. The sign changes in passing from the brother to the sister, 
since the brother gains a wife, while the sister is lost to her own family. But 
the sign also changes in passing from one generation to the next. It depends 
upon whether, from the initial group’s point of view, the father has received 
a wife, or the mother has been transferred outside, whether the sons have 
the right to a woman or owe a sister. Certainly, in real life, this difference 
does not mean that half the male cousins are destined to remain bachelors. 
However, at all events, it does express the law that a man cannot receive 
a wife except from the group from which a woman can be claimed, because 
in the previous generation a sister or a daughter was lost, while a brother 
owes a sister (or a father, a daughter) to the outside world if a woman was 
gained in the previous generation. 

1 cf. ch. IV, p. 44. 




The Marriage of Cousins 1 3 1 

A diagram will illustrate this analysis (Fig. 6). Each couple bears a ( + ) 
or ( — ) sign, according to whether it results from a woman being lost to or 




*1 

t ) 



i — r 



A = 1 » 






A = ■ > 



-t 

1 



1 r 



( ) 



A 



1 

o 



r 

A 



l ' 



+ 



+ 







1 

A = O 

+ 

I I 

A O 






a male '' female a = o husband and wife a o brother and sister 

Fig. 6. Cross-cousin marriage. 

The cousins who are in the ( H — ) relationship are cross ; those who are in 

the ( + + ) or ( ) relationship are parallel. 



acquired by line A or B. The sign changes in the following generation, the 
members of which are all cousins to one another. The pivot-couple, formed 
by an A man married to a B woman, obviously has two signs, according to 
whether it is envisaged from the viewpoint of A, or that of B, and the same 
is true for the children. It is now only necessary to look at the cousins’ 

generation to establish that all those in the relationship ( + +) or ( ) 

are parallel to one another, while all those in the relationship (H — ) or 
( — b) are cross. Thus, the notion of reciprocity allows the dichotomy of 
cousins to be immediately deduced. In other words, two male cousins who 
are both in the credit position towards their father’s group (and in the debit 
position with regard to their mother’s group) cannot exchange their sisters 
any more than could two male cousins in a credit position with regard to 
their mother’s group (and debit position with regard to the father’s group). 
This intimate arrangement would leave somewhere outside not only groups 
which did not make restitution, but also groups which did not receive any- 
thing, and marriage in both would be a unilateral transfer. In the final 
analysis, therefore, cross-cousin marriage simply expresses the fact that 
marriage must always be a giving and a receiving, but that one can receive 
only from him who is obliged to give, and that the giving must be to him who 
has a right to receive, for the mutual gift between debtors leads to privilege, 
whereas the mutual gift between creditors leads inevitably to extinction. 

There is nothing to prevent us from supposing in our theoretical diagram 
that exchange has already taken place in the parental generation. In this case, 
all the marriages will conform to the pivot-couple’s marriage, that is, between 
A men and B women, or between B men and A women. Furthermore, the 




132 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

children will be cross or parallel in both the paternal and the maternal lines, 
instead of in only one, the general structure remaining the same. It might 
also be supposed that the initial exchange had taken place between the 
grandparents, the A grandmother being the sister of the B grandfather, and 
vice versa. In this case, the following generation (that of the parents) will 
already be composed of cross-cousins, and the children's generation will 
have the same structure as in the preceding case, for the exchange of sisters or 
daughters, wherever it takes place, makes cross-cousins. The children of 
cross-cousins are cross-cousins in relation to one another; children descended 
from an exchange of sisters between men without any kinship relationship 
are cross-cousins; and even children descended from an exchange between 
parallel cousins are cross-cousins. 

It may have been noted that we have assumed what might be called, so as 
not to prejudge institutions, a paternal perspective. That is, we have regarded 
the woman married by a member of the group as acquired, and the sister 
provided in exchange as lost. The situation might be altogether different in 
a system with matrilineal descent and matrilocal residence, i.e., in which the 
children belong to the mother's group, or where the mother’s group profits 
from the husband’s services. But, whatever the system, the same phenomenon 
is always to be found, although it may be expressed in more or less complex 
ways. In fact, the advantages or losses resulting from marriage are rarely 
shared out as simply as we have supposed for the clarity of the diagram. 
Each group loses and gains at the same time, according to the way in which 
the rights are distributed. Descent may be gained while residence is lost, or 
vice versa, and material goods and social titles are not necessarily transmitted 
homogeneously. The essential thing is that every right acquired entails a 
concomitant obligation, and that every renunciation calls for a compensation. 
In marriage by exchange, these renunciations and acquisitions always affect 
both unions symmetrically, but inversely. Even supposing a very hypothetical 
marriage system in which the man and not the woman were exchanged, it 
would only be necessary to reverse all the signs in the diagram and the total 
structure would remain unchanged. 

But there is no need, in this theoretical case, to postulate any precise type 
of institution. If there is any real case corresponding to this theoretical one 
it is clearly that of primitive bands composed of biological families set 
closely side by side, or, on the contrary, without regular contacts, and still 
at a very elementary stage of organization. As a matter of fact, our inter- 
pretative diagram does not imply the existence of stable institutions, or the 
establishment of a particular rule of descent or residence. It merely implies 
that women are regarded as valuables - a psychological attitude sufficiently 
attested to in the great majority of primitive societies, and by the relationships 
between the sexes at the animal level - and the apprehension by the individual 
of reciprocal relationships of the type: A is to B as B is to A; or again, if 
A is to D as B is to C, C must be to D as B is to A; that is, the two formulas 




133 



The Marriage of Cousins 

for the exchange of sisters and for cross-cousin marriage. The acquisition of 
a capacity to apprehend these structures poses a problem, but a psychological, 
not a sociological one. We shall return to this point later. We know for a 
fact that structures of this type are conceived of by primitive thought. 




CHAPTER X 



Matrimonial Exchange 

i 

Frazer must be given credit for being the first to call attention to the structural 
similarity between marriage by exchange and cross-cousin marriage, and for 
establishing the real connexion between the two. His starting-point is the 
observation that in certain kinship systems requiring preferential marriage 
with only one of the cross-cousins (usually the mother’s brother’s daughter) 
there is nevertheless the double identification of the mother’s brother with 
the father-in-law and the father’s sister with the mother-in-law. However, 
it is impossible to understand this second identification unless there is 
marriage with the father’s sister's daughter. Frazer remarks that this difficulty 
is cleared up if we suppose that the two female cross-cousins are identical, 
that is, if the mother’s brother’s daughter is also the father’s sister’s daughter , 1 
a situation which arises automatically when the cross-cousins are descended 
from men who have exchanged their sisters. This connexion between cross- 
cousin marriage and marriage by exchange is very clearly understood in 
some cases: ‘Thus in Mandla and Bastar a man thinks he has a right to his 
sister’s daughter for his son on the ground that his family has given a girl 
to her husband’s family, and therefore they should give one back. This match 
is known as Dudh lautana or bringing back the milk .' 2 In actual fact, among 
the same Gonds, ‘milk money’, or compensation for the cross-cousin, is 
owed if she marries a man other than the prescribed cousin . 3 The Maratha 
Brahmans have a proverb: ‘At a sister’s house her brother’s daughter is 
a daughter-in-law .’ 4 Among the Kachin of Burma, who prohibit marriage 
between all close relatives - except the mother’s brother’s daughter and the 
father’s sister’s son, who are obligatory spouses under pain of fine — marriage 
by exchange functions as a substitute for cross-cousin marriage, when the 
prescribed relatives are lacking. 

However, it is in Australia particularly that the remarkable coincidence 
between marriage by exchange and cross-cousin marriage can be established : 

‘It may be safely laid down as a broad and general proposition that among 

these savages a wife was obtained by the exchange of a female relative . . . 

• Frazer, 1919, vol. II, p. 104. 2 ibid. pp. 120-1. 3 ibid. p. 121. 4 ibid. p. 124. 

134 




1 35 



Matrimonial Exchange 

The most common practice is the exchange of girls by their respective 

fathers as wives for each other’s sons, or in some tribes the exchange of 

sisters, or of some female relatives by the young men themselves .' 1 

Similar evidence is provided by Curr and Lumholtz. Among the Narrinyeri, 
says another writer also quoted by Frazer, it is considered a humiliation for 
a woman not to be ‘ given away in exchange ’, 2 and a wife acquired in any 
other way has a status little different from that of a prostitute in our society. 
Moreover, it is a general fact in Australia that a man cannot hope to obtain 
a wife if he has no sister, daughter or god-daughter to give in exchange. 
Brough Smyth draws a moving picture of the condition almost of despair to 
which the bachelor who fails to obtain a wife is reduced in spite of himself in 
Australian aboriginal society: ‘A man who has no female relations that can 
be exchanged for a young woman of another tribe leads an unhappy life. 
Not onlv must he attend to his own wants, and share the discomforts of 
the bachelors’ quarters, but he is an object of suspicion to the older men, 
who have perhaps two or three young wives to watch . . . There is the dis- 
content and unrest of such a life, which makes him a dull companion, a 
quarrelsome friend, and a bitter enemy .’ 3 In actual fact, as Frazer puts it , 4 
the ‘poor and desperate’ bachelor who cannot obtain a wife in the normal 
manner by exchange is forced to lead the life of an outlaw, for his only 
chance lies in carrying off one of the women of his group, or in capturing a 
woman from another group. In both cases, however, the group will turn 
against him, either out of solidarity with the injured member, or through 
fear of trouble with other groups. Furthermore, the question anxiously 
discussed in the council of ciders will be the same in both cases: where is a 
woman to be obtained to give in exchange for the one carried off or captured, 
in order to appease the original possessor ? All these observations immediately 
call to mind others from other societies . 5 

The remarkable coincidence between the exchange of wives and the marriage 
of cross-cousins is shown not only in the theoretical analysis with which we 
have been concerned, but also in the data assembled by Frazer. In these 
circumstances, how is it that the hypothesis first formulated by Frazer did 
not immediately gain a wide acceptance? How is it that his far-reaching 
theory explaining cross-cousin marriage in terms of marriage by exchange 
was not immediately and definitively accepted? Moreover, why today does 
it seem to be abandoned in favour of other explanations ? 6 In our opinion, 
Frazer clearly saw the correct course to take, but he never followed it right 
to the end. He gathered facts with a lucidity which leaves nothing to be 



1 ibid. p. 195. 2 ibid. p. 196. 3 ibid. pp. 197-8. 4 ibid. p. 199. 5 cf. ch. III. 

* cf. for example Wedgwood, 1936a and 19366. Wedgwood’s argument that Frazer is 

contradicted by the Torres Straits Islanders and the New Guinea natives who exchange 

wives but prohibit cross-cousin marriage is fallacious. From the fact that cross-cousin 

marriage is a marriage by exchange, it does not follow that every marriage by exchange 

is effected between cross-cousins. 




1 36 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

desired, but the interpretation he gave them is strangely narrow and dis- 
appointing considering all the possibilities available to him. 

Seeing the connexion between cross-cousin marriage and marriage by 
exchange should have led to the discovery of the universal, permanent, and 
basic structure of marriage. By contrast, Frazer saw cross-cousin marriage as 
an historical form of marriage, marriage by exchange as another such form, 
and he concentrated on placing these, together with other forms such as 
dual organization and the classificatory system, in a temporal sequence, 
and on setting up causal connexions between them. What we regard as the 
means of escaping from cultural history he attempted to interpret as cultural 
history. The very thing we see as a necessary condition of society, he sought 
to analyse into stages of social evolution. It seems moreover that Frazer 
has some inkling of the possibilities laid open by his theory, but he mentions 
them only to recoil immediately in horror. With regard to Australian marriage 
classes, which are always even in number, he writes : 

‘This suggests, what all the evidence tends to confirm, that these various 
groups have been produced by the deliberate and repeated bisection of a 
community, first into two, then into four, and finally into eight exogamous 
and intermarrying groups or classes; for no one, so far as I know, has yet 
ventured to maintain that society is subject to a physical law, in virtue 
of which communities, like crystals, tend automatically and unconsciously 
to integrate or disintegrate, along rigid mathematical lines, into exactly 
symmetrical units.’ 1 

We certainly would never think of comparing societies with crystals. But if, 
as we try to show here, it is true that the transition from nature to culture 
is determined by man’s ability to think of biological relationships as systems 
of oppositions; opposition between the men who own and the women who 
are owned; opposition among the latter between wives who are acquired 
and sisters and daughters who are given away ; opposition between two types 
of bond, i.e., bonds of alliance and bonds of kinship; opposition in the 
lineages, between the consecutive series (composed of individuals of the same 
sex) and the alternate series (where the sex changes in passing from one 
individual to another); and if it is true, finally, that exchange is the immediate 
result of these pairs of oppositions and that the dichotomy of cousins reflects 
the exchange, then no doubt it could be said that: ‘Human societies tend 
automatically and unconsciously to disintegrate, along rigid mathematical 
lines, into exactly symmetrical units.’ But perhaps it must be acknowledged 
that duality, alternation, opposition and symmetry, whether presented in 
definite forms or in imprecise forms, are not so much matters to be explained, 
as basic and immediate data of mental and social reality which should be the 
starting-point of any attempt at explanation. 

The first fault in Frazer’s interpretation rests in the dissociation which 

1 Frazer, 1919, vol. II, p. 231. 




Matrimonial Exchange 1 37 

he makes, within cross-cousin marriage, between two problems which 
according to him have only a contingent connexion. For him, the question 
why cross-cousins can marry has absolutely nothing to do with the question 
why parallel cousins cannot. He sees these questions as so distinct that he 
studies them in two different chapters, and has two different explanations, 
one to account for the preference, and one for prohibition. Frazer does not 
hesitate to generalize from facts found in Australian aboriginal society: 
‘It seems reasonable to suppose that in all Australian tribes which permitted 
or favoured the marriage of cross-cousins, such marriages were the direct 
consequence of the interchange of sisters in marriage and of nothing else. 
And that interchange of sisters flowed directly from the economic necessity 
of paying for a wife in kind, in other words of giving a woman in return for 
the woman whom a man received in marriage.’ 1 As marriage by exchange is 
found in connexion with cross-cousin marriage in numerous other societies, 
for example, the Madiga and the Idiga of Mysore, several tribes from Barwani, 
and the district of Almora, in the United Provinces of India, and also several 
tribes from Assam and Baluchistan, and as, on the other hand, marriage 
by exchange is itself a widespread institution found among the western 
Torres Straits islanders, the Mowat, the Banaro of New Guinea, in Buin, 
among the Pededarimu of Kiwai, the Santal of Bengal, the Senoufo and 
Mossi of the Sudan, in Sumatra, and finally in modern Palestine, the con- 
clusion can be reached that, as among the Kariera of Australia, where the 
connexion is particularly clear, ‘the marriage of cross-cousins flows directly 
and simply in the ordinary course of events, from the interchange of sisters in 
marriage’. 2 

But why did Frazer, having thus set out the basic explanatory principle, 
abandon it immediately as being inadequate? As a matter of fact, he writes: 
‘But if we have found an answer to the question. Why is the marriage of 
cross-cousins so commonly favoured? we have still to find an answer to the 
question, Why is the marriage of ortho-cousins so commonly forbidden?’ 3 
As we shall see, not only does his answer to this second question have 
nothing to do with the first, but it seems that even in propounding it Frazer 
was caught up in a host of contradictions, and lost all the ground that he 
had previously gained. But first let us ask ourselves why exchange, which 
seemed to us to allow the dichotomy of cousins to be directly deduced, seems 
to Frazer to be connected exclusively with cross-cousins, and not at all with 
parallel cousins. 

There are two basic differences between Frazer's concept of exchange 
and the concept which we ourselves have proposed. Both these differences 
arise from the fact that whereas we see exchange as a mere aspect of a total 
structure of reciprocity which (in circumstances still to be specified) was 
immediately and intuitively apprehended by social man, Frazer sees it as just 
one of many institutions in an evolutionary series. Let us elaborate this point. 

1 ibid. p. 209. 2 loc. cit. 3 ibid. p. 221. 




1 38 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

For Frazer, marriage by exchange is not a primitive institution, but was 
preceded by other forms of marriage such as promiscuity, consanguineous 
marriage, and group marriage. It appeared only when the ‘society progressed 
from group marriage, or from still laxer forms of commerce between the 
sexes, to individual marriage’. 1 In the second place, Frazer conceives of the 
exchange of wives as a convenient solution to the economic problem of how 
to obtain a wife. He repeatedly asserts that the exchange of sisters and 
daughters ‘was everywhere at first a simple case of barter.’ 2 He depicts the 
poor Australian aborigine wondering how he is going to obtain a wife 
since he has no material goods with which to purchase her, and discovering 
exchange as the solution to this apparently insoluble problem: ‘Men ex- 
changed their sisters in marriage because that was the cheapest way of 
getting a wife.’ 3 This economic concept of exchange appears again in Frazer’s 
conclusion, since, when all is said and done, his recognition of a necessary 
connexion between exchange and cross-cousin marriage is based on the 
universality of economic laws: ‘For under the surface alike of savagery and 
of civilization the economic forces are as constant and uniform in their 
operation as the forces of nature, of which, indeed, they are merely a pecul- 
iarly complex manifestation.’ 4 

In this work, we have constantly sought to show that, far from exchange 
being a form of purchase, purchase must be seen as a form of exchange. 
Because Frazer was happy to give his primitive man the mentality of the 
Homo (Economicus as conceived of by nineteenth-century philosophers he 
completely failed to see the solidarity between the preference for cross- 
cousins and the prohibition of parallel cousins: ‘Regarded from the purely 
economic point of view there seems to be no difference between the women’, 5 
he writes of the two kinds of cousins. But it is precisely from the economic 
viewpoint that exchange should not be envisaged. Frazer first postulates 
the existence of economic goods, including women, and he asserts that from 
the economic viewpoint it makes no difference whether sisters are exchanged 
between cross-cousins or between parallel cousins. There is no doubt but 
that it leads to an impasse. By contrast, our first postulate is the awareness of 
an opposition between two types of woman, or rather between two types 
of relationship in which a man may stand with a woman. She may, on the 
one hand, be a sister or a daughter, i.e., a woman given, or on the other, a 
wife, i.e., a woman received. To put it in other words, she is either a kins- 
woman or a relative by marriage. We have shown how this primitive oppo- 
sition is used to build up a structure of reciprocity, according to which the 
group which has received must give, and the group which has given can 
demand. In this way we have established that, whatever the group, parallel 
cousins come from families in the same formal position, which is a position 
of static equilibrium, while cross-cousins come from families in conflicting 

2 ibid. p. 220. 

5 ibid. p. 221. 



1 Frazer, 1919, vol. II, p. 203. 
4 ibid. p. 220. 



3 ibid. p. 254. 




Matrimonial Exchange 139 

formal positions, i.e., in relationship to one another they are in a dynamic 
disequilibrium, which is the inheritance of kinship, and which alliance alone 
has the power to resolve. The exchange relationship comes before the things 
exchanged, and is independent of them. If the goods considered in isolation 
are identical, they cease to be so when assigned their proper place in the 
structure of reciprocity. 

Thus Frazer is faced with an insoluble difficulty when he comes across a 
marriage system such as among the Buin of the Solomon Islands, where the 
exchange of women, instead of being substituted for purchase, is, on the 
contrary, superimposed upon it. It is true that he suggests that when goods 
of identical value are transferred, the two purchases cancel one another out 
as if they did not exist: ‘If two men pay each other half-a-crown, the net 
result is precisely the same as if they had neither paid nor received anything.’ 1 
But in Erromanga and several regions of central and eastern Asia, where 
exchanges of women are between districts and not families, it is not merely 
a question of goods of the same value being doubly transacted, but the same 
objects accompany the transfer of wives, both coming and going. It is 
therefore an operation which is not only null from the economic point of 
view, but absurd. By contrast, the whole thing becomes very clear when it is 
acknowledged that it is the exchange which counts and not the things 
exchanged. As Frazer puts it on another occasion, ‘the strictly mercantile, 
not to say mercenary, character of these connubial transactions lies on the 
surface’. 2 But one can go further still, for Frazer’s hypothesis is contradictory. 
He purports to prove the great antiquity of cross-cousin marriage by assuming 
the origin of the exchange of women to be in groups so primitive that women 
were the only objects of value available: ‘In the general poverty characteristic 
of low savagery a man had practically no other lawful mode of obtaining 
a wife.’ 3 From this he concludes that cross-cousin marriage began under a 
system of ‘extreme ignorance and extreme poverty, if not in absolute desti- 
tution’. 4 We more than agree on the extreme primitiveness of marriage by 
exchange. In such circumstances, however, with Frazer supposing a form of 
humanity so rudimentary as to have no means of payment, how was exchange 
substituted for purchase? Where did the notion of purchase itself arise? 
In point of fact, Frazer pictures an abstract individual with an economic 
awareness, and he then takes him back through the ages to a distant time 
when there were neither riches nor means of payment. In this paradoxical 
situation he has him discover, in a prophetic vision, an anticipatory sub- 
stitute for the woman’s worth in the woman herself. But actually there is 
nothing in the exchange of women faintly resembling a reasoned solution 
to an economic problem (although it can acquire this function in societies 
which have already learnt in some other way what purchase and sale are). 
It is a primitive and indivisible act of awareness which sees the daughter or 

2 ibid. p. 218. 

4 ibid. p. 220, n. 2. 



1 ibid. p. 220, n. 1. 
3 ibid. p. 245. 




140 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



sister as a valuable which is offered, and vice versa the daughter and sister 
of someone else as a valuable which may be demanded. 



This false interpretation of the origin of exchange comes, as we have said, 
from the fact that Frazer sees exchange itself as a derivative phenomenon, 
arising from calculation and reflection. It is this same narrowly historical 
outlook which must have prompted him to seek the origin of the prohibition 
of marriage between parallel cousins outside exchange. According to him, its 



origin is to be found in dual organization, which is 



‘practically universal’ in 



Australia, and ‘sufficiently prevalent’ in Melanesia to be recognized as a 



factor in this region also; and it will be remembered that in a system with 



exogamous moieties parallel cousins belong necessarily to the same moiety, 
and cross-cousins to different moieties. Frazer does not hesitate to infer that 



dual organization formerly existed in Asia, Africa and America, this being 
vouched for, according to him, by the wide diffusion in these regions of 
totemic exogamy and the classificatory kinship system . 1 Let us grant his 
suggestion that dual organization formerly extended through ‘a half or more 
than a half of the habitable globe ’. 2 What is its origin? Frazer replies that 
it is to prevent consanguineous marriages, firstly, between brothers and 
sisters (first division of the group into two classes), then between parents and 
children (second division of the group into two classes), and finally between 
cross-cousins (the Aranda system of Australia with the division of the group 
into eight marriage classes). There is no doubt that the dual system does lead 
to the placing of brothers and sisters in the category of prohibited spouses, 
nor that the organization with four marriage classes achieves the same result 
for that one of the two parents (the father in a matrilineal system, and the 
mother in a patrilineal system) who is not affected by the prohibition in a 
two-class system, nor finally, that the organization with eight classes extends the 
prohibition on parallel cousins to cross-cousins. This whole series of assertions 
is based on the following principle: ‘At least these were certainly amongst 
the effects produced by the successive divisions, and from the effects it is 
legitimate to argue back to the intentions .’ 3 
The least that can be said of this principle is that it constitutes a remarkably 
radical conversion to a sociological doctrine of final causes. But to us this 
conversion seems to go as far beyond what is admissible as the narrowly 
historical attitude of the preceding argument seemed to fall short. For 
intentions to be legitimately inferred from results, there must at least be a 
certain equivalence between the observed results and the supposed intentions. 
Thus it is possible that the division of the group into four marriage 
classes has its origin in a growing awareness, be it clear or confused, of 
a new system of oppositions replacing terms previously thought of as 
identical. 



But how can the same reasoning be applied to the prohibition on marriage 
between brothers and sisters, and to the first (and also most widespread) 
1 Frazer, 1919, vol. II, pp. 222-3. 2 ibid. p. 223. 3 ibid. pp. 232-3. 




A / atrimonial Exchange 1 4 1 

division of the group into two exogamous moieties? In this case, the supposed 
intention corresponds to only a very small part of the result, and if the result 
is to be expressed in terms of intention this intention must be supposed to 
have been very different. 

Dual organization finds expression in a division of collateral relatives into 
two categories, those with whom it is possible to contract marriage, and 
those with whom it is impossible. This latter category includes brothers and 
sisters together with parallel cousins. Accordingly, it is arbitrary to decide 
that the purpose of the institution is to prohibit marriage between brothers 
and sisters, and that the prohibition of parallel cousins appears in the picture 
only as an accident. The opposite could just as well be true. If the intention 
was only to prohibit brother and sister incest, all that would have been 
needed was to prohibit it quite straightforwardly, without setting up a 
prodigiously cumbersome institution which eliminates one, two, or three 
undesirable spouses only by prohibiting at the same time roughly half the 
available men or women. If dual organization, which forbids me to marry 
half the women of my group, had really been instituted only to prevent me 
from marrying my sister, it must be recognized that there is a remarkable 
incoherency in the minds of those who thought it up interspersed with the 
foresight so freely attributed to them. Actually, dual organization is either 
useless - which is a defensible thesis - or else it is useful precisely because of 
its result, and it is entirely useful in this regard. To claim, on the one hand, 
that dual organization was consciously intended and conceived of, and on 
the other, that it was intended and conceived of for only a small fraction of 
its attendant results (even though this fraction might so easily have been 
ensured by other means, as indeed it has been in many societies), is an 
unacceptable position both from the point of view of the historical succession 
of institutions and from the point of view of a legislative will. But if, as we 
believe, the function of dual organization is solely to produce those conse- 
quences which it actually does produce, then it must obviously be acknow- 
ledged that this function is not to eliminate a degree of kinship as being too 
close. Brothers and sisters are closer than the parallel cousins with whom 
they are identified, while parallel cousins are as close as the cross-cousins 
from whom, however, they are differentiated. If there is any raison d'etre of 
dual organization, it is to be found only in a common quality, shared by 
brothers and sisters and by parallel cousins, whereby both these groups are 
opposed in exactly the same way to the group of cross-cousins. This common 
quality cannot be biological proximity. We have found this common quality 
in the fact that brothers and sisters, like parallel cousins, are similarly 
oriented, and bear the same sign within a structure of reciprocity, in some 
way thus cancelling one another out, while cross-cousins bear opposite and 
complementary signs. Keeping to this metaphor, it could thus be said that 
they attract each other. 

We shall let Frazer himself expose the greatest weakness in his system: 




142 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

‘The general cause which I have assumed for the successive changes in 
marriage customs which we have now passed under review is a growing 
aversion to the marriage of persons nearly related to each other by blood. 
Into the origin of that aversion I shall not here inquire; the problem is one 
of the darkest and most difficult in the whole history of society .’ 1 

In short, then, he saw cross-cousin marriage and marriage by exchange as 
originating in the prohibition of incest. The exchange of sisters, and the 
consequent preference for cross-cousins, are seen as an increasingly general 
practice, resulting from widespread condemnation of marriage between 
brothers and sisters. The prohibition of parallel cousins results immediately 
from the setting up of dual organization, which itself is enacted to sanction 
the growing public feeling. Consequently, the immediate origins of the 
preference and of the prohibition arc different, one deriving from morals, 
the other from law. But their primary origin is held to be the same, in both 
cases being an answer to ‘the growing aversion’ in the group against con- 
sanguineous marriage. We shall not even insist upon the fact that the 
hypothesis of consanguineous marriage as a social institution is purely 
hypothetical, as too is the hypothesis of group marriage which Frazer invokes 
to account for the classilicatory kinship system. Actually, this whole recon- 
struction is circular: the appearance of marriage by exchange put an end to 
group marriage; the establishment of cross-cousin marriage was a consequence 
of marriage by exchange; the appearance of dual organization sanctioned 
the practice of cross-cousin marriage; finally, ‘the classificatory system of 
relationship flows directly from the organization of society in two exogamous 
classes '. 2 Nevertheless, when he posed the question of the origin of the 
classilicatory system, Frazer’s answer was extremely precise: ‘It appears to 
have originated in, and to reflect as in a mirror, a system of group marriage .’ 3 
Above all, the interpretation proposed by Frazer hangs upon the thread of 
an enigma, for if cross-cousin marriage was introduced as a preliminary 
attempt at eliminating incestuous unions, there is nothing to explain why 
these incestuous unions themselves were regarded as an evil which had to be 
suppressed. Frazer merely made repeated reference to the ‘growing sentiment’ 
against this type of marriage. It is this unexplainable and unexplained 
‘growing sentiment’ which ultimately is the cornerstone of the system. By 
contrast, we have maintained that a rigorous analysis of cross-cousin 
marriage should reveal the ultimate nature of the incest prohibition. 

n 

However, we have been careful to eliminate all historical speculation, all 
research into origins, and all attempts to reconstruct a hypothetical order in 
which institutions succeeded one another. By according cross-cousin marriage 



1 Frazer, 1919, vol. II, pp. 245-6. 



2 ibid. p. 245. 



3 ibid. p. 230. 




Matrimonial Exchange 143 

the prime position in our demonstration we have postulated neither its 
former universality nor its relative anteriority with respect to other forms of 
marriage. Furthermore, we do not believe that our assertion that there is a 
connexion between cross-cousin marriage and the exchange of wives leaves 
us open to the criticisms levelled at Frazer’s conception, which is at least 
superficially analogous. The fact that marriage by exchange often coincides 
with a prohibition against marriage between all types of cousins has been 
invoked against this conception. To our way of thinking, Frazer was right in 
being on his guard against cases where cross-cousin marriage seemed to be 
excluded. Recent sociological inquiries in South America clearly prove that, 
as Frazer foresaw, cross-cousin marriage is even more widespread than 
formerly suspected. These are often groups about which little has been known 
and about which negative and sometimes contradictory evidence has been 
given. Thus it is wise, as Frazer recommends, when faced with sources 
relating to a given group, some stating that marriage between cross-cousins 
is prohibited and others expressly stating that it is allowed, to keep in mind 
that some early observers would have paid attention solely to the prohibition 
of marriage between parallel cousins, while others would have seen only the 
concomitant practice of cross-cousin marriage. In a theory such as ours, in 
which the apprehension of a certain logical structure is made the fundamental 
basis of marriage customs, it is important to note that this structure is often 
visible even in systems in which it has not materialized in a concrete form. 

Cases which F'razer himself noted of marriage by exchange in which, 
however, cousins are indiscriminately grouped among the prohibited degrees 
could prove more troublesome. In certain Torres Straits islands and in New 
Guinea the exchange of wives is also associated with the prohibition of 
cousins. But once again, these facts can be advanced against Frazer who 
makes marriage by exchange a historical stage in the evolution of marriage, 
the marriage of cross-cousins another such historical stage, and establishes 
a cause and effect relationship between the two. There may be good cause 
to wonder why it is, if cross-cousin marriage is a consequence of marriage 
by exchange, that one may be found without the other being necessarily 
associated with it. But we have asserted nothing of the sort. We have seen 
exchange, considered not in the technical form of the institution called 
‘marriage by exchange’ but in its general aspect as a phenomenon of recip- 
rocity, as the universal form of marriage. Further, we have not studied 
cross-cousin marriage as a primitive, archaic, relatively ancient, or recent 
expression of this form, but as a special case showing particularly clearly that 
reciprocity is present behind all marriages. We have given proof of this 
characteristic of cross-cousin marriage by adopting a double viewpoint: 
firstly by showing that the dichotomy of cousins into assigned and prohibited 
spouses may be directly deduced from the relationship between two or more 
families, once this relationship is conceived of as a structure of reciprocity ; 
and secondly by emphasizing that through its logical qualities, the institution 




144 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

of cross-cousin marriage occupies an exceptional position, placed as it were 
at the bifurcation leading to two extreme types of reciprocity, viz., dual 
organization and the prohibition of incest. 

But to insist that this special case was the first to appear, or that, at one 
time or another, it had universal existence, is wholly unsubstantiated. The 
physicist who formulates a law knows well that strictly it will never be proved, 
except in the laboratory, and that only approximate examples of it are to 
be found in nature. In this, the sociologist is more fortunate than the 
physicist - an opportunity so rare that it would be wrong not to try to extract 
the greatest possible advantage from it. Social experiment frequently gives 
rise to cross-cousin marriage in a very pure form, and its very frequency 
would in itself be enough to warrant surprise. If cross-cousin marriage had 
not been practised by any of the earth’s people, it would no doubt have been 
much more difficult to determine the law of reciprocity at the origin of 
marriage rules. But supposing this law had been discovered, there would have 
been no difficulty in deducing a priori the formula for cross-cousin marriage, 
as providing the simplest conceivable expression of the law. The fact that 
this formula had not been discovered by any human society would easily 
have been explained by the gap separating theory from humble reality, and 
no one would have asked why crude and primitive populations failed to 
conceive of such a simple but precise method. The large number of societies 
which successfully elaborated this strict expression certainly may be admired, 
but it should not cause surprise that others were never successful. 

The conception we propose has the advantage of accounting not only for 
the dichotomy of cousins, but also for all the other systems of identification 
or dissociation usually accompanying it. The principle of reciprocity explains 
the distinction of uncles and aunts, male and female cousins, and nephews 
and nieces, into cross and parallel, instead of the usual constraint to interpret 
the dissociation appearing in the generation preceding that of Ego, and in 
the succeeding generation, as a consequence of the dissociation operating 
in Ego’s own. In point of fact, the principle of reciprocity acts simultaneously 
on three levels. Let us first consider the generation preceding Ego’s. In the 
structure of reciprocity, the father’s brother occupies the same position as the 
father (both have received wives and given sisters) and the mother’s sister 
occupies the same position as the mother (both have been, or may be, re- 
ceived as wives and given as sisters). But the mother’s brother occupies an 
inverse position to that of the mother, for whatever the system of descent 
may be, one is the giver or receiver, the other is the received or given, and 
the same relationship exists between the father and the father’s sister (although 
not strictly, as we shall see elsewhere). Thus, returning to the formula in Fig. 
6 , it can be said that the sign remains the same whether it be (+) or (— ), in 
passing from the father to the father’s brother or from the mother to the 
mother’s sister, whereas the sign changes in passing from the mother to her 
brother or from the father to his sister. The former are identifiable in a termi- 




Matrimonial Exchange 1 45 

nology based on a system of oppositions, while the latter must be distinguished. 
We have already shown how the oppositions of sign and the parallelisms 
are reversed in the following generation, the general structure remaining the 
same. This constant configuration, in passing from the preceding generation 
to Ego’s generation, obviously continues, at the price of a new inversion 
of signs, in passing from Ego’s generation to the nephews’ generation, as 
seen in the example (Fig. 7), in which Ego has a right to his sister’s daughter. 




(-) (+) 
Fig. 7. The concept of crossing. 



because he has given his sister to be his niece’s mother, while he must give 
away his own daughter because he has received his daughter’s mother as 
his wife. If we had taken Ego’s maternal uncle as our subject and not Ego, 
the general structure would remain the same, all the signs, however, being 
reversed, as can easily be seen. 




2 ■ Australia 



CHAPTER XI 

The Classical Systems 

i 

The term ‘restricted exchange’ includes any system which effectively or 
functionally divides the group into a certain number of pairs of exchange- 
units so that, for any one pair X- Y there is a reciprocal exchange relationship. 
In other words, where an X man marries a Y woman, a Y man must always 
be able to marry an X woman. The simplest form of restricted exchange is 
found in the division of the group into patrilineal or matrilineal exogamous 
moieties. If we suppose that a dichotomy based upon one of the two modes of 
descent is superimposed upon a dichotomy based upon the other the result 
will be a four-section system instead of a two-moiety system. If the same 
process were repeated, the group would comprise eight sections instead of 
four. This is a regular progression and embodies nothing faintly resembling 
a change in principle or a sudden upheaval. We have already considered the 
first stages in this process during our analysis of the connexions between 
unilineal and bilineal descent . 1 

At that stage we made an observation which should now be developed, 
viz., that the transition from a moiety system to a four-class system does not 
necessarily modify the rules of marriage. The preferred spouse tends to be 
defined in a more strict and limited way in one case, and in a vaguer and more 
tolerant way in the other, as one or other cross-cousin (the father’s sister's 
daughter or the mother’s brother’s daughter), who may be (and most 
probably is) one and the same. Of course, a class system and the marriage 
rules do not always coincide. For example, the Dieri, with their dual organi- 
zation, have the same marriage prohibitions as the Aranda with eight 
subsections. This is also the case in certain groups having the four-class 
system. For the time being the discussion of this problem, which led Radcliffe- 
Brown to deny that classes had anything to do with the regulation of marriage, 
will be left entirely to one side. The fact remains that in an eight-class system 
of the Aranda type, marriage between cross-cousins is automatically im- 
possible, while there is nothing in a four-class system (except contingent 
marriage prohibitions and the kinship system) to prohibit it. From this 
negative standpoint, the two-class and the four-class systems are equivalent. 

1 ch. VIII. 



146 





The Classical Systems 147 

In both, the class system considered as such prohibits the same types of 
collateral relatives (brothers and sisters and parallel cousins) and leaves the 
same types in the category of spouses sanctioned by the system (cross- 
cousins and those identified with them). Restricted exchange thus poses a 
quite disturbing theoretical problem: what is the relationship between the 
moiety system and the four-class system? How does it come about that in 
passing from one to the other there is no dichotomy of possible spouses? 
More especially, how is it that systems of restricted exchange do not take into 
account the duality between patrilateral and matrilateral cross-cousins? 

Australia is ideal for studying these questions, for two reasons. Firstly, it 
provides particularly precise and explicit examples of the different systems 
of restricted exchange, viz., dual organization, the four-section system, and 
the eight-subsection system. Secondly, some Australian tribes distinguish 
between patrilateral and matrilateral cross-cousins, a distinction, however, 
which does not seem to follow from any of the preceding types. This occurs 
in several north Australian tribes, particularly those in Arnhem Land studied 
by Warner and Webb. These groups have an eight-class marriage organization 
sometimes disguised as a four-class organization, but only, it would seem, 
because the subsections are not always named. 

Generally known as the Murngin system, these forms attract our attention 
for a special reason. This system has often been distinguished from other 
Australian systems as excluding the exchange of sisters. Our whole inter- 
pretation of kinship systems has the notion of exchange as its universal and 
fundamental basis. On a continent which otherwise seems most favourable 
to our thesis, the Murngin system poses an important problem which cannot 
be ignored. 

The immense amount of work carried out in the last few years in Australia 
by Radcliffe-Brown and the famous Oceania team has given incomparably 
rich and detailed information on Australian kinship systems, to a large extent 
obviating the sociologist’s reliance upon the often obscure pioneer studies of 
Howitt, Mathews, Spencer and Gillen, etc. But even among modern investi- 
gators there is no one who would claim that the typology of the systems is 
perfectly clear, or that their relationships have been definitively established. 
In this respect, the last fifteen years seem rather to have complicated 
the situation. In 1931, Radcliffe-Brown proposed the following general 
classification : 

1 . Systems with two matrilineal exogamous moieties 

2 . systems with two patrilineal exogamous moieties 

3. four-section systems: 

( a ) with named matrilineal moieties 

(b) with named patrilineal moieties 

(c) without named moieties 

4. eight-subsection systems 




148 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

5. systems with four named patrilineal semi-moieties 

6. systems with two endogamous alternating divisions, and 

7. systems without named divisions. 1 

However, several years later Lawrence came to the conclusion that there 
were eleven systems divided into two principal groups: on the one hand, 
systems without marriage classes, comprising five types, and on the other, 
systems with marriage classes, comprising six types, the latter themselves 
divided into three categories: 

I. Systems without classes: 

(cr) unilateral marriage without the exchange of sisters 
(h) systems without classes or matrilineal dichotomy 
(c) systems with matrilineal clans 
{d) systems without matrilineal clans, and 
(e) systems with alternating generations. 

II. Systems with classes: 

A. Eight-class systems: 

(a) eight named subsections 

(b) four named sections divided into eight unnamed subsections, and 

(c) four patrilineal semi-moieties divided into eight unnamed subsections. 

b. Four-class systems: 

m 

{a) four sections, and 

(b) two patrilineal moieties divided into four unnamed sections. 

c. Two-class systems: 

{a) two matrilineal moieties. 2 

These differences derive from differences in the interpretation of two basic 
points, viz., the relationship between patrilineal and matrilineal descent on 
the one hand, and systems with classes and systems without classes on the 
other. 



11 

Radcliffe-Brown has shown very clearly that the basic unit of Australian 
aboriginal society is the local group, or ‘horde’. The horde consists of a 
group of brothers, their sons and unmarried daughters, and their sons’ 
daughters. Although living in the horde, their wives and their sons’ wives 
actually come from a neighbouring horde, because of the law of exogamy, 
and they continue to belong to their fathers’ and brothers’ group. The horde 
can thus be defined as a patrilineal group, exploiting a certain territory over 
which it has exclusive rights. There is no political unit superimposed upon 
the horde. The tribe is defined purely linguistically: it includes all the hordes 
speaking roughly the same dialect, but it does not exist beyond this awareness 



1 Radcliffe-Brown, 1931, pp. 41-2. 



2 Lawrence, 1937, pp. 319-54. 




The Classical Systems 149 

of a linguistic community. It has neither political organization nor territorial 
rights. Strictly speaking, if there is such a thing as a tribal territory, it is 
only in so far as ‘*he territory of the tribe is the total of the territories of its 
component hordes’. 1 

Hence, the basis of Australian society is held to be territorial and patri- 
lineal. Accordingly, Pink was able to speak of the Northern Aranda as 
‘landowners’, among whom the ‘ancestral clan estate’ and the patrilineal 
line by which it is transmitted together with the ritual, play a leading role in 
both the collective and individual life: ‘It not only binds families, using that 
word in its most limited sense . . . but also the whole clan.’ 2 We must turn 
to her analysis of relationships of reciprocity between different totemic clans 
in order to reply to the objection formulated by Thomson who asserts that 
the clan came before the horde. The horde, he says, consists of all the male 
members of the clan. Their wives, who are members of the horde but not of 
the clan must be added, and their daughters and married sisters, who are 
members of the clan but have left the horde, must be subtracted : ‘It is clear, 
therefore, that although the horde is the war-making group, the clan, and 
not the horde, is the landowning group; a clan is a stable, permanent, 
structural unit of society; but the horde is unstable; it is a sociological entity 
the membership of which is constantly changing.’ 3 Thus, the solidarity of 
the clan based on descent, the totemic cult, and the territory is contrasted 
with the solidarity of the horde based on marriage, the family, the sexual 
division of labour, and war. In point of fact, however, the importance attached 
by the Northern Aranda to the kutuyula relationship 4 between a man and 
his father’s sister’s son is enough to show that the two types of organization 
are not antagonistic. 

The question is not so much whether it is the horde or the clan which should 
be considered the real landowning group, but which of these two patrilineal 
groups is at the basis of the social organization. All contemporary observers 
agree that a double matrilineal and patrilineal dichotomy exists and functions 
in Australian societies. Radcliffe-Brown and Lawrence are at one on this 
point, but they disagree on the question of priority. Lawrence proposed a 
hypothetical sequence : matrilineal totemic clans without moieties - moieties 
with matrilineal clans - sections with or without matrilineal clans - sub- 
sections. 5 This is in complete disagreement with the basic role which RadclilTe- 
Brown ascribes to the patrilineal horde. Nevertheless, there is no question 
that ‘the vast majority, and perhaps all of the peoples of Australia were 
organized primarily on a basis of patrilocal-patrilineal land-holding hordes’. 6 
Consequently, it is argued, the rule of descent (patrilineal or matrilineal) is 
secondary to the rule of residence. 

As we see it, the disagreement is only a question of method. When 

a Pink, 1936, p. 303. 

4 Pink, 1936, p. 291. 
b Kroeber, 1938, pp. 302-3. 



1 Radcliffe-Brown, 1931, p. 36. 

3 Thomson, 1 935, pp. 462-3, n. 4. 
5 Lawrence, 1937, p. 346. 




1 50 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

Radcliffe-Brown starts with the concrete observation of groups and asserts 
the generality of the horde and its sociological and psychological reality, 
the validity of his observation can scarcely be doubted. Lawrence starts with 
a more formal point of view and adopts the notion of the exchange of sisters 
as the common basis of all Australian systems. Consequently, it is the 
matrilineal dichotomy, considered as the constant form of dichotomy (since 
the local sections may vary in number) which seems vital to him. Lawrence 
is justified in adopting the notion of exchange as the starting-point of his 
analysis. But he interprets it exclusively in terms of restricted exchange, thus 
making the Murngin system unintelligible, as is shown in the following 
passage dealing with regions practising ‘unilateral’ marriage (i.e., with the 
mother's brother’s daughter exclusively): 



‘The latter are of recent discovery, and are as yet ill understood. In each 
case the report is inadequate, yielding no proper explanation of how 
marriages complete a cycle through the hordes nor any acceptable articu- 
lation of kinship terms either to patri-clans or to divisions resembling 
those of neighbours who practise marriage by sister exchange. This seems 
to indicate some measure of antiquity w ith local modification by borrow ing. 
Further comment appears premature pending accurate description.’ 1 

But it is Lawrence’s conception of sister-exchange which is defective, not 
the descriptions of the Murngin system. We shall try to show that the latter 
system is also based upon exchange, and for this reason we shall have to 
widen considerably Lawrence’s narrow definition of exchange, taken in the 
restricted sense. At the same time, it will appear that exchange, in its generalized 
form, can take place between patrilineal hordes as well as between matrilineal 
moieties, and that, in terms of formal analysis, the question of priority is 
secondary. Kroeber made an observation on this point but it is possible to 
subscribe to it only in part. He says of four-class or eight-class systems that 



‘the concepts patrilineal and matrilineal become wholly inapplicable, except 
w'here moiety names persist in addition to sectional or subsectional 
names, and in many cases they do not. In brief, where there are four 
sections or eight subsections the patrilineal or matrilineal moieties appear 
to be names or historical relics rather than socially functioning units.’ 2 



From this he concludes that exogamy, dual organization, clans and totemism 
are epiphenomena, secondary to the basic structures, the most important of 
which he sees as the rule of residence. 3 His whole conclusion should be 
quoted: 

‘I submit that, in addition to unilateral descent reckoning, much of the 
formalized social organization of primitive peoples is in the nature of 
unconscious experiment and play of fashion rather than the core or 



1 Lawrence, 1937, p. 345. 



2 Kroeber, 1938, p. 305. 



3 ibid. p. 307. 




The Classical Systems 151 

substance of their culture. In certain cases, as in Australia, it may well 
represent the pinnacle of their achievement, just as experiment and play 
with abstractions, words, and plastic forms resulted in the pinnacles of 
Greek civilization, while science, technology, and the control or exploita- 
tion of nature are those of our own. But pinnacles are end products, not 
bases.’ 1 



Kroeber has taken up the same idea in a recent study where he compares the 
complex forms of social organization in certain primitive societies with ‘the 
play of earnest children.’ 2 

In this text, which is one of the most important to be found for the illus- 
tration of certain intellectual attitudes of contemporary sociology, there is a 
strange mixture of perspicacity and caution. If patrilineal or matrilineal 
descent, dual organization, etc., are really in a sense (and contrary to tradi- 
tional sociological thinking) secondary phenomena, this secondariness arises 



not from their being compared with obviously primary phenomena, but in 
respect of the relationships uniting them. These relationships, and these alone, 
can be said to be the true ‘raw materials’ of social life. We, too, have com- 
pared dual organization with children’s games, 3 not to relegate it to any 
insignificant and secondary position, but just the opposite, to show that 



behind dual organization, regarded as an institution limited in its forms and 
in its distribution, there are a certain number of logical structures the 
recurrence of which in modern society, and at different ages in life, proves 



it to be both fundamental and universal. 



For us, then, the question of the priority in Australia of the patrilineal or 
of the matrilineal dichotomy respectively is much less important than the 
fact that it is possible, according to the standpoint adopted, to make a choice 
of either view. Radcliffe-Brown’s ‘local group’ interpretation has the great 
advantage at least of showing that territorial rights are not incompatible 
with primitive forms of life and organization. 4 But it does not follow from 
our previous remarks that the logical and historical approaches are inter- 
changeable. To interpret the system using either approach has irrevocable 
consequences once the choice has been made. 5 In the following chapters we 
shall see that the transition from a restricted to a generalized conception 
of exchange does away with this apparent contradiction, and that logical 
analysis and historical analysis are both possible when the local group, 
considered as the basic element in Australian systems, is used as the 
starting-point. 

The second question raised at the beginning of this chapter - viz., whether 
organizations without classes are more or less primitive than those with 
classes - must be treated in the same way. The study of geographical distri- 



1 ibid. p. 309. 2 ibid. 1942, p. 215. 

3 cf. ch. VII. 4 cf. on this point Davidson, 1928a, pp. 614-31. 

5 cf. ch. XIX which is a development of this point of view with regard to the evolution 
of the Chinese system. 




152 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

bution would readily suggest the former possibility. The tribes with neither 
moieties nor sections occupy six coastal, i.e., peripheral, areas in the north, 
west and south of the Australian continent. From this it might readily be 
concluded that classless systems are the older form. 1 However, the areas 
without marriage classes are not homogeneous, and more often than not the 
marriage rules practised there are the same as those which would result 
from classes or sections. Radcliffe-Brown accordingly considers them to be 
later developments, as modified forms of a Kariera-type system. 2 Howitt 
also believed this but for a less legitimate reason: for him the absence of 
classes implied individual marriage, which he thought was derived from 
group marriage. 3 

We shall return to this problem in detail when we discuss the Mara system. 4 
For the time being we shall limit ourselves to a general statement : to answer 
the problem too dogmatically would be to overlook certain striking features 
in the development of Australian systems. There is nothing to prove that this 
development extended over hundreds or thousands of years or that it is 
necessary to give to systems without classes and to systems with classes an 
absolute position in time. They have the same result but employ different 
methods, based sometimes on the notion of class and sometimes on that of 
relation. But it is perfectly conceivable that one and the same group, while 
maintaining a basically stable system of reciprocity, might frequently have 
oscillated, over a period of time, between one method and the other. The 
absence of class is not a negative characteristic but the result of a preference 
for another procedure of similar functional value. It is a superficial or, in 
Kroeber’s sense, secondary characteristic. These views are not wholly 
theoretical. There are cases in which tribes with eight classes have reverted 
to a four-class system, tribes with four classes have reverted to a two-class 
system, and tribes with two classes have adopted a new regulation of marriage 
between clans of the same moiety. 5 Above all, recent observations have re- 
vealed the rapid diffusion of marriage systems from one group to another, 
and efforts at adaptation between different systems, all of which supposes 
a good deal of original invention. 



111 

In this regard the Murinbata along the northern coastline are a striking 
example of how Australian aboriginal systems (and no doubt many others) 
must have originated and spread. Today the Murinbata have a system 
characterized by a division into eight subsections, matrilineal totemic groups, 
and preferential marriage with the sister’s son’s daughter. Radcliffe-Brown 
considers this form of marriage to be peculiar to the north-western coast of 

1 Davidson, 1926, pp. 529-48; 19286; Lawrence, 1937, pp. 345-6. 

2 Radcliffe-Brown, 1931, p. 368. 3 Howitt, 1907, p. 284. 4 cf. ch. XIII. 

5 Lawrence, 1937, p. 346. 




The Classical Systems 153 

Australia. 1 However, it is to be noted that it corresponds with the theoretical 
conditions of marriage in societies with eight subsections. If my sister has 
married according to this type of marriage (i.e., in the second ascending 
generation), my preferential wife will be both my sister’s son’s daughter and 
my father’s mother’s brother’s son’s daughter. Nevertheless, Stanner has 
shown that the whole Murinbata system has been borrowed, and his des- 
cription of the psychological atmosphere in which systems which might 
appear to be pure abstractions evolve deserves to remain a classic. 

Tribes living on the fringe of the subsection area feel inferior for not having 
subsections and for not understanding how they work. The belief that they 
marry wadzi , ‘wrongly’, is implanted in their minds, and the imposing 
apparatus of subsections, together with the corresponding marriage rules 
and forms of totemism, seems somehow superior to their traditional system. 2 
The Murinbata and the Nangiomeri frankly admit that their new system 
still puzzles them : 

‘Informants are continually being checked and corrected by other infor- 
mants. Less knowledgeable natives than the “heads” clumsily try to 
bequeath the matrilineal yulu totems patrilineally, much as they tend to 
think of the subsections as descending on indirect patrilineal instead of 
indirect matrilineal principles.’ 3 

The Murinbata experience particular difficulty in understanding that the 
yulu totems can belong to members of the two patrilineal moieties, a theory 
borrowed from the Djamindjung during the last twenty years. One aborigine, 
returning to his group after ten years in prison, found himself in an almost 
pathetic predicament. He knew nothing of the new order, of the workings 
of the yulu (totems) and of the yinipun (subsections), and for this was 
ridiculed by the young reformers. And further, meanwhile, the belief is 
becoming established that there are physical likenesses between members of 
the same totemic clan. 4. 

The original system 5 was of the Kariera type, except that cross-cousins 
of the first remove were prohibited as spouses and were called ‘mother’ and 
‘mother’s brother’. Hence, classificatory cross-cousins were the only con- 
ventional spouses, and only two patrilineal lines were recognized, as in the 
Kariera system, viz., that of the mother’s father ( thamun ) and that of the 
father’s father (k angul). Consequently, the problem for the Murinbata is 
how to make a system with eight classes, and its concomitant marriage and 
totemic rules, function in a system which in part at least renders the sub- 
section system superfluous. The question whether the subsections are basically 
totemic groups or marriage classes is meaningless, for ‘the subsections are 

1 Radcliffe-Brown, 1931, p. 53. 2 Stanner, 1936, p. 186. 

3 ibid. p. 196. 4 ibid. pp. 199, 202. 

s The reader unfamiliar with the theory of Australian systems would be well advised 

to leave the study of the Murinbata example until he has finished reading the chapter. 




*54 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

spreading specifically as marriage groupings . . . [and] as a new marriage 
convention ’. 1 This supports our theoretical position. 

The first step in this adaptation is a gradual adjustment of the vocabulary 
of the system, but it has been only partially successful. The subsection 
system is as follows: 



- Al •! 


" TJANAMA 
^ nanagu 




TULAMA \ 
nauola J 


Bi 


I—** J 


r TJIMIJ 


=■ 


DJANGALA \ 




r ^ 


^ namij 




nangala j 


i 


— c ' - 


f TJAMIRA 
namira 


— 


TJALYERI \ 
nalyeri j 


D, 


< 


f DJABIDJIN 
(_ nabidjin 




DJANGAR1 \ 
nangari J 






Fig. 8. Murinbata marriage rules. 





Masculine subsections are in upper case, feminine subsections are in lower case. 
The arrows indicate indirect matrilineal descent and the = sign denotes preferential 

marriages. 

In the new system, a TJANAMA must regard a nauola as his only possible 
wife (in doing so, he acquires his sister’s son’s daughter, who will usually 
be nauola). At the same time he continues to regard a classificatory cross- 
cousin (in this case nangala ) as an appropriate spouse. Likewise, a TJAL YERJ 
will waver between a namira and a nahidjin. There seems then to be a move- 
ment towards a polygyny based upon the adding together of the previous 
alliances (classificatory cross-cousins) and the new alliances (sister’s son's 
daughter, mother’s brother's daughter’s daughter's daughter). From this 
arise difficulties which obsess the aborigines, and, as Stanner notes of another 
phenomenon, appear to them ‘as . . . riddles of which only others know the 
answers ’. 2 For example, in a normal eight-subsection system the grandson 
would reproduce his father’s father’s subsection by marriage with the mother's 
mother’s brother’s daughter’s daughter. The wavering of the Murinbata 
between the traditional system and the new order ends in practice with the 
identification of the mother’s brother’s daughter and the mother’s mother’s 
brother’s daughter’s daughter as the possible marriage partner, i.e., for 
TJANAMA : 



nangala = nauola 

Hence, a TJIMIJ man marries a namij woman. The father maintains that 
his daughter is nalyeri (which is the ‘conventional’ subsection). However, a 
namij woman is by kinship purima, a ‘marriageable’ daughter of the sister’s 

1 Stanner, 1936, p. 198. 



2 ibid. p. 205. 




The Classical Systems 

•r- 




son, but according to the subsections she is a ‘sister’. Consequently, her 
daughter is nabidjin , for according to the aboriginal rule, formulated in a 
matrilineal idiom: l namij makes nabidjin'. From this the conflict arises of 
whether the subsections are patrilineal or matrilineal. 

The general attitude of the aborigines, says Stanner, is that the problems 
will find their own solution: 



‘The attempts to make the subsections descend patrilineally will almost 
certainly not succeed as a general practice, but there is strong reason to 
believe that the Murinbata will establish as formal conventions variations 
in the pattern of subsection descent which occur in other tribes only as 
the result of “alternative” marriages ’, 1 

i.e., a five-generation patrilineal cycle. This phenomenon will be studied in 
detail in the following chapter. The notion of cycle is already present in the 
native mind: 

‘Informants are fond of showing how one subsection “comes back” by 
tracing it through both patrilineal and matrilineal lines. The Warramunga 
do this by actual genealogical references, the Nangiomeri and Murinbata 
by reciting the verbal accounts they have learned from neighbouring 
tribes. They have not possessed the subsection system long enough to be 
able to give genealogical proof .’ 2 

Until such time as a new system can integrate the needs of the traditional 
and borrowed systems, provisional methods are contrived in order to 
straighten out irregularities, For example, in one concrete case, the Murinbata 
decided that a nangala daughter of TJANAMA and nangari (which is 
incorrect) would marry a TJAMIRA or DJABIDJIN man, and that her 
children would be regarded as TULA M A and nauola instead of TJALYERI 
and nalyeri, as should have resulted from the mother’s subsection. But the 
aborigines say that this nangala girl is ‘all the same nangari ', or to use an 
informant’s pidgin, ‘she no more come up nothing herself’, for she is daughter 
of TJANAMA , and by refusing to take her mother’s nangari into account 
she is classed in the nangari or nalyeri subsection, in which she would have 
been had her father been correctly married . 3 Thus a solution is sought by 
treating descent as patrilineal (in accordance with former ideas), even though 
the present system is matrilineal. 



IV 

This example, to which others might be added , 4 is enough to show that 
systems should not be treated in isolation with their individual peculiarities 
seen as indissociable attributes. Underlying concrete systems, geographically 
localized and evolving through time, there are simpler relationships allowing 
1 ibid. p. 207. 3 ibid. p. 210. 3 ibid. p. 214. * Elkin, 1940a, p. 22. 




1 56 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

every type of change and every type of adaptation. For the present, we intend 
to consider groups only as providing ideal examples for attacking, analysing, 
and defining those elementary relationships which they illustrate. This is 
what Radcliffe-Brown did when he distinguished between two basic types 
which he called I and II, resulting from the existence of complex organizations 
cutting across both the horde and the tribe. These organizations, which are 
two, four, or eight in number, are generally called ‘marriage classes’. 
Radcliffe-Brown proposed the use of more specialized terms, viz., ‘moieties’ 
when there were only two divisions in the group ; ‘sections’ when there were 
four; and finally ‘subsections’ when there were eight. The moieties may be 
matrilineal as in eastern or western Australia, or patrilineal as in central 
Victoria. In both cases they are governed by the rule of exogamy, i.e., the 
men of one moiety can take wives only from the other moiety and vice versa. 
We have repeatedly stressed that this moiety system always leads to the 
classification of brothers, sisters and parallel cousins in the same category 
as Ego, these persons all belonging to the same moiety, while cross-cousins 
necessarily belong to the other moiety. This fact does not in itself entail that 
cross-cousins shall become sanctioned or prescribed spouses, though this is 
most frequently the case. The Dieri of South Australia, however, have a 
moiety system and prohibit cross-cousin marriage, yet even in this case the 
notion of cross-cousins is used to determine the possible spouse, in that 
instead of cross-cousins it is the children of cross-cousins who marry. 
Whatever the rule of marriage, it can thus be said that the moiety system 
leads necessarily to the dichotomy of cousins and that the preferred spouse 
must necessarily stand in a kinship relationship to Ego which is equivalent 
to the relationship of cross-cousin, or which is established through this 
relationship. 

A system distributing members of the tribal group into four sections is to 
be found in both western and eastern Australia. For example, the Kariera 
belong to one or other of the following sections: 

Banaka 

Karimera 

Burung 

Palyeri. 

Banaka necessarily marries Burung, and Karimera, Palyeri. The rule of 
descent is that the children of a Banaka man and a Burung woman are 
Palyeri, while the children of a Burung man and a Banaka woman are 
Karimera. Likewise, the children of a Karimera man and a Palyeri woman 
are Burung, and reversing the sexes with the classes remaining the same they 
are Banaka. This system is summarized in Fig. 9 where the = sign joins 
sections which intermarry, and the squared arrows link the mother’s section 
with her children’s section. It can thus be seen that there are three types of 
relation between the sections, and Radcliffe-Brown has given them special 




The Classical Systems 157 

names. The sections of the husband and the wife are a pair, the sections of 
the father and his children are a couple, and the sections of the mother and 
her children are a cycle. There are always four pairs, viz., AB and CD, BA 
and DC', four couples, viz., AD, BC, CB, and DA\ and four cycles, viz., 
AC, BD, CA, DB. As each of these types is based upon the combination 
of only four terms, they might be simplified and reduced to two pairs, two 
couples and two cycles. It will be seen later why the expanded form is to be 
preferred. 

Given this, the law of descent for a four-section system can be formulated 
as: if a man belongs to a given section, his children necessarily belong to the 
alternate section of his own couple. 

C I D 

Fig. 9. Kariera marriage rules. 

One need only analyse this formula to see the connexion between a 
Kariera-type system and the simpler organization in matrilineal moieties. 
Men of sections A or C can only marry women from sections B or D. 
Moreover, a woman, her daughters, her daughters’ daughters, etc., alternate 
indefinitely between sections B and D, if the mother is B or D, or between 
A and C, if the mother is A or C. In other words, the cycles AC and BD 
operate respectively as two matrilineal moieties. What does the Kariera 
system add to the division into two matrilineal moieties? A different division, 
perpendicular to the preceding division, into patrilineal moieties: a man, his 
sons, his sons’ sons, etc., will oscillate indefinitely between sections A and 
D, if the father was A or D, and between sections B and C, if the father was 
B or C. The couples AD and BC respectively operate, therefore, as two 
patrilineal moieties, cutting across the two matrilineal moieties AC and BD. 
The discovery that a division into matrilineal moieties is always subjacent 
to a system of marriage classes, even if these matrilineal moieties are not 
explicitly named, is one of the most valuable achievements in Australian 
sociology in recent years. 1 

Let us now ask ourselves what marriage institutions correspond to this 
four-class system. Radcliffe-Brown has shown that the class does not 
automatically lead to the determination of the spouse: 

‘The classes of the Kariera tribe are groups of related persons. The rule 
that a man of one class may only marry a woman of one of the other 
classes is the result of the more fundamental rule that a man may only 
marry a woman bearing to him a certain relation of consanguinity, namely, 
the daughter of his mother’s brother. Marriage is regulated by consan- 
guinity and by consanguinity alone.’ 2 
1 Radcliffe-Brown, 1931, p. 39. 



2 ibid. 1913, p. 158. 




1 58 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

He also insists that many tribes with a four-section system practise the same 
marriage prohibitions as groups which, with eight subsections, are obliged 
to prohibit twice as many of the possible spouses than would theoretically be 
necessary with four sections: 

‘Two tribes may both have a system of four sections, even with the same 
names, and yet have very different kinship systems and a very different 
regulation of marriage.’ 1 

Thus, the same regulation of marriage (of the Aranda type) is found 
among the Dieri, who have a moiety organization, the Talaindji, with four 
sections, the Waramanga, with eight subsections, and the Mara, with four 
semi-moieties. On the other hand, two tribes with an identical four-section 
social organization have respectively a Kariera system (Ngaluma) and an 
Aranda system (Mardudhunara). Nevertheless, as we shall see in connexion 
with the Mara system, these assertions would seem not to be strictly correct : 
there are differences in the regulation of marriage, which correspond to 
differences in the social structure. On the other hand, it does not follow, 
from the fact that differing kinship nomenclatures and marriage regulations 
may coexist with the same type of social structure, that any system of 
nomenclature, or any regulation, may correspond with any type of structure. 
Of these three types of phenomena, structure is always the simplest. It 
consists of a symbolic whole which is capable of expressing different signifi- 
cations, though it is undeniable that there is always a functional correlation 
between that which signifies and that which is signified. There are cases in 
which this correlation is so rigid, and where ‘the membership in subsections 
is correlated with the classificatory grouping of kin’ so completely, that 
‘the subsection names may be used as terms of address between kin, and the 
natives naturally make use of the subsection terms in discussing marriage 
rules of the kinship system’. 2 
Warner made the same observation of the Murngin: 

‘Frequently the native confuses the kinship term with the subsection term 
in the mother’s father’s and mother’s mother’s brother’s lines of descent. 
The fact that there are two names for each of these individual relatives 
(the kin and section name) indicates that the native does see them as 
separate and distinct systems, but also the confusion of such names shows 
further that they are looked upon somewhat as the same thing and serve 
the same general functions.’ 3 

Elkin notes that: ‘In the great number of tribes in which sections or sub- 
sections have been established for a considerable time, even though they 
may have been, or are, primarily totemic in function, the kinship terms are 
correlated with them.’ 4 

In this work we have attempted to define two methods for determining 

1 Radcliffe-Brown, 1931, p. 58. 2 Sharp, 1935, pp. 161-2. 

3 Warner, 1933, p. 81. 4 Elkin, 1940a, pp. 21-2. 




The Classical Systems 1 59 

the spouse, viz., the method of classes and the method of relations. 1 We then 
showed that these two methods never correspond exactly and that even in 
the simplest system, such as exogamous moieties, inter-individual relation- 
ships must always be taken into consideration. None the less, the very fact 
that classes do exist proves, it seems to us, that they are not entirely without 
use and that there should be at least a certain degree of equivalence between 
the two systems. Not all the members of the class are possible spouses, and 
even between possible and preferred spouses there are differences which can 
only be explained in terms of consanguinity, whereas such differences are 
non-apparent in terms of class. Nevertheless, no possible spouse is to be 
found outside the class, and this alone indicates that from the point of view 
of marriage rules the class does have a function. This function is simple and 
wide when the number of classes is small, but gains in refinement and precision, 
without ever becoming perfect (since the number of kinsmen is theoretically 
unlimited, while a system with too many classes would be useless because of 
its complication), when this number increases. But the function is the same 
in all cases, viz., to act as a ‘sorting-office’ in the determination of the spouse. 
Seen in this way the Kariera system (including the division into four sections 
and the kinship system) might be said to be a particularly satisfactory logical 
model since the first relatives selected by the method of classes are also the 
preferred spouses according to the method of relations. This, incidentally, 
seems to be the reason why Radcliffe-Brown made the Kariera system the 
prototype of his kinship system and called it type I. 

The Kariera enjoin marriage with the mother’s brother’s daughter (matri- 
lateral cross-cousin), who need not be, but generally is, the father’s sister's 
daughter (bilateral cross-cousin), since the Kariera practise sister-exchange. 
This leads to the following diagram, showing the partial coincidence at least 
of the class system and the kinship system (Fig. 10). A crucial problem now 
faces us, for if the general structure in Fig. 10 is considered, it can be seen 
that it does not differ as much as might be expected from that of a group 
divided into two moieties. In this case, too, marriage is principally between 
cross-cousins, who are normally bilateral cousins. The superimposition of a 
matrilineal dichotomy upon the patrilineal dichotomy changes nothing from 
the point of view of marriage rules between cousins. However, one would 
normally expect something entirely different. Since the first division of the 
group into two moieties results immediately in the division of the w omen into 
two groups, one including possible wives, the other prohibited wives, i.e., 
in dividing the number of spouses by two, it would be natural that a second 
division should repeat the process, or, putting it another way, that it should 
divide the number of spouses regarded as possible in the first dichotomy 
again into two. 2 Must it thus be acknowledged that the introduction of a 

1 cf. ch. VIII. 

2 There is no need to state that here we are only dealing with marriage rules between 
persons of the same generation, and that for the time being we shall disregard the case. 




l6o The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

four-class system is foreign to the regulation of marriage ? If not, what is its 
effect on this regulation? 

A moment ago we said that a four-class system results from the super- 
imposition of a matrilineal dichotomy upon a patrilineal dichotomy. However, 
these two dichotomous rules do not operate in the same way in the deter- 
mination of descent. A four-class system recognizes both of them, but not 
in the same connexion; each applies to its own sphere. While the matrilineal 
rule is followed in connexion with descent, the patrilineal rule determines 
residence, or more exactly local origin. Indeed, the local group, or horde, it 
will be remembered, is constituted on a patrilineal basis. Moiety systems 
ignore this local group in determining descent; only the matrilineal moiety 

Patrilineal Moiety Matrilineal Moiety 




A =- b B ----- a 

FATHER’S FATHER Father’s mother MOTHER’S FATHER Mother’s mother 




SON’S SON Daughter’s daughter DAUGHTER’S SON Son’s daughter 

Fig. 10. Kariera system. 

matters. By contrast, four-section systems employ both elements: they 

retain the mother's moiety but also take the father’s group into consideration. 

It is the introduction of this new clement which brings about the change 

from a two-class to a four-class system. 

Let us illustrate this change with an example. Let us suppose that all the 

inhabitants of France are divided into two families, the Duponts and the 

Durands, and that, contrary to the custom of this country, the children 

always take their mother’s name. In this way we would have a system 

roughly resembling a matrilineal moiety organization, which would also be 

exogamous if the law were that all Durands must marry Duponts, and all 

which will be considered elsewhere, of dual organization allowing marriage with a classifi- 
catory ‘mother’ or ‘daughter’. This is always theoretically possible, and is sometimes 
found in a moiety system, but it is strictly prohibited in a section system. However, we 
are of the opinion that so-called ‘oblique’ phenomena pose problems of a new order, 
which will be touched on in the second part of this book. It should be added that Kroeber 
has emphasized the uncommonness of plural marriage with mother and daughter (Kroeber. 
1940, pp. 562-70). 




The Classical Systems 161 

Duponts, Durands. After a certain number of years, the result of such a 
system would be that every French city would comprise a certain number of 
Duponts and a certain number of Durands. There would be no rule to say 
that these Duponts and Durands must intermarry within the same city or 
that they should seek their spouses in other cities. 

Let us now assume that the heads of two cities, for example, Paris and 
Bordeaux, have previously established co-operative ties between their cities. 
To cement these ties they extend the law that the Duponts marry solely with 
the Durands, and vice versa, by stipulating that the Duponts of one city 
must marry only the Durands of the other city, a rule naturally holding for 
the Durands also. It has already been stated that the family name is trans- 
mitted in the maternal line, but if the custom was formerly that women went 
to live with their husbands, the family name will be added to a place name 
transmitted through the paternal line, since it is the father’s place of residence 
which determines the family's place of residence. Hence, there are four 
parties to the agreement, viz., the Duponts of Paris, the Duponts of Bordeaux, 
the Durands of Paris and the Durands of Bordeaux. Let us next examine 
the consequences of possible marriages by applying the twin rule that children 
take their family name from their mother and the name of their place of 
origin from their father. We would have the following combinations: 



If a man: 

Durand of Paris 
Durand of Bordeaux 
Dupont of Paris 
Dupont of Bordeaux 



marries a woman: 

Dupont of Bordeaux 
Dupont of Paris 
Durand of Bordeaux 
Durand of Paris 



the children are: 

Dupont of Paris 
Dupont of Bordeaux 
Durand of Paris 
Durand of Bordeaux 



By applying the symbols A, B, C, D, respectively to the Durands of Paris, 
the Duponts of Bordeaux, the Durands of Bordeaux and the Duponts of 
Paris, a Kariera-type formula is found (Fig. 11 ): 



C Durands of Paris (A) = (B) Duponts of Bordeaux *-i 

Durands of Bordeaux (C) = (D) Duponts of Paris 

Fig. 1 1 . An illustration of the Kariera system. 

Thus the four classes are nothing more than the four possible combinations 
of two couples of opposite terms in each respective couple: a couple of 
nominal terms, and a couple of place names, it being given ex hypothesi that 
the nominal terms are transmitted in the maternal line and the place names 
in the paternal line. Each section is divided into two linked elements, i.e., 
a name term and a place name, as in the convenient formula used by 




1 62 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

Lawrence 1 (Fig. 12) in which A and B are the names of moieties and X and 
Y the names of hordes of origin. 

j-AX 

-*AY 

Fig. 12. Descent and residence in the Kariera system. 

We can easily imagine in this way what the change is which brought about 
the transition from a moiety system to a four-section system. It is clear that 
there is nothing new as regards the kinship relationship of the possible 
spouses: in both cases they are cross-cousins. But while in the first case these 
cross-cousins, the Durands and the Duponts respectively, will risk marrying 
solely or primarily among themselves, either as Parisians or as Bordelais, in 
the second case a cross-cousin from Paris will necessarily marry a cross- 
cousin from Bordeaux, and vice versa. In other words, a new link will be 
superimposed upon the simple link established by the moiety division 
between the Duponts and the Durands, which will not only continue to unite 
them as in the past, but will also unite Paris and Bordeaux. A dialectic of 
residence, both reducing and reaffirming the social ties, will be added to the 
dialectic of descent. This is what is expressed by the fact that among the 
Kariera a local group always includes members of only two sections, some 
groups being Banaka-Palyeri and others Burung-Karimera. Consequently, 
a marriage necessarily establishes a relationship both between the members 
of two moieties and between the members of two groups. Instead of combining 
the benefit of three different types of social link - descent, alliance and 
locality - these are employed for different ends. Originally we had two 
groups (matrilineal moieties) united by three different types of link. We now 
have four groups (matrilineal moieties plus local groups with paternal descent), 
interrelated in such a way that one group is joined to another by at least two 
links, viz., descent plus marriage; marriage plus locality; or locality plus 
descent. The links are less numerous, but the number of things linked 
together is increased. 




It is convenient to interpret the more complex eight-subsection systems in 
the same way. The essential difference is that, instead of interrelating two 
moieties and two groups, eight-class systems establish a connexion between 
two moieties and four groups. This is expressed by the fact that among the 
Aranda, for example, as described by Spencer and Gillen, the local group 
always contains members of only two subsections, together making up a 
patrilineal couple. Consequently, four groups are necessary for a complete 
cycle to be closed within the system. If the same symbols used earlier to 

1 Lawrence, 1937. 




The Classical Systems 




designate sections arc retained, and it the two subsections resulting from 
the dichotomy of the original section arc given respectively the signs 1 and 2, 
the following formula results: 



If a man of 
subsection: 

A, 

A 2 

B, 

B 2 

C t 

C 2 

Di 

D 2 



marries a woman 
of subsection: 

B, 

B 2 

a 2 

Di 

D 2 

Ci 

c\ 



the children belong 
to subsection: 

D 2 

Di 

C, 

C\ 

Bi 

B 2 

a 7 

A, 



This represents the application of the law that, if a man belongs to a given 
subsection, his children belong to the alternate subsection of the same 
couple (keeping to the technical meaning of the term ‘couple’ as defined 
above). All this may be expressed in the following diagram (Fig. 13). Suppose 





r _ A i = B, < 

r* a, * R.73 








- d, 








1 1 



Fig. 1 3. Aranda rules of marriage. 



there are eight pairs, A t -B lt A 2 -B 2 , C x -D x , C 2 -D 2 \ B x -A x , B 2 -A 2> D x C j, 
D 2 -C 2 which could be reduced to four if direction were not taken into 
consideration. Suppose there are also eight couples, likewise reducible to 
four on the same grounds: A x -D 2 , A 2 -D x , B x -C x , B 2 -C 2 : D 2 -A x , D x -A 2 , 
C x -B lt C 2 ~B 2 ; and finally two cycles, each comprising the four subsections 
of one matrilineal moiety, viz., A 1 -C l -A 2 ~C 2 , then back to A x , and 
B x -D 2 -B 2 -D j, then back to B x . Note that in an eight-subsection system the 
parallelism with a four-section system extends to the pairs and the couples 
(with the one difference that there are twice as many of them), but that it 
stops at the cycles. There are two cycles in both systems, the difference being 
that in the eight-subsection system these cycles have twice the number of 
component elements. Accordingly the very structure of the cycle is 
changed, while the structure of the pairs and of the couples remains the 
same. 

This structure can be illustrated in the same way as was done with the 




164 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



Kariera system. Let us return to our two families, the Duponts and the 
Durands, who are obliged by the rule of exogamy to intermarry, and who 
transmit their names matrilineally. Let us further suppose, however, that 
there are four towns, Caen, Laon, Lille and Lyons, and that after marriage 
women go to live at their husband’s place of residence. The double stipulation 
that the family name be transmitted in the maternal line, and the residential 
name in the paternal line, gives the following combinations: 



If a man : 

Durand of Caen 
Durand of Laon 
Durand of Lille 
Durand of Lyons 
Dupont of Caen 
Dupont of Laon 
Dupont of Lille 
Dupont of Lyons 



marries a woman: 

Dupont of Laon 
Dupont of Lille 
Dupont of Lyons 
Dupont of Caen 
Durand of Lyons 
Durand of Caen 
Durand of Laon 
Durand of Lille 



the children will be: 

Dupont of Caen 
Dupont of Laon 
Dupont of Lille 
Dupont of Lyons 
Durand of Caen 
Durand of Laon 
Durand of Lille 
Durand of Lyons 



This could readily be represented by the theoretical diagram of the Aranda 
system given above: 




(Durand of Caen) 
(Durand of Lyons) 
(Durand of Laon) 



(Dupont of Lyons) 
(Dupont of Laon) 
(Dupont of Caen) 
(Dupont of Lille) 



Fig. 14. Illustration of the Aranda system. 




We have noted that the change from a moiety system to a four-section 
system does not, in itself bring about any innovation with regard to the 
degree of kinship sanctioned or prohibited by marriage. But this is not so 
in passing from a four-section system to an eight-subsection system. The 
consequences are important and can be directly deduced from a consideration 
of the system. Again let us repeat that in this as in previous cases the class 
mechanism does not automatically determine the spouse (since the one class 
can contain both prescribed and prohibited spouses). Nevertheless, the system 
of classes can at least permit the automatic determination of a certain number 
of marriage prohibitions. Seen in this way, our assertion amounts to saying 
that the consideration of a four-section system cannot lead to the exclusion 
of more potential spouses than was the case - in the same generation - under 
a moiety system. To the contrary, the machinery of an eight-subsection 
system automatically excludes twice as many possible spouses as do moieties 
or sections. Let us construct the kinship system which corresponds to 
structures with eight subsections, and examine the position of various 




The Classical Systems 



165 




Fig. 1 5. Aranda system. 

relatives in relation to this structure (Fig. 15). It is easy to see that in a system 
of this type the cross-cousins, whether unilateral or bilateral, can never fall 
into classes which are pairs (i.e., practising intermarriage), whereas the 
opposite is automatically brought about in the case of cousins descended 
from cross-cousins. This does not mean that cousins descended from cross- 
cousins become prescribed spouses because of this. But it does mean, at 
least, that the preferred spouse (in this case, the mother’s mother's brother's 
daughter’s daughter) belongs to the class of cousins descended from cross- 
cousins (Fig. 16). 




Fig. 16. Marriage of cousins descended from cross-cousins. 

We are now in a position to review the question of the connexions between 
marriage classes and kinship systems. It does not follow from the mechanism 
of marriage classes that their end or even their result is the automatic 
determination of the prescribed spouse. Indeed, the opposite is true, since 
a class may contain both permitted and prohibited spouses, Thus, in the 
final analysis, it is the relationship of consanguinity which plays the principal 
r61e, while class membership, at least in practice, is secondary. Nevertheless, 
this is true only when the positive aspect of spouse selection is being con- 
sidered, for the whole weight of evidence is agreed that, from the negative 




1 66 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

point of view, class plays just as important a role. The relationship of 
consanguinity means more than class in the determination of the spouse, 
but the natives regard the violation of class exogamy with the same horror 
as they regard marriage with a relative of a forbidden consanguineous 
relationship. If the basis of the problem is to be found in the consideration 
of degrees of consanguinity, rather than in classes, the function of the latter 
is not substantially different, even though the relation between them still 
remains to be specified. 

The determination of this relationship, however, raises an extremely 
difficult problem. We have repeatedly observed that all class systems lead 
to the dichotomy of members of the group into permitted and prohibited 
spouses. In a system without classes, theoretically no spouse is prohibited 
except those falling under the incest prohibition. A system with exogamous 
moieties not only divides the group into two moieties but divides all the men 
and women into possible and prohibited spouses, a division which is ex- 
pressed in the dichotomy of cross and parallel cousins. As we have just seen, 
an eight-subsection system further reduces by half the number of available 
spouses, since it establishes a new dichotomy between first cross-cousins 
and second cross-cousins. But none of this corresponds to the four-section 
system. In other words, if one considers only Ego’s generation, it can be 
established that a moiety system divides the possible spouses by two, that an 
eight-subsection system again divides these by two, but that a four-section 
system leaves these untouched. We have interpreted this by pointing out 
that a four-section system has recourse to twice as many elements in defining 
the status of the individual within the family group. Accordingly, the effect 
of doubling the classes is annulled by doubling the factors. 

For all that, however, the problem is not resolved. If we no longer consider 
the marriage class systems, but the successive dichotomies of spouses, we 
shall perceive that the dichotomous process skips one stage which neverthe- 
less seems logically necessary. The moiety system divides all first cousins 
into cross and parallel cousins; the eight-subsection system divides cross- 
cousins into first and second cousins. But there must have been an inter- 
mediate phase, when cross-cousins were divided into matrilateral and 
patrilateral cousins, for just as there are two types of cousins, so there are 
two types of cross-cousin (sister’s brother’s children and brother’s sister’s 
children). The following process might thus have been expected: the first 
dichotomy distinguishes cross and parallel cousins and excludes the latter; 
the second dichotomy distinguishes matrilateral and patrilateral cross- 
cousins and excludes one or the other of these two groups; and finally, the 
third dichotomy distinguishes all cross-cousins as cross-cousins and as 
cousins descended from cross-cousins, and excludes the former. Only the 
first and third stages come into effect in a system with marriage classes, the 
first through moieties, the third by means of the subsections. The second 
stage is absent, because the sections to which theoretically it would have had 




The Classical Systems 167 

to correspond do not themselves effect any dichotomy in Ego’s generation. 
Consequently, we have to answer two questions: How is it that there is no 
dichotomy between cousins in a four-section system? What explanation is 
there for the fact that there is no stage answering to the distinction between 
the two types of cross-cousin in the dichotomous process corresponding to 
the series: two moieties - four sections - eight subsections? 




CHAPTER XII 



The Murngin System 

I 

These questions would probably have remained unanswered if tribes which 
practise precisely this dichotomy of cross-cousins had not been discovered 
in the north of Australia, in Arnhem Land to the west of the Gulf of Car- 
pentaria. The Murngin, studied by Warner , 1 prescribe marriage with the 
mother’s brother’s daughter and prohibit it with the other cross-cousin, the 
father’s sister's daughter. It is essential, therefore, to know how the Murngin 
organization stands in relation to the classical systems of moieties, sections 
and subsections. But here the difficulties begin. 

In fact, the Murngin system of classes does not conform to any of the 
classical types. Sometimes it has been interpreted as a Kariera system (i.e., 
with four classes), but in this case no distinction between the two types of 
cross-cousin has been found, any more than it has been in the Kariera system 
itself. Sometimes it has been conceived of as an Aranda system (i.e., with 
eight subsections), but without taking into account the considerable differ- 
ences which separate it from the latter. Thus, most authors are agreed in 
classing the Murngin system as an aberrant system (‘off pattern’, as Lawrence 
puts it 2 ). One might then wonder how a marriage rule (the cross-cousin 
dichotomy), which seems a logically necessary term in a given series, may 
not be derived from systems constituting this series, while at the same time 
resulting from another system which is itself irreducible. Either the series 
is poorly constructed, or the Murngin system has been insufficiently analyzed. 

The Murngin system resembles the Kariera system because it has four 
sections, and the Aranda system because these four sections are divided into 
eight subsections. But it differs from both in that these subsections always 
exist, although they are not always named. On the other hand, the subsections 
do not function as in an Aranda system ; instead of resulting in the elimination 
of cross-cousins from the number of possible spouses, they retain them. In 
other words, the Murngin system differs from the Kariera system in that it 
has eight classes, and from the Aranda system in that these eight classes 
function as if there were only four. 

1 Warner, 1930, pp. 207-56; 1931, pp. 172-98. 2 See above, p. 150. 




The Murngin System 169 

Let us leave to one side those groups in which the subsections, although 
real, are not named, and consider those, described by Webb, in which the 
subsections are explicitly designated. The tribes of eastern Arnhem Land 
are divided into two patrilineal moieties, Yiritcha and Dua, and each horde, 
of course, is exclusively in one or the other. 1 Each of these moieties is 
divided, in turn, into four subsections, thus making atotal of eight subsections. 
For the sake of simplicity, we shall ignore the fact that there are two names 
for each subsection, one for males and one for females, because these have 
no influence on the system. Taking only the masculine name, we have the 
following list: 



Yiritcha Moiety 



Subsections: Ngarit 

Bulain 

Kaijark 

Bangardi 



Dua Moiety 

Subsections: Buralang 

Balang 

Karmarung 

Warmut 



So far everything seems normal. But as soon as we consider the marriage 
rules, we find an anomaly characterizing every system in the region: instead 
of a man being required to seek his wife in only one subsection of the other 
moiety, he has a choice between the two subsections composing the one 
section. For example, a Ngarit man can marry either a Balang woman or a 
Buralang woman; a Bulain man may choose between a Buralang woman 
and a Balang woman; a Kaijark man marries either in the Warmut sub- 
section or in the Karmarung subsection, etc. Whatever the type of marriage 
practised, the children belong to the same section (the alternate section to 
the father's in the same moiety), but, within the section, to one or the other 
of the subsections. Thus a Ngarit man marrying a Balang woman will have 
Bangardi children, while if the woman is Buralang the children will be 
Kaijark. From a Buralang wife, a Bulain husband will have Kaijark children, 
and from a Balang woman, Bangardi children, etc. There is then a lixed 
relationship between the children’s subsection and the type of marriage 
made by the father, and an equally fixed relationship between the children’s 
subsection and the mother’s subsection, but not between the father’s sub- 
section and the children’s subsection. Indeed, only the children’s section 
maintains a fixed relationship with the father’s section, the subsection 
depending on the type of marriage practised. This may be expressed by 
saying that there is a stable relationship between the pairs and the cycles, and 
a stable relationship between the pairs and the couples, but not between the 
cycles and the couples. Webb interprets this as proving that descent in the 
subsection is matrilineal, but Elkin has described this phenomenon more 
correctly as a case of indirect patrilineal descent. As a matter of fact, Elkin 
differentiates the two types of possible marriage as regular and alternate 



1 Webb, 1933, pp. 406-17. 




170 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

types, and he then formulates the following law which satisfactorily accounts 
for this complex system: ‘In the case of alternate marriage . . . the children 
belong to the subsection of the father's moiety to which they would have 
belonged had their actual mother been regularly married according to the 
strict subsection rule. Thus, the father is “thrown away” as far as the sub- 
section is concerned .’ 1 It is of relevance, moreover, that the alternate wife 
always comes from the same section as the regular wife (Fig. 17). 



Matrilineal 

Moiety 




Matrilineal 

Moietv 

L 



Matrilineal 

Moiety 



1 — > 





r 



< 



> 

< 





Man — 


Woman = 


Child = 




i: YIRITCHA 


DIJA 


Y1RUCHA 


A, 


Ngarit 


Balang 


Bangardi 




(Ngarit) 


(Buralang) 


Kaijark 


a 2 


Bulain 


Buralang 


Kaijark 




(Bulain) 


(Balang) 


Bangardi 




Kaijark 


Warmut 


Ngarit 




(Kaijark) 


(Karmarung) 


Bulain 


d 2 


Bangardi 


Karmarung 


Bulain 




(Bangardi) 


(Warmut) 


Ngarit 




n: dua 


YIRITCHA 


DUA 


Bi 


Balang 


Ngarit 


Karmarung 




(Balang) 


(Bulain) 


Warmut 


B, 


Buralang 


Bulain 


Warmut 




(Buralang) 


(Ngarit) 


Karmarung 


C, 


Warm ut 


Kaijark 


Balang 




(Warmut) 


(Bangardi) 


Buralang 


c 2 


Karmarung 


Bangardi 


Buralang 




(Karmarung) 


(Kaijark) 


Balang 



Fig. 17. Structure of the Murngin system. (After Webb, 1933, pp. 406-17.) 



For this reason, it has sometimes been considered that the subsections had 
nothing to do with the regulation of marriage, and that the Murngin system 
operated as though the sections and not the subsections were paired. Warner 
suggests this in his theoretical representation of the Murngin system (Fig. 1 8), 2 
which, in our opinion, reveals its essence. The important fact is not that each 
system, the regular and the alternate, separately produce the same results, 
1 Elkin, 1933, p. 412. 1 Warner, 1931, pp. 172-98. 




The Murngin System 171 

but that they are two in number. To ignore this duality takes away all means 
of understanding its raison d'etre. 

Let us therefore construct two independent diagrams, one corresponding 
to the regular system, the other to the alternate system (Fig. 19). They need 
only be compared to show that the analogy between the Murngin system 
and the Aranda system, as represented in Fig. 13, is only apparent. The 
directions of the arrows, that is, are not the same. While the arrows on the 

•{; ■ 



Fig. 18. Murngin marriage rules (after Warner, 1931, p. 183). 

right of both Murngin diagrams are the same as on the right of the Aranda 
diagram, the arrows on the left point in the opposite directions. Elkin clearly 
saw r this structural difference, which in the Murngin system has the effect 
that ‘the cycle of a man of any one subsection is not completed until by 
marriage and descent all eight subsections have been gone through, and 





Regular system Alternate system 

Fig. 1 9. Murngin marriage rules. 



until by descent alone all four subsections of his own moiety have been gone 
through '. 1 By contrast, in a classical eight-subsection system of the Aranda 
type, the cycle is formed in four subsections by descent and marriage, and 
by descent alone, in only two subsections, of the moiety of the man con- 
sidered. This difference is seen in Fig. 20, which should be interpreted as 
follows: in the Aranda system a man always falls into the same class as his 
grandfather (his father’s father) and he always finds his grandson (his son's 
son) in the same class as himself. In the Murngin system, on the contrary, a 
man falls into the same class only after five generations, i.e., a man, his 
father’s father’s father's father, and his son's son's son’s son are in the same 
class. 



* Elkin, 1933, p. 413. 




172 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

Is there a relationship between this structural difference in the class system, 
and the marriage rule by which a man marries only his mother’s brother’s 
daughter, and not his father’s sister’s daughter? Elkin believes that the 



b 



2 





i 




Murngin system (regular) 





i 



1 



Aranda system 



Fig. 20. The Murngin system and the Aranda system. 



extension of the cycle of masculine descent, in the Murngin system, would 
directly explain the special regulation of marriage. Rightly insisting upon 
the importance, underestimated by Warner, of the subsection system, Elkin 
w rites : 

‘Indeed, it is so important that it has been most carefully arranged to fit 
in with the rule of marriage with the mother’s brother’s daughter. 
Theoretically, this has been regarded as impossible, as, of course, it is, 
if the typical rule of the marriage and descent of the subsections be adhered 
to. The aborigines of this area were not so bound by theory, and faced 
with the practical problem, they seem to have solved it in a most ingenious 
manner by doubling the normal length of the cycle.’ 1 

Let us ask, then, if a link really does exist between the doubling of the cycle 
and the regulation of marriage, and if so, what this link is. 

First, let us take the hypothesis of the regular system, and seek in it the 
approved and the excluded spouses (Fig. 21). 



^ I | ■ i 

c[ c 2 EGO (D 2 ) c[ c 2 

Fig. 21. Murngin marriage rule (regular system). 

As, in the regular system, D 2 and C 2 form a pair, it may be seen that both 
cross-cousins fall into the class from which Ego may obtain a wife. That is, 
the class system does not take into account the distinction made by the 
Arnhem Land tribes between the matrilateral cross-cousin and the patrilateral 
cross-cousin. 



1 Elkin, 1933, p. 416. 




The Murngin System 173 

Now what happens in the alternate system (Fig. 22)? As and C\ form 

•d _ J 2 J “1 

B 2 — ai -= b 2 B 2 ~ a 1 

C, c 2 EGO (D,) cl c 2 

Fig. 22. Murngin marriage rule (alternate system). 

a pair in the alternate system, it may be seen that the two cross-cousins are 
no more distinguished from each other than in the regular system. Both 
equally fall into the class of possible spouses. 

11 

Thus, there is no direct relationship between the specific character of the 
Murngin system (the doubling of the masculine cycle), and the regulation of 
marriage prohibiting the patrilateral cousin, and prescribing the matrilateral 
cousin. In actual fact, the doubling of the cycle has its own consequence, 
but this is quite different, viz., the restoration of both cross-cousins (or the 
bilateral cross-cousin) to the class of possible spouses. In other words, it 
annuls the specific effect of an eight-subsection system organized on the 
classical model. It is easy to see the reason for this. The doubling of the 
cycle is equivalent to dividing the number of classes by two. The cycle being 
twice as long, the system works as though there were four classes instead of 
eight. From the point of view of the regulation of marriage, the Murngin 
system, taken in isolation, revives purely and simply the conditions of the 
Kariera system. Whether it be the regular or the alternate type of marriage, 
as sanctioned by the Murngin system, the first relative fulfilling the class 
conditions required to be a possible spouse is the mother’s brother's daughter, 
or the father’s sister’s daughter, or the cross-cousin who is both. 

Faced with the Murngin system, must we then concede the complete 
absence of any connexion between the class system and the regulation of 
marriage? This regulation establishes, ostensibly by itself, a basic distinction 
which is reflected in the whole system : we shall see shortly that preferential 
marriage with the mother’s brother's daughter gives the Murngin kinship 
system quite exceptional characteristics, unmatched in the majority of 
Australian tribes. However, because of this fundamental feature, the class 
system is of no effect. Both cross-cousins fall into the same class, that of 
possible spouses, but only one may be married. Is the preferred spouse wholly 
and solely determined, therefore, by the degree of relationship? 

Before resigning ourselves to this negative conclusion, let us examine the 
problem further. The Murngin are distinguished from other groups with 
eight subsections, both by the functioning of the subsections and by the 
regulation of marriage. Even if it has to be agreed that the two orders are 




1 74 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

heterogeneous, this does not alter the fact that if there is a change in one there 
will be a change in the other. We have been unable to discover any relation- 
ship between the class mechanism and marriage preference. But the problem 
can be posed differently, viz., since a difference in the class mechanism is 
given simultaneously with a difference in marriage preferences, is it not 
possible to establish a connexion between the differences themselves? For 
it would be truly surprising if, quite independently, an anomaly were to 
develop in the class-system, and another anomaly in the regulation of mar- 
riage, without there being some degree of correlation between them. On the 
other hand, if this correlation does exist, it means that the regulation of 
marriage is not completely independent of the class system. 

The difference in the regulation of marriage consists in the dichotomy of 
cross-cousins. The change in the system of classes consists in two things: 
firstly, there are two forms of marriage instead of one; and, secondly, each 
of these forms functions as though the system comprised four classes instead 
of eight. Unfortunately, we do not have any indication of the conditions in 
which the aborigines use these two forms. Both Webb and Warner say 
merely that a man of a given subsection marries within a particular sub- 
section of the opposite moiety, and that he may also marry a woman from 
another subsection according to the alternate form of marriage. But let us 
take a hypothetical situation in which these two forms would be employed 
alternately in both the direct and the collateral lines. That is, if my father 
has married according to the alternate type, my son marries according to 
the regular type, my son’s son according to the alternate type, and so on. 
It follows from this that if I marry in conformity with the regular type, my 
sister marries according to the alternate type, and vice versa. Hence, the 
result of this simple rule, the assumption of which is sufficiently suggested 
by the presence of the two forms, even in the absence of any positive infor- 
mation, is that the mother’s brother’s daughter automatically falls into the 
class of prescribed spouse, and the father’s sister’s daughter, also automati- 
cally, into the opposite class. There is thus a relationship between the anomaly 
of the class system (two forms to match the classes) and the anomaly of 
marriage (dichotomy of cross-cousins). At the same time, the peculiar 
functioning of the class mechanism becomes clear. We have said that the 
Murngin system, like the Aranda, has eight classes, but functions as if it had 
four as in the Kariera system. Nothing could be drawn from this peculiarity 
if there were only one form. But if there are two forms, and they function 
alternately, the system will develop characteristics of both types, or rather 
these will be compounded within the system. Elkin saw one aspect at least 
of this law when he noted that where an alternate marriage follows a regular 
marriage, there is a return to the classical cycle of class succession in the 
patrilineal line. But in fact there is no such return. Nothing would be gained 
by it, since there would only have been a change from a system indiscrimi- 
nately sanctioning both cross-cousins, to one eliminating them both. The 




The Murngin System 175 

result in fact is intermediate between the four-class and the eight-class 
systems. The system, which originally functioned as a four-class system, 
begins to function as an eight-class system in one respect (i.e., by eliminating 
the patrilateral cross-cousin), and continues to function as a four-class 
system in the other (by keeping the matrilateral cross-cousin in the class of 
possible spouses). This emerges clearly from Fig. 23, which also shows that 



(Alt.) (Reg.) (Alt.) (Reg.) (Alt.) (Reg.) 




Fig. 23. The combined regular and alternate Murngin systems. 



if the law of alternation between the regular and the alternate forms is 
followed in the direct line, it automatically extends to the collateral line and 
vice versa. 

As may be seen, every marriage is with the mother’s brother’s daughter, 
while the father’s sister’s daughter is automatically eliminated by the alter- 
native application of the two forms. There is scarcely need to emphasize 
that, whatever the modes of this alternative usage, the matrilateral cousin 
is always retained and the patrilateral cousin excluded. In other words, the 
system is entirely oriented in one direction, orientation in the opposite 
direction being impossible. The reason for this phenomenon will be given 
in chapter XXVII. 

The connexion between the regulation of marriage and the class mechanism 
peculiar to the Murngin is thus clear. But still this connexion has been 
established only at the expense of extreme complication and with the 
elaboration of a burdensome and inconvenient system. To arrive at a 
dichotomy of cousins intermediate between that resulting from a moiety 
system and that peculiar to an eight-subsection system, the following pro- 
cedure might be said to have been followed. Firstly, the eight-subsection 
system was adopted; then it was modified to function as a simpler system; 
and, finally, it was doubled to obtain a form of dichotomy intermediate 
between that of the simple system and that of the complex system. In other 
words, it seems that the more complicated form has been directly achieved 




1 76 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

and then even further complicated in order to make it function as a simpler 
form. This procedure strongly suggests that the Murngin system is not a 
direct codification of the marriage rule characteristic of this society, but rather 
that it is the result of a sort of compromise between a pre-existing marriage 
rule and a fully developed class system introduced from outside. 

This hypothesis accords with Stanner’s remarks on the marriage system 
of the Nangiomeri, living a few hundred miles from Arnhem Land. Until 
quite recently, the Nangiomeri had neither sections, moieties, nor any other 
form of marriage classes. Thus marriage took place with both cross-cousins, 
or with the bilateral cross-cousin. Within recent years these aborigines have 
acquired from tribes to the south and south-west a complex system of 
matrilineal totemic subsections, and a new form of marriage with the sister’s 
son’s daughter (provided that she is not the child of one’s own daughter, 
who may marry the sister’s son). The analogy with the functioning of the 
subsections in the Murngin system is brought to light by Stanner’s obser- 
vation that Ego’s father’s father is in the same subsection as Ego’s son’s son, 
while in a classical system Ego’s father’s father falls into the same subsection 
as Ego himself. In contrast, among the Nangiomeri, Ego falls into an inter- 
mediate subsection, and it is his son’s son who completes the cycle. Thus, as 
among the Murngin, the cycle is doubled. And Stanner comments: ‘These 
people quite frankly admit they do not yet understand [this new system] . . . 
[which] they were taught ... by the Fitzmaurice and Victoria River tribes.’ 1 
In another work on the same group this author says: 

‘What has happened is much the same as Warner has reported from 
Arnhem Land. The Nangiomeri are trying to apply, and have more 
ingeniously done so to a Kariera type of social organization, a subsectional 
system elaborated by a much more complex society probably related to 
the Aranda type. That is, a systematization of a kinship system of Aranda 
type has spread to them without the system upon which it is based itself 
having been adopted. The Nangiomeri do claim, however, to have adopted 
with the subsectional system marriage with the sister’s son’s daughter.’ 2 

Stanner’s last statement leaves untouched the question of the ultimate 
relationship between the class system of the Nangiomeri and their regulation 
of marriage. For even if, as is suggested, they borrowed both at the same 
time it would still need to be known in what conditions both types of pheno- 
mena came to coexist among their original owners. If the Murngin and the 
Nangiomeri systems could be traced back to their earliest beginnings, it 
seems almost certain that a group would be found, at the source, which had 
done its best to make an original marriage system coincide with an eight- 
subsection mechanism borrowed from elsewhere. 

If this assumption is correct it produces an important consequence, viz., 
that although the two institutions may have been made to function together 

1 Stanner, 1933a, p. 417. 2 ibid. 19336, pp. 397-8. 




177 



The Murngin System 

satisfactorily, the Muingin class system docs not constitute the Murngin 
marriage law, in the sense that the physicist uses the word law. If this word 
does not mean the rule as conceived of by the legislator (for, in this case, it is 
evident that the class system is a law) but a constant relationship between 
variables, then the question is posed whether the modes of Murngin marriage, 
which are relatively simpler than those of Aranda marriage, might not be 
expressed also in a formula simpler than that of the Aranda instead of in a 
more complicated form as seemingly they are. That the aborigines are not 
conscious of the postulated law should not be used as an argument against 
seeking it. For there is no need to be conscious of linguistic laws to be able 
to speak, nor of laws of logic to think. None the less, these laws exist, and 
the theoretician rightly strives to discover them. In this regard the sociologist’s 
attitude should be no different. As Shirokogoroff notes of a people who offer 
but one particular illustration of a general phenomenon : 



‘From the description and analysis of the Tungus ideas and attitudes 
towards the phenomena of social organization and ethnical relations it 
may be seen that the Tungus treat them as other natural phenomena. 
They observe the facts, some of which are cognized while others escape 
their attention . . . Social phenomena may exist and function without 
being cognized .’ 1 



On the other hand, the importance of the discovery of the law of preferen- 
tial marriage with the mother’s brother’s daughter far exceeds the discussion 
of the solitary Murngin problem. The great majority of people practising 
cross-cousin marriage reveal a preference for the matrilateral cousin. Since 
we have made the analysis of cross-cousin marriage the crucial experiment 
for the problem of the incest prohibition, we cannot exempt ourselves from 
accounting for such a striking peculiarity. Finally, it has been shown that 
the classical Australian series of successive dichotomies between preferred 
and prohibited spouses contains a lacuna. This gap is revealed by the 
anomalies of the classical systems but they themselves are unable to define 
the missing term. We should seek whether the law of preferential marriage 
with the matrilateral cross-cousin does not provide it. 



hi 

Let us consider the three classical Australian systems, viz., moieties, sections 
and subsections. These systems have a basic structure which is unaltered 
by any difference in the number of classes. This common characteristic may 
be formulated as follows: whether the class considered be a moiety, a section, 
or a subsection, marriage always conforms to the rule that if a man of A 
can marry a woman of B, a man of B can marry a woman of A . Thus there 
is reciprocity between the sexes within the classes ; or, if preferred, the marriage 

1 Shirokogoroff, 1935, p. 104. 




1 78 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

rules are indifferent to the sex of the spouses. What is true for marriage rules 
is obviously not so for the rules of descent, but there is no need to consider 
these for the moment. 

Systems exhibiting this characteristic, whatever the number of classes, are 
called systems of restricted exchange , meaning that the systems can operate 
mechanisms of reciprocity only between two partners or between partners 
in multiples of two. 

The immediate result is that a system with two exogamous moieties must 
always be a system of restricted exchange. Indeed, if we are limited to two 
groups A and B y and if marriage is impossible within each group, the only 
solution for A is to seek its spouses in B , and for B reciprocally to seek its 
spouses in A . But what is true for a two-class system is not true for a four-class 
system. In a system with four exogamous classes we have, in fact, the choice 
between two theoretical possibilities. The first is realized in the Kariera 
system, in which the classes are split into two pairs, each governed by a law 
of restricted exchange. The link between the two pairs is secured by descent, 
the children of parents who are of one of the pairs always belonging to a 
section of the other pair. That is, an A man marries a B woman (pair no. 1), 
the children are D (pair no. 2); a B man marries an A woman (pair no. 1), 
the children are C (pair no. 2). 

But there is a second possibility satisfying at the same time the exigencies 
of class exogamy and those of the division, formulated or unformulated, into 
moieties. This possibility may be expressed by the formula: if an A man 
marries a B woman, a B man marries a C woman. Here the link between the 
classes is expressed simultaneously by marriage and by descent. We propose 
to call the systems using this formula, systems of generalized exchange , 
indicating thereby that they can establish reciprocal relationships between 
any number of partners. These relationships, moreover, are directional 
relationships. For example, if a B man depends for his marriage upon class C, 
placed after his own, a B woman depends upon class A, placed before. 

Such a system may be illustrated by Fig. 24, where the arrows represent 
one-way pairs (going from the man to the woman), while the same system 
turns symmetrically but inversely if considered from the point of view of 
the other spouse (Fig. 25). 




Fig. 24. Generalized exchange. Fig. 25. Generalized exchange. 

Let us examine this system from the point of view of the pairs, the couples 
and the cycles. Firstly, four types of possible marriage are implied, viz.. 




The Murngin System 179 

A with B, B with C, C with D, and D with A (or, from the woman’s point 
of view, B with A, C with B , D with C, and A with D, which amounts to the 
same thing). Thus, following Radcliffe-Brown’s terminology, we have four 
pairs. But these pairs do not have the same character as in systems of re- 
stricted exchange in which the notion of pair implies a double marriage 
relationship, such that, for the pair AB, the relationship is of an A man with 
a B woman, and of a B man with an A woman. In a system of generalized 
exchange, by contrast, the pairs are univocal instead of reciprocal. That is, 
they unite only the men of one section with the women of the other. As we 
have seen, it is the reciprocal character of the pairs which allows their re- 
duction to two in a Kariera system. In this regard, the difference is that in 
the type of system being described here there are four univocal or directional 
pairs. 

Let us now consider the couples. Whatever the relationship uniting the 
father’s section and that of his children, the couples remain the same. The 
same may be said of the cycles, i.e., the relationship between the mother’s 
section and that of her children has no influence on the rule of marriage. 
In other words, the rules of marriage and of descent are not functionally 
related. The former - by which an A man marries a B woman, a B man a C 
woman, a C man a D woman, and a D man, an A woman - remains the 
same, whether it is decided that the children of a man A shall fall into 
section A , B, C, or D. The only condition is that the rule of descent, once 
chosen, shall be applied systematically. 

Let us suppose, for example, that the children belong to the section 
immediately following that of the mother. This form is particularly con- 
venient since it implies, in the preceding figures, that two consecutive arrows 
indicate, for the same conjugal family, firstly, the rule of marriage, and 
secondly, the rule of descent. Four types of relationship between the father’s 
section and that of his children are found, viz., AC, BD, CA, and DB. 
Finally, there are four cycles, viz., BC , CD, DA and AB. It is easy to see 
that these cycles have the same structure as the pairs, that is, a rotating 
structure, while the couples have an oscillatory structure (Fig. 26). 




Pairs 




Couples 



Cycles 



Fig. 26. Pairs, couples and cycles. 



This means that in a four-class system of generalized exchange there are 
always two explicit or implicit patrilineal moieties, but no matrilineal 
moiety. Further, in such a system the rotary structure appears twice (in the 




1 80 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

pairs and in the cycles) and the oscillatory structure only once (in the couples). 
If the same analysis is applied to the Kariera system it may be established 
that the rotary structure is entirely absent, the pairs, couples and cycles all 
being based on the oscillatory type. On the other hand, in an Aranda system 
the oscillatory structure appears twice (in both cycles) and the rotary structure 
also twice (in the pairs and in the couples). From the point of view of formal 
analysis, the four-class system of generalized exchange is thus in an inter- 
mediate position between the two systems of restricted exchange, one with 
four classes, the other with eight classes. Is it the same in regard to the 
regulation of marriage? 

It is sufficient to construct a model to see the marriage form sanctioned by 
a four-class system of generalized exchange (Fig. 27). 



D 

w 

B 



a A = b B - 

b ego (C) D d 

Fig. 27. Matrilateral marriage. 



The rule of marriage being that a C man marries a D woman, it may be 
seen that Ego can marry the mother’s brother’s daughter, who is always 
in the class immediately following his own, but not the father’s sister’s 
daughter, who is always in the class immediately preceding his own. 
This characteristic structure is reversed when passing from the sister to 
the brother, so that Ego cannot marry his patrilateral cross-cousin, but the 
latter’s brother (who is also B ) can marry Ego's sister (who is C). Indeed, Ego’s 
sister is the matrilateral cross-cousin of her patrilateral cousin. In this type of 
system, marriage relationships are always like a theoretically indefinite chain, 
in that my patrilateral cross-cousin marries my sister, I marry my matrilateral 
cross-cousin, her brother marries his matrilateral cross-cousin, and so on. 
In fact, four families are sufficient to close the cycle, since there are four 
classes or any multiple of four (Fig. 28). 





v 

= d 




A 



Fig. 28. Generalized exchange among four classes. 



It may therefore be seen that a four-class system of generalized exchange 
is the theoretical model of preferential marriage with the mother’s brother’s 



The Murngin System 181 

daughter. It expresses most simply the law of the dichotomy of cross-cousins. 1 
We have thus reached the theoretical form of Murngin marriage. At the same 
time we have found a term, missing in the classical series, which can be 
inserted between the moiety system and that of eight subsections, a place 
which the four-section system of the Kariera type falsely occupied, and which 
explains the transition from the prohibition of parallel cousins to the 
prohibition of all first cousins. This intermediate term is the four-section 
system, but with generalized exchange, the function of which is to eliminate 
half the cross-cousins. 

Is it now possible to attribute to the system of generalized exchange a 
value other than that of a theoretical formula? There is no doubt the Murngin 
seem unconscious of the existence of this system. But it seems possible, 
firstly, to show that certain peculiarities of the Murngin kinship system are 
unintelligible if the effect of an implicit system corresponding to the definition 
of generalized exchange, underlying the explicit system, is not postulated; 
and, secondly, to explain why the system of generalized exchange has re- 
mained subjacent and why the explicit system is formulated in very different 
terms. 



iv 

The Murngin kinship system requires seven patrilineal lines united by the 
marriage of the father’s sister’s son with the mother’s brother's daughter. 
It also recognizes five generations, viz., two ascending generations above 
that of Ego, and two descending generations below. The second ascending 
generation is called the ‘head’ of the kinship system, the second descending 
generation is the ‘foot’, and the lines are the ‘paths’. It is seen that the 
extension of the system, in both senses, is enormous, and Warner, surprised 
by this, stated that it seemed ‘unexplainable and almost fantastic’. 2 Actually, 

* On the hypothesis of the prior existence of a division into patrilineal moieties, of 
course. Otherwise, three classes suffice. 

The symbols used in Figs. 26, 27 and 28 have led J. P. B. de Josselin de Jong to 
credit me with the idea- which he considers odd, and with good reason- that the Murngin 
system derived from four classes, with the assignation of the son to the class of the mother’s 
brother’s wife (de Josselin de Jong, 1952, pp. 37, 39-40). In fact, I suppose nothing of the 
sort, for, firstly, I was not dealing at this point with the Murngin system, but with a 
hypothetical model of generalized exchange; secondly, it was only a matter of convention, 
and as a means of making it easier to read, that 1 supposed-as explained on page 
179 -that the rule was that children belong to the class following that of the mother. 
Consequently, Fig. 30 does not represent a stage in the system (as de Josselin de Jong 
seems to believe), but a rule of conversion from one stage to another. It is a simple opera- 
tional procedure, not the picture of a society. De Josselin de Jong, it is true, questions 
the liberty I took in choosing a conversion rule solely by virtue of its simplicity, because 
it contravenes the notion-which 1 use in another connexion-of unilineal descent (ibid, 
p. 40). However, as I have repeatedly indicated, and as my eminent critic himself recognizes, 
I define unilineal descent in a purely formal way. Take any element of personal status, and 
unilineal descent involves no more, as far as this element is concerned, than a constant 
relationship between this element and the same element of the status of both of the parents 
or of one of them. 2 Warner, 1931, p. 181. 





The Elementary Structures of Kinship 





Fig. 29. Murngin kinship nomenclature. 



The Murngin System \ 83 

marriage with the unilateral cross-cousin theoretically requires only three 
lines, viz., those of Ego, his mother, and his sister’s husband. 

From these three indispensable lines we might expect a symmetrical 
system as among the Kariera . 1 However, the system is extended to the right, 
beyond the maternal line, by two supplementary lines (the mari-mokul- 
marelker line, and the nio/nclker-natchiwalker-arndi-gawel line), and to the 
left, by two supplementary lines, also beyond the brother-in-law’s line (the 
kutara-gurrong line, and the dumungur-waku line). Besides, it should im- 
mediately be noted that in both directions the last line is a reflection or echo 
of the last but two. Warner very clearly shows that dumungur is a diminutive 
of due (while waku repeats waku ), that momelker is a diminutive of momo , 
and natchiwalker of nati (while arndi repeats arndi, and gawel , gawel). 

Warner attempts to explain the enormous extension of the Murngin kin- 
ship system in psychological terms. According to him, the two supplementary 
lines are added to both ends to resolve tensions which, without them, would 
arise in the group. Given marriage with the matrilateral cross-cousin, the 
sister's son {waku) depends, in fact, on the mother’s brother (gawel) to obtain 
a wife. He is in a suppliant position with respect to him, a psychologically 
weak position. By contrast, the position of the mother’s brother, father of 
the cross-cousin, is strong. If the kinship system were limited to the three 
central lines of descent, the theoretically essential ones, the social groups 
would be in a state of psychological disequilibrium. The structure would 
terminate at one end in a gawel person, i.e., an individual in the strong 
position, and at the other end in a waku person, an individual in the weak 
position. This is avoided by adding a supplementary line to both ends of the 
system. The kutara (sister’s daughter’s son) is to the waku (sister’s son) as 
the waku is to Ego, and symmetrically Ego is not, as regards his gawel 
(mother’s brother) in a weaker situation than the latter is to Ego’s marl 
(mother’s mother’s brother). Thus ‘through the mari-kutara tie there is 
strength between gawel and waku , so that a solid bond is established from 
mari in the second ascending generation and second lateral line to the right 
of Ego, and kutara in the second descending generation and second lateral 
line to the left of Ego ’. 2 Indeed, mari, who plays the role of faithful friend 
to Ego, is gawel to Ego’s own gawel : ‘the mari-kutara reciprocal creates an 
equilibrium in the kinship structure by balancing the inequalities of the 
gawel-waku reciprocal ’. 3 Using an argument of the same type Warner 
purports to account for the two succeeding lines, one added to the right of 
the mari line, the other to the left of the kutara line: 

'‘Momelker and natchiwalker are important because the former is the 
mother of Ego’s mother-in-law, and the latter because he is the brother 
of this woman. Dumungur, reciprocal of these terms, is emotionally 
important because, from the point of view of momelker and natchiwalker. 



• Warner. 1931, p. 182. 



2 ibid. p. 1 79. 



3 ibid. p. 182. 




1 84 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



he is the person who has a feeling of taboo for them since the woman is his 
mother-in-law's mother .' 1 



This interpretation seems to us to entail an arbitrary and dangerous 
teleology, in that it amounts to explaining the unconscious bases of social 
life by conscious or semi-conscious superstructures, and primary phenomena 
by secondary and derivative phenomena. All the specialists on Australia have 
stressed the importance of the kinship system, by showing that kinship 
relationships define the respective status of individuals in the group, and their 
rights and duties to each other. This general observation would lose all 
meaning if, as Warner suggests, it is psychological needs that determine the 
existence or non-existence of certain degrees of kinship. For then we should 
be trapped in a circular argument, the kinship system giving rise to attitudes, 
and these attitudes modifying the kinship system. Even if the relationships 
of kutara and mari, and of momclker and dumungur, were not in the ter- 
minology, there would always be someone occupying the place which these 
terms designate. The function of equilibrium, fulfilled by kutara and mari, 
would thus be no less assured within a system whose structure and terminology 
would simply be different. Conversely, if supplementary columns were 
indefinitely added, a definite function would appear in the system for each 
new ; kinship relationship thus created . 2 To justify the addition of supple- 
mentary classes, Warner reasons, as we have seen, as if the Murngin system 
could function with only three lines, and as it is clear that, in this case, the 
system would terminate abruptly on both sides, he suggests a hypothesis 
which is neither necessary nor adequate. It is not necessary, since theoreti- 
cally, and allowing for the existence of the moieties, the functioning of the 
system depends not on three lines but on four. On the other hand, the 
psychological hypothesis is not adequate, since although it is propounded 
in order to avoid leaving the system w'ith its ends hanging in the air, it 
assures nothing of the kind. Whom does natchiwalker marry, and w'ho 
marries dumungur ? The information given by Warner on this point is 
obscure: 

This asymmetrical cross-cousin marriage causes a male relative in the 
third patrilineal line to the left of Ego and a female relative in the third 
patrilineal column to the right of Ego to go unmated (in the kinship 
system) or a never-ending addition to this system to bring about a sym- 

1 Warner, 1931, p. 152. 

2 Leach, 1961a, p. 77, protested as early as 1951 against this criticism of Warner, asserting 
that Warner’s psycho-sociological interpretation was perfectly structural and that he 
himself accepted it. However, in order to perceive the artificial character of this kind of 
argument, one need only note that Warner, while constructing a model in equilibrium, 
wavers between five and seven lines, while Leach -who claims to adopt Warner's inter- 
pretation-uses only four (which, moreover, are not the same as those chosen by Warner). 
This confirms my thesis that ’functionalist’ reconstructions of this type are tautological; 
too many of them can be put forward for any one of them to be any good. 




The Murngin System 185 

metrical form, but as one line is added to each side of the system a new 
one is necessary, unless some device is created to throw this additional 
line back into the kinship. This has been done by the natives. Natchiwalker 
marries mart (not mari as mother’s mother); gawel marries a distant 
mokul and to the left of Ego dumungur marries another kutara , and waku 
another gurrong.' 1 

This passage can be interpreted in different ways. Either we are faced 
simply with an extension of the nomenclature, the terms concerned having 
little meaning except in differentiating between ‘affines’ on the one hand and 
‘affines of affines’ on the other, i.e., between lineages as they belong to one 
or other of the moieties; or the statement refers to the actual closing of the 
cycle of matrimonial exchanges. In this latter case, we would have to have 
demographic information - which we lack - on the empirical structure of 
the cycles of reciprocity among the Murngin in order to be able to make a 
correct interpretation of Warner’s information, which has been confirmed 
both by Elkin 2 and by Berndt. 3 The theoretically circular model which is 
presupposed by the rule of marriage with the matrilateral cousin can in 
practice be either broken down into several cycles or lengthened indefinitely. 
We shall return to this later. Because we do not have more precise information 
on the empirical modalities of the marriage cycles, we shall be reduced to 
constructing hypotheses about the empirical structure of the system, and it 
is with this reservation that the following observations are presented. 

It has been seen that the Murngin kinship system has seven lines, while the 
Aranda system has only four (the father’s father’s, which is Ego’s line; the 
mother's father’s; the father's mother's brother's; and the mother’s mother’s 
brother’s) and the Kariera system has only two (the father’s father’s, which 
is Ego's line; and the mother's father's). These proportions are similarly 
reflected in the number of kinship terms used in each of the systems. While 
the Kariera system employs twenty-one different kinship terms, the Aranda 
employs forty-one, and the Murngin system seventy-one. How is it that the 
Murngin system, which brings about an intermediate dichotomy between 
that of the Kariera and the Aranda systems, requires almost double the 
number of kinship terms as that of the more complex system? 

This difficulty is exactly analogous to that met with when comparing 
different class systems. We stated then that the Aranda system seemed to 
result from the doubling of the Kariera system, but that nevertheless a 
necessary stage in the progressive dichotomy of spouses was skipped in 
passing from one to the other. At this point, we see that there is also a rela- 
tionship between the degree of dichotomy realized and the number of kinship 
terms used : the Aranda system, which divides the dichotomy of spouses as 
used by the Kariera into two, also has twice as many terms as the latter. 
Logically, then, the Murngin system, the dichotomy of which is intermediate 



1 Warner, 1931, pp. 210-11. 



2 Elkin, 1953. 



3 Berndt, 1955. 




1 86 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

between the two, should also have an intermediate number of kinship terms. 
In fact, it has seventy-one of them, which is a much larger number than 
theoretical analysis would have predicted. This difficulty is insoluble, as long 
as the Murngin system is seen as a form of the Aranda system, unless we rely 
upon psychological arguments such as Warner’s, which depend upon 
considerations which are foreign to the structure of the system. By contrast, 
the problem becomes clear once we discern behind the explicit system 
(double system of restricted exchange with eight classes) what has been 
referred to above as the implicit system (system of generalized exchange 
with four classes) which is the law of the Murngin system. Let us then 
reproduce the structure of the kinship system by replacing the kinship terms 
by the classes into which each kinsman would fall in a system of generalized 
exchange (Fig. 30). 




= p P = q Q = r R = s S = p P = q Q = r R = 

(Dj/A 2 ) (C 2 /B 2 ) (D a /At) (Q/B,) (DJAj) (C 2 /B 2 ) (D 2 /A 2 ) 

Fig. 30. Murngin system in terms of generalized exchange. 



To facilitate comparison with Fig. 23, showing the distribution of classes 
by the alternate use of the regular and the alternate systems of eight sub- 
sections, Fig. 30 reproduces, at the bottom of each line, the patrilineal 
couple which characterizes it in the preceding figure. It may be seen that 
there is complete coincidence between both forms, as the following list of 
equivalences between the patrilineal couples in both shows: 



Generalized exchange 


Restricted exchange 
(Alternate usage of two 


(Four classes) 


systems with eight classes) 


PR corresponds to 


Di~A 2 


QS 


c 2 -b 2 


RP 


D 2 -Aj 


SQ 


Cj-Bj 



This system of equivalences makes possible a decisive step in the argument. 




The Murngin System \ 87 

It does not merely show that the system of generalized exchange coincides 
in all respects with the system of restricted exchange of which it provides the 
simplest and most intelligible expression, but it also provides the reason for, 
and the means by which, the change from one to the other is effected. 




Fig. 31. Descent and residence in generalized exchange. 



Two identical but inverse couples in the system of generalized exchange 
always correspond to two different couples in the system of restricted 
exchange. Thus, PR — D x -A 2 , and RP — D 2 -A lf and on the other hand, 
QS = C 2 -B 2 , but SQ — C 1 ~B l . This may be expressed as follows: an 
inversion of the terms of a couple of sections, in a generalized system, 
corresponds to an alternation of the subsections of one and the same couple, 
without the inversion of the sections, in a restricted system. Indeed, if the 
subsections were ignored, we would have PR or RP = DA, and QS or SQ = 
CB. 

If, instead of establishing the equivalence between couples, we try to 
establish it between terms comprising the couples, it will then be seen that 
to each term of the generalized system there always correspond two terms 
of the restricted system : 

P corresponds to Dj, A, 

Q it » C 2 , B, 

R »> 11 A 2 , ^2 

s ,, ,, b 2 , c 1 



since the change in position of a term in one system corresponds to a change 
of term, without a change in position, in the other. This means that the 
subsections of the restricted systems are simply the result of the doubling of 
the original sections of the generalized system. Why is there this doubling? 

When a formal analysis of the four-class system of generalized exchange 
was made, it was noted that this system functioned as if the group were 
divided into two patrilineal moieties, without a matrilineal dichotomy. 



Let us now suppose that this group proposes to add a division into matri- 
lineal moieties (explicit or implicit) to the existing division (explicit or 
implicit) into patrilineal moieties. This change will, firstly, be necessarily 
expressed by the splitting of each section into two subsections relating to 
one or other of the matrilineal moieties, which we shall call x and y. Instead 
of four sections, P, Q, R, S, there will then be eight subsections, P „ P y , 



Qx> Qy > K> Ry, S x , and S y . 




1 88 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

Let us now suppose that the correspondence between one section of the 
generalized system and two subsections of the restricted system is explained 
by this splitting of the sections under the influence of the new matrilineal 
dichotomy. We shall then have the following system of equivalences: 

Patrilineal moietv I 

*> 

P x = Ai P, , = Dj R, = A 2 R v = D, 

Patrilineal moiety II 

Qx = C 2 Q y = B 1 S x = C, S y = B 2 

and the form of marriage and descent, in the system of generalized exchange, 
will be established, as in Fig. 31, the conventions being the same as in Figs. 
24 and 25. This can be expressed equally well in the type of diagram used 
for the Murngin system, by placing each subsection .y or y of the generalized 
system of exchange in the place of the corresponding subsection of the 
system of restricted exchange (Fig. 32). 



/ 




Patrilineal ^ 
Moiety II ^ ^ 



/ 



* # ~*" :, ineal 

Moiety 

X 



Patrilineal 
Moiety I 



Matri 

Moiel 

y 



Fig. 32. Definitive diagram of the Murngin system. 



By applying the double law of the exogamy of both the patrilineal and the 
matrilineal moieties, we thus have: 



and 




man marries a Q y woman, the children are R y 

S P 

9 9 9 9 9 9 99 99 99 99 f y 



99 

99 



99 

99 



P 

99 A y 

M R. 



99 


99 


99 


99 



99 

99 





1 89 



The Murngin System 



P v man marries a Q x woman, the children are R 



Q 






•> i 



„ R 



i •> 



n 






t ^ 








1 1 


11 


11 


11 



** ■> 



i * 










x 




a formula which establishes the ultimate identity of the system of generalized 
exchange, split by the introduction of the matrilineal dichotomy, and the 
cight-subsection Murngin system as it has been described above. This 
identity is now perfectly clear. At the same time wc discover the reason for 
the juxtaposition of the two systems which have been called respectively 
regular and alternate, and also the verification of the law, which was proposed 
as a working hypothesis, that preferential marriage with the mother’s brother’s 
daughter entails the alternate use of these two systems. The principle of 
generalized exchange bequeaths an inheritance to the new system, in that 
the latter continues to be a directional system in which the directions are 
irreversible. The pairs are not formed in the same way, but vary according to 
the angle from which they are viewed, viz., when read from .v to y the pairs 
conform to the regular system, when read from v to * they conform to the 
alternate system. That is to say, as we have postulated, that one out of every 
two marriages conforms to one of the systems, while the other marriage 
conforms to the other system. Instead of the real symmetry of the Kariera 
and Aranda systems, there is a pseudo-symmetry which may be reduced, 
in fact, to two superimposed asymmetrical structures. 



It is in this structure, which is not simple but double, that the reason for the 
difficulty mentioned at the beginning of the chapter must be sought. We have 
remarked upon the enormous extension of the Murngin kinship system, 
coinciding with almost twice the number of kinship terms found in the most 
complex systems of the Aranda type. These peculiarities are explained if it 
is accepted that the Murngin system was originally an asymmetrical structure, 
and that it later reproduced, as it were, twin structures, in order to satisfy 
a law of symmetry. This point will perhaps be clearer if the following image 
is used, though it has, of course, no more than metaphorical value. A four- 
class system of generalized exchange may be considered as a three-dimensional 
geometrical structure. For the cycle is completed by moving from P to Q , 
Q to R, R to S, and finally back to P in the opposite direction from that in 
which it started. In short, exactly as one might travel from Paris to Moscow, 
from Moscow to Shanghai, from Shanghai to New York, and finally from 
New York back to Paris. In contrast, a system of restricted exchange may 
be represented geometrically in only two dimensions. Whatever the number 
of classes, there are never more than two points, directly linked by a fixed 
route which may be covered in both directions. 




190 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

When the addition of matrilineal moieties changes the original generalized 
system to give it at least the appearance of a system of restricted exchange, 
a problem of representation, well known to geographers, is posed. How is 
the external aspect of a three-dimensional body to be represented on one 
plane? To cope with this, cartographers have at their disposal different 
methods of projection, none of which, however, provides a perfectly satis- 
factory solution. Thus, instead of showing only a half the earth’s surface, two 
hemispheres are placed side by side in contact, one representing the eastern 
world, the other, the western. The most western part of one hemisphere, and 
the most eastern part of the other, which meet in reality, are shown as being 
farthest away from each other. 

To meet this difficulty, an additional artifice is introduced. In order that 
the continuity between the extreme right and the extreme left of the map 
shall be perfectly clear, part of the territories represented on the left is 
repeated on the right, and vice versa. The countries in the middle of the map 
are thus represented only once, but those on the edges twice, once ‘really’, 
and once ‘as a reminder’. We believe that an analogous artifice explains the 
peculiar development of the Murngin kinship system. Not that the aborigines 
effected this duplication consciously and voluntarily: the resulting compli- 
cation is too great and too useless for this assumption to be accepted. Rather, 
the doubling is explained by the logical difficulty that was found, after the 
introduction of matrilineal moieties, in conceiving the system simultaneously 
as a kind of both restricted exchange and of generalized exchange. Everything 
suggests that the mind of the native had vainly sought to represent one and 
the same structure simultaneously in three dimensions and on one plane, 
and to see it under the dual aspect of continuity and alternation. What then 
is the end result? 

Let us represent the sections of a system of generalized exchange on the 
equator of a sphere (Fig. 33 ). 




Starting from R, it is obviously possible to get to S by two different 
directions. But these directions are not equivalent for Ego. For by following 
the route S-P-Q-R, he proceeds, as it were, in the direction of rotation of 
the system. He always faces in the direction which he had to take in seeking 
a wife. By contrast, in following the route Q-P-S-R, Ego proceeds in the 
wrong direction ; he must turn about, and face in the direction in which not 
he but his sister is directed to find a spouse. In attempting to represent this 




The M unigin System 191 

directional structure on one plane, aboriginal thought has thus naturally 
doubled, to the right and left of Ego, these two routes which have such differ- 
ent meanings. Starting from Ego’s section, R, it swings the curve S-P-Q 
back to the right, the direction prescribed by the system, and the curve 
Q-P-S to the left in the prohibited direction. Ego’s patrilineal cycle (C 1 -B l 
for an Ego of section R), is therefore represented only once, while the three 
other cycles are each represented twice, once to the right and once to the 
left. There are then, on the right, the successive lines D x -A 2 , C 2 -B 2 , and 
D 2 -A j, and on the left, identical lines succeeding each other in inverse 
order, or, as it were, backwards, i.e., D 2 -A x , C 2 ~B 2 , and D x -A 2 . The 
structure in space has been projected on to the plane, so that the point in 
space occupied by Ego’s section corresponds to one and one point only on 
the plane, while each of the remaining three points of the structure in space, 
representing the three remaining sections, corresponds to two symmetrical 
and opposed points on the plane projection. 




Fig. 34. Plane projection of a cyclical system. 



The three central groups, D 2 -A ,, C x -B x and D x -A 2 , are not affected by 
the change, and form the common and immutable base of the generalized 
system, and of its transposition under a restricted form. The group C 2 -B 2 
which in the generalized system had the function of completing the cycle 
by furnishing wives for D x -A 2 , and husbands for D 2 -A x , is doubled in two 
groups C 2 -B 2 , flanking, on the right and on the left, the stable set composed 
by the three central groups. Finally, on the other side of C 2 -B 2y each of the 
stable groups D 2 ~A X and D x -A 2 is reflected, one to the extreme right, the 
other to the extreme left of the system. On the basis of their function in the 
system, the three central groups are thus the ‘real’ groups, and the same is 
true of one of the two groups C 2 -B 2 , either one being equally able to play 
this r61e according to the point from which the system is viewed. But the 
two extreme groups, which reproduce in a symmetrical but inverse position 
the two terminal groups of the central triad, are unable to be anything other 
than echoes or reflections. Therefore, all the kinship terms which are applied 
to them are the literal repetitions, or diminutives, of kinship terms belonging 
to the homologous line. Ego, looking left, sees in succession D 2 ~A X (real) 



192 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

and D x -A 2 (reflection), but he does not see D x -A 2 (real), which is to the 
right. Likewise, in looking right, he sees D x -A 2 (real) and through it D 2 -A x 
(reflection), but he does not see D 2 -A x (real), which is to the left. Thus the 
terminology of D x -A 2 (reflection) repeats that of D 2 ~A X (real), which is 
the same as regards the sections, if not the subsections. And the terminology 
of D 2 -A x (reflection) repeats that of D x -A 2 (real), which stands in the same 
relationship. 

We have already said that the theory of the Murngin system will not be 
brought to a conclusion until there is precise information on the way in 
which the marriage cycles are closed. But we can see even now that the 
Murngin kinship system is to all appearances a system with four patrilineal 
couples in which, in order to resolve a problem of representation, three of the 
couples have had to be reproduced twice. Only Ego’s couple remains 
undivided, and the reason for this is clear, viz., that Ego is unable to see 
himself, and his own line, simultaneously as subject and as object. 

On the basis of the phrase, ‘the way in which the marriage cycles are 
closed’, Leach has accused me - and Berndt and Goody in his wake - 
firstly, of confusing, as did Lawrence and Murdock, ‘local lines’ and ‘descent 
lines’, and secondly, of mistakenly postulating the circularity of the Murngin 
system. 

With regard to the first point, it is sufficient to consider Fig. 34 and the 
comments thereon to see that, far from having ignored the difference between 
‘local lines’ and ‘descent lines’, I was not only the first to formulate it, 
although in different terms, but also the first to reduce the number of ‘real’ 
groups (in my terminology) to 3 + 1 = 4, a result which Leach has done 
no more than borrow from me, while at the same time gratuitously imputing 
to me a conception of a different kind. 

However, Leach has not been aware of the fact that the particular for- 
mulation which he adopts would have to be just the opposite to be correct: 
‘local lines’ are fixed in number but the number is unquestionably high. It 
is the ‘descent lines’ and not the ‘local lines’ which number four, i.e., three 
which every individual applies unequivocally to concrete ‘local lines', and 
one, which he can choose to apply to a fourth, which may be either to his 
extreme right or to his extreme left. All the other ‘descent lines’ are termino- 
logical reduplications of the preceding ‘descent lines’, and Ego projects them, 
as it were, on to ‘local lines’ which are even more indirectly allied to his, so 
as to be able to give them a name. 

Consequently, it is false to follow Leach and to say that the Murngin 
system comprises seven ‘descent lines’ and four ‘local lines’. In point of fact, 
Murngin society, observed at any one time, has a finite (but high) number of 
‘local lines’, the actual number of which is unknown to us. To define his 
kinship relationships. Ego has at his disposal four ‘descent lines’, three of 
which are fixed and one not, enabling him to place himself in relation to 
four ‘local lines’: his own, the line of those who give him wives, and that of 




The Murngin System 193 

those who take wives from him; plus one, which is at his own discretion, 
either that of the wife-givers of his wife-givers, or that of the wife-receivers 
of his wife-receivers. As it seems that the cycles of exchange involve more 
than four local groups. Ego has been led to coin supplementary terms 
(though derived from pre-existing terms) to designate possible ‘local lines’, 
sometimes wife-giving lines or wife-givers of his own wife-givers, sometimes 
wife-taking lines or wife-takers of his own wife-takers. Finally, if the cycles 
extend even further he can always repeat the same process ad lib. or, if they 
are less extensive, he can always drop certain remote names in favour of 
closer ones; on the sole condition, however, that the cycle shall be effectively 
closed, i.e., that it comprise an even number of ‘local lines’ > 4 (because of 
the existence of the patrilineal moieties). 

Elkin and Radcliffe-Brown have argued about cycles > 10 (i.e., never 
closed), while Lawrence and Murdock have elaborated a special termino- 
logical solution to a cycle = 8, but, paradoxically, by misinterpreting an 
observation by Webb in reporting (as Elkin suspected) a cycle =• 6. All these 
arrangements are possible at the price of a statistical fluctuation in the 
relationship between regular marriages and alternate marriages, a fluctuation 
which would not jeopardize the equilibrium of the system provided that 
somewhere there were an equal and opposite statistical fluctuation. 

This much said, the distinction between ‘local lines’ and ‘descent lines’ is 
still over-simplified. In point of fact, three things must be distinguished: the 
obligatory ‘descent lines’, which number 3 + (l); the optional ‘descent lines’, 
which number 4 — (1); and the ‘local lines’, the number of which is unknown 
to us, since it varies according to the time and place, but which could not 
be less than four, and (because of the range of the terminological system) 
must as a general rule be much higher. 

The second criticism brought against me - that I mistakenly postulated 
the circularity of the system - derives from a misunderstanding between 
what is meant by model and what is meant by empirical reality. The model of 
a generalized system necessarily implies a certain circularity although this 
may be simple or complex, and may assume various forms. But the empirical 
reality is far more flexible. Of all the empirically observable cycles of alliances, 
a certain proportion will be found to be circular, either short term (three are 
absolutely necessary, at least four among the Murngin because of the division 
into moieties) or long term ; and others, which never ‘join up’ because they 
are ‘lost’. All that is needed for the model to remain valid, broadly speaking, 
is for the number ‘lost’ in one direction to be approximately equal to the 
number ‘lost’ in the other direction, so that negatively as well as positively 
the losses balance out. As Leach has acknowledged, I have fully explained, 
with regard to the Kachin, the flexible conception of empirical circularity 
which must be held. The latter must always be distinguished from the theore- 
tically strict circularity of the model, be it the native’s or the ethnologist’s. 
When (following Warner, moreover) I raise the question of the circularity of 




194 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

the Murngin system, I do not think of it as an empirical circularity, but as 
an objective model of circularity by means of which the natives conceptualize 
their system. The anomaly in the Murngin system which, like Murdock and 
Lawrence, I bring to light from this viewpoint is that the model of circularity 
appears clearly in the class system, but not in the terminological system ; an 
anomaly which, as I have demonstrated, disappears on the assumption that 
there is an alternation between regular marriage and alternate marriage; 

Accordingly, 1 not only anticipated Leach by distinguishing the ‘descent 
lines’ from the ‘local lines', and by showing that one of these categories 
should not exceed four terms; but 1 likewise anticipated the solution to the 
subsequent controversy, between Leach and Berndt, over the exact number 
of lines (four according to one, three according to the other), by showing 
that four lines can be analysed into three fixed and one not, only three 
having an objective existence, and the choice of the fourth being a function 
of Ego’s particular outlook. 

To claim, as Leach does, that a system of matrilateral marriage is not 
necessarily circular, at least in theory, is the same as asserting that a cyclist 
who kept the handle-bars of his bicycle turned in the same direction would 
not go round in a circle. Admittedly, he might never return exactly to his 
starting-point, but it can be taken as statistically probable that, if several 
cyclists complete a large enough number of revolutions in the one direction, 
they will inevitably cross over the starting-point of one of them, and a great 
number of times at that. For a matrilateral system to be totally devoid of 
circularity, the number of ‘local lines’ would have to be infinite. The fewer 
they are, the greater will be the chance of an approximate circularity being 
manifested. As a matter of fact, the circularity of asymmetrical systems does 
not result from a preordained ordering of the ‘local groups’, but from the 
fact that, in whatever way they establish relationships among themselves, the 
genealogical space in which they move is ‘curved’. 

Consequently, even if we agree on the distinction between the ‘local lines’ 
and the ‘descent lines’, it remains a fact that a definitive interpretation of the 
Murngin system still eludes us because our ignorance of, firstly, the number 
of ‘local lines’ at any one time, and, secondly, the extent of the networks of 
alliances uniting them (short or long? closed or not?). If all these possibilities 
were to be realized, how frequent and in what proportion would they be? 

Only if these questions were answered could there be any glimpse of the 
solution to a problem which Murdock and Lawrence on the one hand, and 
Berndt and Leach on the other, have too casually believed they could tackle 
in opposite ways, viz., one party by affirming the equivalence of ‘descent 
lines’ and ‘local lines’, the other by entirely rejecting this idea. 

The truth seems to be that, although the lines are theoretically distinct, one 
set being on the conceptual plane, the others on the demographic plane, they 
must in practice be capable, to a certain point, of being adjusted to each other. 
As I emphasized in the first edition of this book, we do not know exactly 




The Murngin System 195 

how the Murngin set about this. The structure of the system is such that 
there are ‘local lines’, and these ‘local lines’ can be organized into cycles 
of alliance. Therefore, empirically, we must encounter cycles of various 
lengths, but never odd in number (owing to the division into patrilineal 
moieties). If these cycles = 7+1, 7 + 3, 7 + 5, etc., the nomenclature applic- 
able to them is that which was observed by Warner and Elkin; and it is clear 
that Webb’s claim to the contrary, which has been disputed but which is 
nevertheless perfectly plausible, deals with a particular case in which the 
cycle of ‘local lines’ = 7 — 1 . 

In the final analysis, the Murngin paradox is reduced to the fact, of which 
pages 1 89-92 have already provided the explanation, that an odd-numbered 
conceptual system (‘descent lines’) is used to describe an even-numbered 
actual system (‘local lines’); the adjustment can be carried out either by 
reduplicating (Elkin, Radcliffe-Brown), or by eliminating (Webb), certain 
conceptual series. But there is no theoretical reason why either procedure 
should be used exclusively, for it would be equally incorrect to assert, as the 
observers have implicitly done, but in a mutually contradictory manner, 
either that the ‘local lines’ are never cyclical, or that they are always cyclical 
with the same periodicity. Without ever having visited the Murngin, one can 
assert that the truth is to be found half-way between these two postulates, 
something which no observer seems to have suspected that he could easily 
verify empirically by means of what might be called ‘lateral’ genealogies, i.e., 
by establishing a certain number of concrete examples of networks of alliance 
between ‘local groups’. In the preface to the second edition of A Black 
Civilization , Warner criticizes me - obviously without having read my work, 
since the rather casual argument he puts forward by-passes the problems 
on which I have centred my discussion - for not basing my analysis on the 
study of genealogies. I might reply: Very well, but whose fault is that? It is 
clear that his admirable book consists entirely of abstract models of the 
empirical reality, but that concrete data (genealogical and demographic) 
are most woefully lacking. I do not doubt that Warner might have used 
them to construct his models; but since by not publishing his data he has 
studiously refrained from giving us the opportunity to draw deductions other 
than his own, he is not in a very strong position to criticize me for not 
having used them. 

My interpretation is directly confirmed by McConnel’s observations among 
the tribes of Cape York Peninsula, which have matrilateral marriage, like 
the Murngin, but recognize, according to the groups, only five or six lines. 
Nevertheless, the terminology of the system extends to seven lines, as in the 
Murngin system, and the author indicates that the seventh line to the left 
is only the reflection of the first to the right. 1 Thus the real cycle is shorter 
than it appears from a superficial examination of the terminology. In fact, 
in the table of the Wikmunkan system, the third line to the right of Ego’s, 

1 McConnel, 1940, p. 445. 




196 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

and the third line to the left, doubles Ego’s line, if certain terminological 
differences in Ego’s generation and in the two immediately consecutive 
generations in ascending and descending order are excepted. These differences 
can be explained by the fact that, as we shall see in the following chapter, 
each line is subdivided into two branches, older and younger respectively, 
and that the third line to the left is represented by an elder branch, and the 
third to the right by a younger branch. The probability, therefore, is that the 
Wikmunkan system is in fact a system with three lines, as the Murngin 
system is a system with four. 

The reason for the abnormal extension of the system and of the considerable 
number of kinship terms can be seen. The extension, which in itself is 
incomprehensible, of the system so as to include seven lines is explained 
when we conceive of it as a system with four lines prolonged by its own 
reflection. If we consider the kinship terms, we can understand that each 
line, extending over five generations and requiring one term for the masculine 
group and one for the feminine group in each generation, needs ten terms. 
If we then add a supplementary term to Ego’s line, because Ego may be a 
man or a woman, we have forty-one kinship terms for the four basic lines, 
i.e., the same number as in an Aranda-type system. But as each line is 
produced twice, except Ego’s line with its eleven terms, we easily arrive at 
the figure of seventy-one, which no longer appears mysterious. 




CHAPTER XIII 



Harmonic and Disharmonic Regimes 

i 

If our analysis is correct, the problem of peripheral systems which are without 
classes or have an aberrant number of classes needs to be seen in a new light. 
A typology based exclusively on the Kariera and Aranda systems would 
prove inadequate in the north and south of Australia, where there are systems 
with not two, four, or eight lines but an odd number, e.g., three in the south, 
and three, five, six (considered as a multiple of three), and seven in the north. 
Furthermore, these systems practise the dichotomy of cross-cousins into 
patrilateral and matrilateral, although this seemed impossible in the previous 
systems. 

The Karadjeri of Lagrange Bay in north-western Australia recognize 
only three lines, those of the father’s father, the mother’s father (identified 
with the father’s mother’s brother) and the mother’s mother's brother. As 
marriage is prohibited with the father's sister's daughter but sanctioned 
with the mother’s brother's daughter, there .is a structure of the following 
type (Fig. 35). 



(MF, 

(FF) FMB) (MMB) 



o 




A 




o 


r 


A = 

1 

"""" 


i 

= o 


A 


J 


r 




“1 




r“ 






\ 


»m™-^ 




o 




A 


ss 


O 




A = 


= O 


A 


= 



















_i 




1 








r 










r 




1 ,mm \ 








1 


i 






o 




A 




o 




A = 


= O 


A 





Fig. 35. The Karadjeri System. 

The characteristic feature of the system as Elkin sees it lies in the prohi- 
bition of the exchange of sisters. 1 It is undoubtedly prohibited according 
to the formula in force among Kariera or Aranda type systems. It remains 
to be seen whether it is not the very notion of exchange, as it may be elabora- 
ted on the basis of these systems, which should be changed in order that new 
modalities may be integrated into it. 

‘Elkin, 19406; 19316, pp. 299-312. 

197 




198 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

Another tripartite system most likely of the same type is known among 
the Tiwi of Bathurst and Melville Islands, to the north-east of Port Darwin. 
The Tiwi are divided into twenty-two matrilineal totemic clans, which are 
grouped into three unnamed exogamous phratries. 1 Their system is probably 
not unrelated to that of the Larakia and Wulna, which is similar to but 
simpler than the Murngin system. There are neither moieties nor sections 
and the system recognizes only five lines (as among the Yir-yoront), joined 
according to the formula of generalized exchange (marriage with the mother's 
brother’s daughter). 2 

The Mara system deserves particular attention, not only because of its 
coastal and northern distribution, which makes the Mara and the Anula 
neighbours or almost neighbours of the Murngin, but also because of its 
peculiar characteristics. At the bottom of the Gulf of Carpentaria and at the 
mouth of the Roper River there is a group of tribes with a kinship terminology 
of the Aranda type, but with only four named divisions instead of eight 
subsections. Furthermore, the son remains in his father's division, and this 
gives the four divisions the appearance of patrilineal lines grouped by pairs 
into two moieties. 3 

The marriage rules state that a man cannot marry into his own division, 
or into the alternate division of his moiety, or into his mother’s division. 
Thus, the only marriage possible is with a woman of his mother’s moiety, 
and of the alternate division of this moiety. If we call the four divisions P, 
Q (moiety I) and R, S (moiety II), a P man can marry only an R woman 
if his mother is S, and an S woman if his mother is R. Consequently, the 
wives of the men of one patrilineal line P will be R and S alternately. 

Radcliffe-Brown and, following him, Warner have tried to bring the social 
structure and the kinship terminology into harmony. They use the alternation 
of classes in the mother’s series as the ground for recognizing two unnamed 
divisions in each named division, allegiance to one or the other leading to 
different matrimonial destinies. In other words, the division P conceals an 
unformulated subdivision into Pa and Pd which shows its hand, however, 
in the fact that a man of Pa marries an R woman, and a man of Pd an S 
woman. 

There would thus be, not four sections, but eight subsections, viz.. 



Murungun 


a . . . 1 


}> (P) 


Purdal b . 


Murungun 


d . . . J 


Purdal c . 


Mumbali 


a . . . 1 


[ (Q) 


Kuial b . 


Mumbali 


d . . . I 


Kuial c . 




(R) 

(S) 



1 Hart, 1930a, pp. 167-80; 19306, pp. 280-90. 

2 Warner, 1933, pp. 73^1 and table VII. 

3 Radcliffe-Brown, 1931, p. 41; Warner, 1933, pp. 78-9. 




Harmonic and Disharmonic Regimes 199 

The marriage system would thus be identical with that of an Aranda 
system (Fig. 36). Radcliffe-Brown concludes: ‘It can be shown that in this 
way each of the four semi-moieties consists of two groups which are exactly 
equivalent to the subsections of other tribes.’ 1 

We were faced with a similar problem with the Murngin system but we 
had to resort to another solution. We felt that this system, with its eight 
named or unnamed subsections, should be interpreted as resulting from an 




Fig. 36. The Mara System (after Warner, 1933, p. 79). 

attempt to adapt a four-class system of a different type to the Aranda 
formulas. The presence of the Mara system in a neighbouring region makes 
this hypothesis seem very likely. Furthermore, the question must be asked 
whether the Mara system itself should not be interpreted in this way, i.e., 
as a system effectively with four classes and a borrowed Aranda-type 
terminology. An argument immediately presents itself in support of this 
interpretation. If the Mara system differed from an Aranda system only in 
that the subsections were unnamed, the rules of marriage would be strictly 
identical in both. But this is not so. Sharp has established that there is an 
alternative marriage formula in the Mara-type systems studied by him in 
north-western Queensland: ‘The marriage rule is of the normal Aranda 
type by which a man and his sister marry the daughter and son of a mother’s 
mother’s brother’s daughter. Exceptionally, however, they may marry the 
daughter and son of a mother’s brother.’ 2 This being so, one may well ask 
oneself if the two systems are not structurally different. 

There is a system in another part of the world which is similar to the Mara 
system, but independent of any Aranda system. This is the Munda system 
of northern India. 3 This system distinguishes two patrilocal groups, each 
divided into two marriage classes. If we call the two divisions of one group 
P and /?, and the two divisions of the other group, Q and 5, the following 
rule of marriage is established: if one generation practises marriages of the 
type P = Q or R = S, marriage in the following generation should be 
according to the formulas P = S and R = Q. Yet we must add that while 
the marriage rule P — Q is in force, R can take advantage of an alternative 
marriage with either Q or S, and vice versa. Sharp has noted a similar 

1 Radcliffe-Brown, 1931, p. 41. ' Sharp, 1935, p. 158. 

3 cf. ch. XXVI. 




200 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

development among the Laierdila of the islands and coast of Queensland. 
Their system is of the Mara type but has two additional marriage possibilities, 
one with the mother’s brother's son's daughter, and the other with the 
father’s father’s sister's daughter . 1 

‘It is thus possible for an A, man to marry a woman of any of the sub- 
sections Bj, B 2 , Ci or C 2 , or any woman of the moiety opposite to his own ’, 2 
the subsections no longer determining where the children belong by reference 
to the mother’s subsection. It seems that the situation is the same among the 
Munda, since the type of marriage prescribed for one generation determines 
the type prescribed for the following generation, however the father happens 
in fact to have married. 

When we come to analyse the Munda system, we shall show that the only 
way to interpret it satisfactorily is to treat it as a four-class system prescribing 
marriage with the father’s sister’s daughter. Furthermore, we shall see what 
the basic relationship is between patrilateral and matrilateral marriage. 
Consequently, the question arises seriously whether the Mara system, like 
the Murngin system which we saw as a four-class system with matrilateral 
marriage, expressed by a complex set of formulas in terms of the Aranda 
system, should not similarly be considered as a four-class system with 
patrilateral marriage, also expressed in terms of an Aranda-type system. 
In fact, as we have seen, the alternative form of Mara marriage still preserves 
this type of marriage. 

Moreover, in the Cape York Peninsula of Queensland both forms of 
marriage, matrilateral and patrilateral, exist side by side. It is particularly 
significant that the Wikmunkan, who are matrilateral, nevertheless sanction 
marriage with the father's sister's daughter as with the mother’s brother’s 
daughter, and strictly prohibit it only with the bilateral cross-cousin. Their 
eastern neighbours, the Kandyu, practise patrilateral marriage exclusively . 3 

Thus, the principal difference between the Mara system and the Murngin 
system seems to be that the latter has openly adopted eight classes in order 
to preserve its specific orientation, while the Mara system, because it has 
kept to its primitive structure, has had to allow its patrilateral orientation 
to be submerged in the apparently bilateral form of its alternate marriage, 
which is of the Kariera type: the father’s sister’s daughter is also the mother’s 
brother’s daughter, as is brought out clearly in chart II of Sharp’s article . 4 

It is true that Sharp has shown that the Laierdila effectively distinguish 
their semi-moieties, if not in the regulation of marriage, then at least in their 
particular totemic system. Moreover, Elkin has made similar observations: 
‘We do know, however, that sections and subsections and moieties are 
frequently totemic in nature, and that in some regions at least, they have 

1 Sharp, 1935, p. 161. 2 ibid. p. 162. 

3 McConnel, 1940, p. 437. On her interpretation of these differences, and our criticism, 
cf. ch. XXVII. Since this book was written it no longer seems so certain that patrilateral 
marriage exists among the Kandyu. 

4 Sharp, 1935, p. 171. 




201 



Harmonic and Disharmonic Regimes 

spread or are spreading as a system of totemism .’ 1 But only the four groups, 
P, Q, R, S, are objectively named among the Laierdila. From the fact that 
the subsection couples are regarded as units, it in no way follows that this 
unity should be seen as the unity of a couple. At all events, there is nothing 
in Sharp’s analysis to justify such a conclusion. Nevertheless, it is to be 
expected that the notion of subsection will be formulated in coincidence 
with the degree of success with which the system is converted to the Aranda 
formula. The important point lies elsewhere. Until more information is 
available, the Mara system should not be regarded as an Aranda system 
which has lost some of its superficial characteristics, but as an original and 
heterogeneous system upon which Aranda features are gradually being 
imposed. 



Do the aberrant groups of southern Australia confirm, in the same respects 
as do those of the north, this view of the matter? 

The Arabana recognize three lines, those of the father’s father (classified 
with the mother’s mother's brother), the father's mother’s brother, and the 
mother’s father. The fact that the father’s father is classified with the mother's 
mother’s brother, while the father’s mother’s brother is distinguished from 
the mother’s mother’s husband, would suggest an original system of marriage 
with the father’s sister’s daughter . 2 The natives energetically deny, contrary 
to what Spencer and Gillen have indicated , 3 that any form of marriage 
between cross-cousins has been practised. And yet children’s spouses con- 
tinue to be identified with the sister’s children, a typical equation in a system 
based on cross-cousin marriage. To complicate the situation, Spencer and 
Gillen noted a terminological identification, viz., father’s sister = father’s 
mother, which Elkin was unable to rediscover, although a usage of the same 
type still exists among the Yaralde and Ungarinyin . 4 The identification of 
relatives belonging to two or more consecutive generations is, as we shall 
see, characteristic of systems based upon marriage with the mother’s brother’s 
daughter, and the Arabana terminology even today maintains certain asym- 
metries which are in accord with such a system ; thus, although the father’s 
father is identified with the mother’s mother’s brother as kadnini , their 
respective lines are called by different terms, and the same happens with the 
mother’s mother and the father’s father’s sister. Although the terminology 
recognizes only three lines, the rules of marriage and descent distinguish 
four. The fact that the present system is in a ‘broken-down condition’ and 

1 Elkin, 1940a, p. 24; 1937. 2 ibid. 19406, pp. 441-8. 

3 Spencer and Gillen, 1899, pp. 59-68. 

4 Needham (1960a, p. 285, n. 33) mistakenly disputes this assertion. I do not say ‘the same 

usage’ but ‘a usage of the same type’, namely the use of a consecutive terminology to 
designate women belonging to the same lineage and of two generation levels. In fact, it 
is not myself, but Elkin, who rightly compares the Arabana case cited with the terminology 
of the Yaralde and the Ungarinyin (Elkin, 19406, p. 438). 




202 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

‘in a stage of transition’ 1 prevents Spencer and Gillen’s information from 
being completely refuted. The identification of the father’s sister with the 
father’s mother suggests that the three lines were originally matrilineal, as 
the totemic clans are even now in the north-western part of South Australia. 
A structure featuring marriage with the father’s sister’s daughter and matri- 
lineal descent would be of the type shown in Fig. 37, in which the three 



(MF) (MMB) (FMB) 




Fig. 37. The Aluridja system. 

+ : Father’s father, mother’s mother’s brother. 



elementary lines are easily discoverable, and in which also the identification 
of the father’s father with the mother’s mother’s brother can be understood. 
Consequently, Elkin’s hypothesis that this original form of marriage was 
once allowed among the Arabana seems to be correct, even though this form 
of marriage is now prohibited. 

In regulating marriage the Aluridja use two reciprocal terms, lanannldjan 
and yanandaga. The first is used between members of the same generation. 
It is also used between an individual and the members of his grandfather’s 
generation on the one hand, and the members of his grandson’s generation 
on the other. The second is used reciprocally between members of two 
consecutive generations in ascending or descending order (i.e., between a 
man and his father, or between a man and his son). The alternate generations 
are grouped together in ‘lines’, and the marriage rule requires that both 
spouses shall belong to the same ‘line’. 2 A similar system exists among the 
Northern Aranda, 3 and another has been observed by Bateson in New 
Guinea. 4 They may all usefully be likened to the classification of alternate 
generations into yanandaga (grandfather; Ego; grandson) and tanamildjan 
(father; son) in western South Australia. Not only can a man marry only a 
yanandaga woman, but the alternation of generations forms the basis of 
ritual, and of reciprocal prestations. 

The southern Aluridja practise, at least occasionally, marriage with the 
father’s sister’s daughter. That it could once have been a general practice 
is suggested by the fact that under no circumstances is the identification of 
the mother’s brother with the wife’s father acceptable. Patrilateral marriage 
is also known among the Wailpi. 5 Elkin considers these consequences as 

1 ibid. 19406, pp. 446, 447. 2 ibid. pp. 213-24; 1940a, p. 23, n. 5. 

3 ibid, 19406, pp. 200-1. * Bateson, 1931, pp. 245-91. 9 Elkin, 19406, pp. 380-1. 




Harmonic and Disharmonic Regimes 




anomalies. And yet if we look at Fig. 37, which illustrates this form of mar- 
riage, we shall see that the Aluridja arrangement of ‘lines’ corresponds 
exactly to the structure of patrilateral marriage. In a system of marriage 
with the father’s sister’s daughter, that is, one generation in two marries 
in one direction, and one generation in two marries in the other. In other 
words, an individual can, without upsetting the system, take a wife from 
his own generation or from his grandfather’s generation or from his grandson’s 
generation, both of which relatives in these two latter generations make 
marriages of the same type as in his own. But he is absolutely forbidden to 
marry into the generations immediately before or after his own, which are 
destined to a different type of marriage. In other words, the Aluridja for- 
mula is structurally identical with the Mara formula, except that the structure 
of one is expressed in vertical terms (lines) and the structure of the other in 
horizontal terms (generations). Both can be and in actual fact are affected 
by other types of system; yet their specific character remains apparent. 
Furthermore, an important theoretical statement must be made. The system 
of alternate generations does not result exclusively, or necessarily, from 



bilateral descent. It is also an immediate function of patrilateral marriage, 
which is a simple structure of reciprocity. 1 This point will have to be remem- 
bered when we discuss the archaic Chinese system. As Elkin excellently 



remarks: ‘It is, of course, theoretically possible that the section-system was 
evolved ... as a means of preserving alternate generation-levels and pre- 
venting cross-cousin marriage, but these are both done quite efficiently 
where there are no such groupings.’ 2 We shall have to emphasize repeatedly 
that all the effects of the different forms of marriage class systems may occur 
when there are no such systems, by the appropriate determination of the 
underlying relationships: ‘Moieties and sections are not universal and 
inevitable developments from the kinship-system and associated 
marriage-rules.’ 3 

The system in the neighbourhood of Southern Cross in Western Australia 
should probably be interpreted in the same way. The group is divided into 
two endogamous moieties. A man marries within his moiety, but the children 
belong to the alternate moiety. As Radcliffe-Brown says, each division ‘is 
equivalent to one intermarrying pair of sections’ (Fig. 38). 4 



C angumat a = Birangumat 6*1 
Djuamat c = Djuamat <#•* 

Fig. 38. The Southern Cross system. 

But why does the system have this peculiar form ? This question can only 

be answered if the system is considered as originally a four-class system 

with patrilateral marriage, later converted to bilateralism. 

1 cf. ch. VIII and ch. XXVII. 2 Elkin, 1940c, p. 23. 

8 loc. cit 4 Radcliffe-Brown, 1931, p. 41, 




204 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



hi 

Of all the kinship systems known at the present time, that of the Dieri 
of South Australia is one of those which are the most difficult to interpret. 
Nevertheless, the differences between the information given by Howitt and 
that collected by Elkin thirty-two years later 1 are very slight. The system 
seems to be stationary, or at least to have completed its evolution. This 
makes it all the more difficult to reconstruct its evolutionary stages. 

The Dieri have two matrilineal moieties, and totemic clans which are also 
matrilineal. They apparently do not have sections or subsections. Yet, from 
the point of view of marriage rules, their system functions as an Aranda 
system, with the prohibition of marriage between cross-cousins, and pre- 
ferential marriage between the four types of second cousins descended from 
cross-cousins (mother’s mother’s brother’s daughter's daughter; mother’s 
father's sister's daughter’s daughter; father’s father’s sister’s son's daughter; 
father’s father’s brother’s son’s daughter). There are also reciprocal terms 
between members of the second ascending generation and the second 
descending generation (viz., father’s father = son’s son; mother’s father == 
daughter’s son; father’s mother = son’s daughter; mother’s mother = 
daughter’s daughter; respectively, yenku, kami , nadad, kanini). Finally, 
father’s father’s sister and mother’s father’s sister are classified with, and 
may actually be, father’s mother’s brother’s wife and mother’s mother’s 
brother’s wife respectively. 2 

However, there are some differences. In the Dieri system, as in the Arabana, 
cross-cousins are classified with father’s mother and her brother (kami), 
which is not the case in the Aranda system. Furthermore, the Dieri differen- 
tiate between the mother’s mother’s brother and his son’s son (respectively 
kanini and niyi), whereas the Aranda see them as identical. Finally, the Dieri 
system has only sixteen kinship terms and this has no correlation whatsoever 
with the Aranda terminology or with the Kariera terminology, or with the 
figure which might be calculated, on the basis of these two last, for a simple 
moiety system. 

That the system cannot be regarded as an Aranda system, in contrast to 
Radcliffe-Brown’s attempts, 3 emerges clearly from the table presented by 
Elkin (Fig. 39). The system is systematic only in appearance, and contingent 
lines are needed in order to close a malformed cycle. At the same time, a 
certain number of identifications are to be noted which are possible, in 
essence at least, in the given circumstances. Thus; 

tidnara = taru (by marriage) ; 

ngatamura = paiera (by marriage) ; 

ngatata = yenku (passing through kaku, yenku’ s sister and kami's 

wife). 

1 Elkin, 19406, pp. 52-3. 2 ibid. p. 54. 

3 Radcliffe-Brown, 1931, p. 58. Radcliffe-Brown has also tried to interpret the Dieri 
system as a system with four unnamed sections. See Radcliffe-Brown, 1914. 





Harmonic ami Disharmonic Regimes 



(S) 

* 





c 

* 

V P 

g O 

•S c 

ca .2 

e.& 

P J3 

^ c 
*: o 

3 w 
t/} cd 
O -2 
u v 
w 
jC 

u U 

•2 x: 
JZ 

* * 

V -C 
</> 

•§ < 2 ? 

o> *5 

£- go 

* ’5 

£ </> 
i> cd 
j* P 
u 5 
p* c 



.£ "O 

M S 
E u 

5 S 

H >-i 



20S 




206 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

If the terminologies of groups from the north-east of Australia are compared 
with the terminology of the Dieri, 1 it is found, moreover, that the Arabana 
have only one term kadnini, whereas the Dieri have yenku and kanini. On 
the basis of these equations, one can attempt a simplification of the system, 
which, while preserving the basic sixteen terminological distinctions, never- 
theless provides a clearer picture of them (Fig. 40). In this way the system 



r 

A = r ‘ 

yenku 



kami 



r 



A = 



ngapan 



{ 



r 



ngandri 



f 



myi a = c 
ngatata E 



nadada 



r 

A = < 

ngatamura 



taru 



A 



r • • : 

yenku kanini 



1 



A — ( 



kaka 






1 



==i 1 

f A T ° 
ngatamura 



r 



f 



▲ = o 

yenku 



kami 






1 



r 



r 



r 

▲ 



papa ngatamura 

— — i — 



r 



I kaku yenku 



- A 



r 



r 

O = A 

kalari 



r 



r 



A = • • = A 

yenku kanini 



nadada 



tidnara 



-i 



kami 



tidnara 



nadada 



1 1 



* = A 

■ 

kanini 



n 

== A 

ngatamura 



1 



O = A 

yenku 



_ 1 
paiera 



-I 

C) 



= A 

kanini 



Fig. 40. Simplified representation of the Dieri system. The two moieties are 

distinguished by white and black symbols respectively. 

appears to be based on four patrilineal lines, with a system of restricted 
exchange and marriage between cousins descended from cross-cousins. 

Two questions then claim our attention. Whence does the dichotomy 
preventing the marriage of cross-cousins arise? The structure of the system 
is powerless to explain it, and it seems to be a sort of needless elaboration. 
The second question is how it is that the four terms yenku, nadada, kami and 
ngatamura circulate through several lines. This cannot be connected with a 
patrilineal dichotomy (since each of the terms appears in two patrilineal 
lines), or with a matrilineal dichotomy (since these terms designate alternate 
generations within one and the same matrilineal line). The first task in 
attempting to reconstruct the sequence of events which resulted in these 
anomalies would be to construct a system in which each of the four line- 
indicators yenku, kami, kanini and nadada, continues to be applied in its 
own distinctive fashion. All Ego’s kinsfolk can easily be classified into three 
matrilineal lines, viz., kami of the line of the father’s mother and the cross- 
cousins line, kanini, that of the mother’s mother and the sister’s son, and 
nadada, that of the mother’s father and Ego’s wife. 2 This tripartition suggests 
an original structure of unilateral cross-cousin marriage. However, if marriage 

1 Elkin, 19406, p. 63. 2 ibid. p. 61. 




Harmonic and Disharmonic Regimes 207 

were with the father’s sister’s daughter, the wife’s clan would be identical 
with that of the father’s mother, and if it were with the mother’s brother’s 
daughter, the mother’s father’s clan and the father’s mother’s clan would 
be the one and the same. On the other hand, the yenku line, i.e.. Ego’s 
patrilineal line, disappears completely from the picture. 

For the time being, let us pass over these difficulties. In a system with 
patrilateral marriage, as we know, the wife’s clan is not constant. The 
existence of a matrilineal clan, kanini, which permanently includes the wife 
and her brother, thus gives an assurance in favour of matrilateral marriage. 
Let us adopt this as a working hypothesis. We shall then have an archaic 
system of the type in Fig. 41 , in which the matrilineal line yenku is added as a 







== 6 yenku A 


= 6 kami A 



== O tidnara a 



= O A 

I yenku 



= o taru 



o yenku a 




== O A 

papa ngapari 



= o 

I kami 



A 




A 



T ° 

kalari paiera 




= O kanini a 




| \ 

= o nadada a 



ngandri 




1 1 

= O A 

kaku ngatata/niyi 




ngatamura 



o nadada A 



= o tidnara A 



= o a 

ngatamura 



= o kanini A 



= c nadada A 



Fig. 41. Reconstruction of the hypothetical evolution of the Dieri system. 



fourth (as a matter of fact, yenku marries kami , kalari marries taru ( = 
tidnara)), and in which all the marriages conform, by and large, to the present 
system, except for the univocal nature of all the relationships. 1 

If such a system had passed directly to direct reciprocity (restricted ex- 
change), it would automatically have been reduced to two dual systems in 
which yenku and kami on the one hand, and kanini and nadada on the other, 
would have constituted two independent exchanging pairs, with cross-cousin 
marriage in each pair. Yet, all the same, the repetition of terms in alternate 
generations would still be incomprehensible. 

But if, on the contrary, the same system had had to adapt itself to a Mara- 
Aluridja formula, or had wished to do so, the whole thing would become 
clear. The four matrilineal and matrilocal lines, instead of exchanging by 
pairs and hence giving rise to the fission of the group into two sub-societies, 
would preserve the unity of the social group according to the Mara formula : 
an exchange between P and R in one generation would lead to an exchange 

1 Even at the present time, the prohibition of marriage between cross-cousins is not as 
strict as the system would seem to require. (Elkin, 1931c, p. 55; 1931 d, p. 494.) 







208 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

between P and S in the following generation, with a return to the formula 
P = R in the generation after; likewise Q marries R and 5 alternately. In 
changing in this way, the system passes from generalized to restricted ex- 
change. Marriage with the unilateral or bilateral cross-cousin becomes 
impossible, and makes way for the obligatory marriage of the children of 
cross-cousins. The alternation of terms corresponds to the alternation of 
forms of marriage: the exchange couple of the granddaughter reproduces 
the exchange couple of the grandmother. Finally, the characteristic terms 
of one matrilineal line can appear in two distinct patrilineal lines, since each 
line exchanges according to two different formulas. 

Consequently, we propose the following sequence of events in explanation 
of the present-day characteristics of the Dieri system; firstly, an archaic 
system with four matrilineal and matrilocal lines based on generalized 
exchange (marriage with the mother’s brother's daughter); secondly, the 
adaptation to a Mara-Anula system; and, finally, the present system. This is 
undoubtedly a purely hypothetical sequence but it is the only one allowing 
the anomalies of the system to be understood. In fact, it explains all of them. 
The Dieri system, is therefore, not a modality of the Aranda system ; it is a 
specific system, and its similarities with the Aranda system are the result of 
convergence. 

Chapter XX11I provides an incidental proof of our hypothesis when we 
give a similar interpretation (but admitting of direct proof) of the Manchu 
system. The Manchu and Dieri systems differ considerably in several ways, 
but they are both systems of generalized exchange which have turned into 
restricted exchange. The similarity in their respective developments has 
resulted in certain characteristics being curiously common to both. One 
cannot help but be struck by the fact that the Dieri, in order to determine a 
kinship relationship, employ several terms in the terminology as indicators 
of generation and of collaterally: ‘The term for mother’s mother's brother's 
son's son might be given as yenku kanini ngatata (that is, father’s father, 
mother’s mother’s brother, younger brother).’ 1 It will be seen that this 
procedure is basic to the Manchu terminology. When we study the Manchu 
system we shall find the same problem of lineal indicators, like the Dieri 
terms yenku, kami, nadada and kanini, reappearing in different patrilineal 
lines, so that we shall be forced to designate them, not as the names of lines, 
but as indicators of lineal series, i.e., terms allocated to segments of different 
lines. In both cases, this feature is to be interpreted in the same way, i.e., 
that lines integral with a system of generalized exchange have had to be 
fitted together as separate pieces into a structure of restricted exchange, so 
that each line of the new system is composed of segments of several former 
lines of the old system The extent to which this similarity goes is shown by 
the fact that in both system certain kinship relationships are expressed by 
the juxtaposition of two different lineal series indicators: e.g., among the 

1 Elkin, 19406, p. 56. 




Harmonic and Disharmonic Regimes 




Dieri, yenku kanini (‘father’s father kanini' 



= older brother) for mother’s 



mother’s brother’s son’s son, and, in Manchu, nahundi eskundi (‘ nahundi 
brother’) for father’s mother’s brother’s son’s son.' 



The Dieri system is not the only one to exhibit similarities with the Manchu, 
for others just as striking are encountered in certain systems in the Cape 
York Peninsula. These systems are still subject to the rule of unilateral 
marriage, but the change-over to restricted exchange is largely under way. 
Such is the case of the Wikmunkan, the Yir-yoront, and the Kandyu, which, 
as we have seen above, exemplify various modalities of cross-cousin marriage; 
either preferential marriage with the mother’s brother’s daughter (Wikmun- 
kan and Yir-yoront), or marriage with one or the other unilateral cousin, 
the bilateral cousin being always excluded (the Kendall-Holroyd tribes), or, 
finally, preferential marriage with the father's sister's daughter (Kandyu). 
These tribes thus provide the living picture of a process of development which 
we could no more than reconstruct as far as the Dieri are concerned. 



The Wikmunkan practise a characteristic form of marriage with the mother’s 
younger brother’s daughter; the mother’s older brother’s daughter is 
prohibited. 2 The structure of alliance and kinship thus does not simply 
possess the cyclical form of systems of generalized exchange, as we saw it 
among the Murngin, for the cycle takes on the additional appearance of a 
spiral, a man always marrying into a younger branch, and a woman into an 
older branch. The adjustment is made by closing the cycle with an absolute 
displacement of three generations in every six lines (Fig. 42). This is made 
possible by means of a system of alternating generations (as among the 
Aranda) in one direction only (unlike the Aranda). Among the Wikmunkan, 
for example, a man can marry a woman in his grandson’s generation, but 
never in his grandfather’s generation. Men marry into the generations 
below their own, and women into the generations above. At the same time, 
Ego cannot compete with his grandson, because of the rule: ‘Men marry 
women of their own generation in a younger line, or of a younger generation 
in an older line, they cannot marry women of an older generation in a younger 
line.’ 3 Consequently, when Ego marries his grandson’s cousin, she necessarily 
belongs to the older branch of the grandson’s generation, while the grandson 
can take a wife only in the younger branch of the same generation. 

The subdivision of each generation into two age classes, ‘older’ and 
‘younger’, is thus in direct correlation with the possibility of two men vying 
for the one woman. This competition is avoided by limiting their respective 
claims to two different age classes, the members of which are either real or 
classificatory parallel cousins. We shall have frequent cause to show that this 
dichotomy of generations always appears in such circumstances, and that 
it must be seen as a normal function of systems of alternate marriage. In 
fact, among the Cape York tribes, there is not one alternate marriage, but 
two. In association with matrilateral marriage there is, in a weakened form 
‘ cf. p. 384. 2 McConnel, 1940, p. 440. 3 ibid. p. 448. 





a 



Decent line 1.3 coincides with R.3 by marriage between women o 
L.6 with EGO’s line. 




Harmonic and Disharmonic Regimes 21 1 

it is true (since in the second case the cousin can only be classificatory), a 
patrilateral type of marriage. This emerges clearly from statements by 
McConnel’s informants: 

‘My mother’s younger brother is my KALA ... My KALA'S daughter, 
my moiya, I take for my wife ... I may marry a woman from a distant 
ground given by a “KALA". We two “change hands”. I give my sister 
( vap.a or wi.la) to my KUTTH ( KALA'S son). I exchange with him. Now 
I call my KUTTH, MOIYA (sister’s husband) and my KUTTH, he calls 
my father KALA 

Thus, in the Wikmunkan system, which originally had a structure of genera- 
lized exchange, patrilateral marriage has been joined with the prior matri- 
lateral marriage, with two results. The first is a gradual transition from 
generalized to restricted exchange : ‘A man usually gives a younger half-sister 
from his own family or clan to the man who gives him his sister for a wife.’ 2 
In the second place, the gradualness of this change is apparent in the fact 
that if a man marries his real unilateral cousin (mother’s brother’s daughter - 
see the aboriginal informant’s statement below - or father's sister’s daughter), 
and if the marriage is accompanied by an exchange, at least one of the 
two cousins must be classificatory. This is what McConnel expresses, but 
in a way which does not seem to be fully in keeping with her description, 
when she writes: ‘Exchange of wives takes place between distantly related 
clans.’ 3 It seems quite clear, in fact, that one of the two women might be a 
first cousin. In this case, a very important theoretical consequence must 
follow, viz., that a twofold exchange of this type may in fact be a threefold 
exchange, i.e., I marry my cross-cousin, and I borrow from a parallel line 
a woman whom I give in exchange to my brother-in-law. Accordingly, for 
each woman there are two marriage possibilities: either in a direct cycle of 
generalized exchange, or in an indirect cycle of restricted exchange. 

In this respect, the similarities with the Manchu system are striking. Like 
the Wikmunkan, the Manchu divide each line into older and younger 
branches. One need only compare McConnel’s and Shirokogoroff’s tables to 
see their similarity (Fig. 43). 

Moreover, the Manchu and Wikmunkan systems are based on the recog- 
nition of six lines. There is no doubt as to the correspondence between three 
of the Manchu lines and the three central or ‘real’ lines of the Wikmunkan 
system represented here in the same way as in Fig. 42: 

Wikmunkan Manchu 

0 enendi Ego and his descendants 

L.l inadi sisters’ descendants 

R.l nakundi mother’s brother’s descendants. 

If we keep to our hypothesis on pp. 195-6, that the other three Wikmunkan 
1 McConnel, 1940, p. 439. 2 ibid. p. 451. 3 loc. cit. 




f.f.o.br.* 

PJ.LA 



f.f.o.br. son 
PINY A 



Diagram i. AGE LINES 
A. Father’s Line 
f.f.f. 

NENKA 



f.f. f.f.y.br. 

PJ.LA PJ.LA 

f.f.y.br. son 

| 1 1 PI. PA 

f.o.br. f. f.y.br. 

PINY A Pl.PA PI.PA 



f.o.br. son 
WUN YA 



I 

o.br. 
WUN YA 

A 

o.br. son 
NENKA 

o.br. son’s son 
PJ.LIYU 



PINY A 



EGO 



son 

NENKA 

I 

son’s son 

PJ.LIYU 

. I . 

son s son s son 
PI.PA 



1 

y.br. 

PONT A 

A 

y.br. son 
PIN YA YA 

h I. 

y.br. son s son 

PJ.LIYU 



PI.PA 



f.y.br. son 
PONT A 



* m.ni.br. and w.m.f. rank as f.f.br. with analogous age lines. 



m.f.o.br.* 

NA1TYA 



m.f.o.br. son 
MUKA 



MOIYA 



TUWA 



NAITYI YU 



Diagram i. AGE LINES 

B. Mother’s Line 

m.f.f. 

TUWA 



m.o.br. 

MUKA 



m.o.br. son 
MOIYA 



o.sis. son 
TUWA 



o.sis. son s son 
NAITYI YU 



m.f. 

NAITYA 



ni.f.y.br. 

NAITYA 



ni. 



m.y.br. 

KALA 



m.y.br. son 
KUTTH 



m. f.y.br. son 
KALA 



KUTTH 



y.sis. son 
MUKAIYA MUKAIYA 



y.sis. son s son 
NAITYI YU NAITYI YU 



o.sis. son s son s son 
MUKA KALA 



y. sis. son s son s son 

KALA KALA 



* w.f.f., sis.hus.f.f. and. f.m.br. rank as ni.f.br. with analogous age 
lines. Sister’s son is from half MUKA, not full MUKA. 



ELDER 



YOUNGER 




J/ 

V tomolo sargandi 



ibid 



amba nakuciha 

, \ 

nakundi (uhehe and asa) 
nakundi wurun 
nakundi ornolo wurun 



o koro mafa 



A 

cna 



u 


c? koro mafa 
$ koro mama 






> 



I 



nakuciha 

* * 

nakundi (uhehe and asa) 

A 

nakundi wurun 

, \ 

nakundi omolo wurun 



nakuciha 

illid 

* 

ibid 

I 

ibid 



Fig. 43. The Manchu and the Wikmunkan systems. 

On the left, the father’s clan (at the top) and the mother’s clan (at the bottom) in the 
Wikmunkan system. (After McConnel, 1940.) On the right, the father’s clan (at the 
top) and the mother’s clan (at the bottom) in the Manchu system. (After Shiro- 
kogoroff, 1924, Tables I and VIII, pp. 35 and 42 respectively.) 




214 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



lines result from a division of those principal lines with which they coincide 
terminologically, we can complete the table of correspondences: 



Wikmunkan 

L.2 



Manchu 

eskundi 



father’s collateral descendants 



R.2 dalhidi my collateral descendants 

R.3 tehemdi my mother’s collateral 

descendants. 1 



The priority of generalized exchange over restricted exchange in both 
systems follows from the common preference for the matrilateral first 
cousin, and from a common repugnance for the daughter of the older class 
of the father’s clan. When restricted exchange is practised by the Wikmunkan, 
says McConnel, it is only between distant clans. 2 Likewise, the Manchu are 
repelled by exchanges between clans which are already allied. 3 Finally, 
both systems have the same dialectic of age classes and generations. In the 
Manchu system, a man can marry a woman belonging to a generation senior 
to his own, or to the older branch of his own generation, while women from 
the younger class of his generation, or members of younger generations, 
are prohibited. 4 The ‘age spiral’ of the Wikmunkan has its symmetrical 
but inverse model among the Manchu. Our interpretation of the Manchu 
system as resulting from a change from generalized to restricted exchange 
will thus confirm similar interpretations given by us for so-called ‘aberrant’ 
Australian systems (which are aberrant only because of an incomplete 
classification). In the same way, this particular interpretation will be called 
upon in the second part of this work to elucidate certain theoretical problems 
of systems in the Far East. 



IV 

If our analysis is correct, there was originally a considerable difference 
between systems of the Dieri type and systems of the Kariera or Aranda 
types. In the latter, descent and residence are transmitted in separate lines. 
By contrast, we have suggested that the archaic Dieri system must have had 
a purely maternal determination for residence and for descent. This point 
must be carefully examined. 

A system of exogamous moieties can function, whatever the rule of descent. 
It can also function whatever the rule of residence, and, finally, whatever the 
relationship between the rule of residence and the rule of descent. In other 
words, a moiety system does not take residence into account, or, because 
of its special structure, need not take it into consideration. 

If, on the contrary, one seeks to define the social status of the individual 



1 cf. ch. XII, pp. 1 89-96. 

3 cf. ch. XXIII. 



2 See above, p. 21 1 . 

* Cch. XXIII, p. 386. 




Harmonic and Disharmonic Regimes 215 

in terms of descent and residence, the consequences vary greatly according 
to whether the regime of the system under consideration is harmonic or 
disharmonic. A harmonic regime is one in which the rule of residence is 
similar to the rule of descent, and a disharmonic regime is one in which they 
are opposed. A system with matrilineal descent and matrilocal residence is 
harmonic, and so too is a system with patrilineal descent and patrilocal 
residence. By contrast, systems in which one of the factors follows the paternal 
line, while the other follows the maternal line, are disharmonic. Accordingly, 
there are two types of harmonic regimes, patrilineal and patrilocal, and 
matrilineal and matrilocal ; and two types of disharmonic regimes, patrilineal 
and matrilocal, and matrilineal and patrilocal. 

We have seen what happens under a disharmonic regime, or what comes 
to the same thing, since the Kariera system, with its matrilineal moieties and 
two patrilocal groups falls into this category. As we know, a matrilineal 
dichotomy leads to a division into four sections sanctioning marriage with 
the two unilateral cross-cousins, and with the bilateral cross-cousin. What 
happens under a harmonic regime ? 

Suppose there is a system with patrilocal residence comprising two 
patrilineal moieties, A and B, and two local groups, 1 and 2 . The formula 
for marriage and descent will be: 

If a man : marries a woman: the children will be 



Af 


b 2 




B 2 


A, 


b 2 


a 2 


Bi 


^2 




^2 


B, 



In other words, the system will function as two dual systems juxtaposed. 
Instead of one, there will simply be two, and the degree of integration in the 
total system will remain unaltered. If we have four local groups instead of 
two, the same situation will arise, i.e., each group will split in two, joining 
with one half of a neighbouring group to reconstitute a new system of two 
moieties. Thus we shall have started with four local groups, each divided 
into exogamous halves, and have ended up with four local groups, each 
composed of exogamous halves (i.e., moieties). What does this mean? It 
means that the factor of residence, in the case of harmonic regimes, is unpro- 
ductive. Taking only descent and residence into account, harmonic regimes 
are incapable of going beyond the stage of moiety organization. 

Is the harmonic regime then doomed to remain at that primitive stage of 
group integration which is represented by dual organization ? It is true that 
under such a regime there is nothing to be gained by exchanging wives among 
people of different origins, instead of among people of the same origin. 
But another possibility remains open, namely that of changing, not the groups 
between which a certain form of exchange operates, but the relationship 




2l6 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

according to which exchange is effected between the groups, i.e., changing 
from a double system of direct exchange according to the formula, P — Q, 
R — S, to a simple system of indirect exchange, according to the formula 
P = Q — R = S ( = P); or, finally, to put it in another way, to pass from 
a system of restricted exchange to a system of generalized exchange. In this 
way we arrive at a general table (Fig. 44). 

Disharmonic Regime Harmonic Regime 




(8 x n ) classes, n classes 

theoretical type 

Fig. 44. Classification of the principal, types of kinship systems, evolved from dual 

organization. 

The relationship between the generalized system and the Aranda system 
becomes clear. The generalized system goes beyond the Kariera system, 
since it employs the same number of elements as the Aranda system, if not 
of the same nature: two moieties (patrilineal in one case, matrilineal in the 
other), and a four-component complex (of lines in one, and local groups in 
the other). The generalized system and the Aranda system are equally complex 
in terms of the number of elements they employ. On the other hand, however, 
the Aranda system represents the second dichotomy of the disharmonic 
regime, whereas the generalized system represents the first dichotomy of 
the harmonic regime. Furthermore, the arrangement of the elements in the 
Aranda system is twice as complex as in the generalized system: the same 
number of elements are combined in one to form eight subsections, and in 
the other to form four sections. The generalized system is like a Kariera sys- 
tem in the sense that they both employ, within their respective regimes, the 
dichotomy of the first degree, but it is like an Aranda system in that the dichotomy 
of the first degree in the harmonic regime requires the distinction of the same 




Harmonic and Disharmonic Regimes 217 

number of elements as does the dichotomy of the second degree in the 
disharmonic regime. In other words, the generalized system employs forty-one 
kinship terms like an Aranda system, and four sections like a Kariera system. 
What reason is there for this? Why can we not have a generalized system 
based solely on the distinction of only two moieties and two lines? The answer 
is obvious: in that case the lines would be merged with the moieties. 

It can thus be said that harmonic regimes are unstable, while disharmonic 
regimes are stable. What do we mean by this? A disharmonic regime, in 
becoming more and more complex, can be expressed through forms of 
organization (moieties, sections, subsections) which represent a continuous 
progression within one and the same series. By contrast, harmonic regimes 
cannot reach a complex form of organization. This explains why class systems 
are so rare wherever marriage is determined by a law of generalized exchange. 
In point of fact, we shall see that in the vast majority of cases the preference 
for the matrilateral cross-cousin does not involve a structural system of such 
a kind. 

Let us look at Fig. 44 in more detail. First we see that the relationship 
between the generalized system and the Murngin system is symmetrical, 
but inverse, to that between a moiety system and a Kariera system. The 
moiety system is based solely upon descent, and the harmonic or disharmonic 
features of the corresponding regime are confused. The transition to the 
Kariera system is brought about by the introduction of a local dichotomy, 
and as a consequence the disharmonic character appears. Conversely, the 
generalized system is based solely on line. There is thus a hiatus which 
expresses the fact that within each regime this regime is not unique. As we 
have seen, the disharmonic series lacks a stage in the dichotomous process 
(the distinction between both types of cross-cousin). Symmetrically, the 
harmonic series, which has the missing stage, reveals another hiatus, that of a 
four-factor system, represented in the disharmonic series by the Kariera 
system. We have established that the generalized system is unintelligible 
if an attempt is made to reduce it either to the Kariera system, which has a 
less complex structure, or to the Aranda system, which has a more complex 
function. Furthermore, we have established that it is impossible to see it as 
an intermediate form of the same type. In reality, the generalized system is 
similar in one respect to the Kariera system, and in another to the Aranda 
system. The system itself is not intermediate between the two, because it 
belongs to a series of a different order. Its function, however, is clearly 
intermediary. 

These considerations may be extended to the entire gamut of Australian 
systems. The traditional error has been to admit only groups with disharmonic 
regimes, such as the Kariera and Aranda, as basis for classification. Accord- 
ingly, any hope of understanding harmonic regimes is lost, and one is forced 
either to treat them as monstrosities, or to try to reduce them to the previous 
forms, which is obviously an impossible undertaking. 




218 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

But harmonic regimes do exist, and short of producing indefinitely an 
increasing number of reducible societies , 1 they have to be based on patrila- 
teral or matrilateral marriage, but not on bilateral marriage, which is at 
the immediate disposal of disharmonic regimes alone. A harmonic regime 
can thus choose between two systems of marriage, patrilateral or matrilateral. 
Each of these two systems is itself compatible with two modes of descent, 
patrilineal or matrilineal. Thus we have: 



Regime System 

r Patrilateral 

Harmonica 

Matrilateral 



Mode 

{ Patrilineal 
Matrilineal 

{ Patrilineal 
Matrilineal 



Mara 

Aluridja 

Karadjeri, Wikmunkan 
Dieri 



These systems can fall under the influence of disharmonic regimes, and 
evolve towards an apparent form of eight subsection structure. This seems 
to have happened among the Murinbata, who gave up their system for the 
sake of their structure , and perhaps also among the Murngin who never 
fully realized their structure because they remained faithful to the system. 
Or else the patrilateral and the matrilateral systems act concurrently, as in 
the present-day forms of the Arabana, Mara, Dieri and perhaps Murngin 
systems. 

Thus, when they have completed their respective evolutions, harmonic 
and disharmonic regimes present convergent characteristics. Several harmonic 
regimes have made the transition from the formula of generalized exchange 
to the formula of restricted exchange. Moreover, patrilateral marriage systems 
and disharmonic regimes are both of the alternating type (the generations 
being reproduced, in all or part of their defining features, in every second 
generation), while matrilateral systems are always of the continuous type 
(consecutive generations being identical in all respects). This alternating 
type, which is common to both, makes the transition from patrilateral 
systems to the formula for restricted exchange easier than it is for matrilateral 
systems. This explains why the Mara and Dieri systems can have a terminology 
and marriage rules which are of the Aranda type, or close to it, without 
apparent subsections, while a Murngin system has to adopt the subsections, 
without succeeding, for all that, in changing its rules and its terminology. 
However, at the end of their development, the harmonic regimes have 
converged towards the disharmonic regimes, sometimes in structure (Murn- 
gin), sometimes in terminology (Mara), and sometimes in respect of the 
system and the marriage rules (Dieri). What is the reason for this evolution ? 
Is it the result of geographical diffusion in neighbouring groups, or did it 
arise in the prestige attached to complex regulations among peoples whose 

1 See following chapter. 




219 



Harmonic and Disharmonic Regimes 

attention is traditionally drawn towards such problems? As we have seen, 
this seems to be the case among the Murinbata. On the other hand, the 
peripheral distribution of all the harmonic regimes which possess, or most 
probably used to possess, forms of generalized exchange, 1 strongly suggests 
that unilateral systems are more archaic than bilateral systems. Contrary 
to what Elkin believes, 2 it might thus be supposed that bilateral systems have 
themselves evolved from unilateral systems. 

It belongs to the specialists in Australia to elucidate this problem. The first 
stage seems to be to fix the exact location of every system which is or used to 
be unilateral. So far there has been a tendency to interpret doubtful systems 
in bilateral terms, and this for several reasons: firstly, because the Australian 
typology is based on Radcliffe-Brown’s types I and II, which are bilateral; 
and secondly, because any terminology with alternating generations has at 
once been considered as a proof of bilaterality. We hope we have established 
that the alternation of generations results from a system of patrilateral 
marriage just as much as from a double patrilineal and matrilineal dichotomy. 
In our opinion, there is no doubt that a careful reconsideration of instances 
of the alternation of generations would result, in a good number of cases, 
in the recognition of the immediate functions of patrilateral marriage. Since, 
moreover, matrilateral systems are distinguished by the employment of a 
consecutive terminology in opposition to patrilateral systems, which are 
distinguished by an alternating terminology, we foresee that this contrast 
may prove a valuable means of investigation in an attempt to arrive at a 
preliminary classification. In this connexion the existence of a consecutive 
terminology among the Yaralde and Ungarinyin 3 and traces of it among the 
Dieri, and of an alternating terminology among the Macumba and Aluridja 
may prove very instructive. 

It is highly probable that a growing importance will be attached to har- 
monic regimes with unilateral systems in the typology of Australian societies. 
The autonomy of the Kariera system cannot be doubted, but it is a point to 
consider, on the basis of Radcliffe-Brown’s frequent statement that this 
system shows a marked preference for matrilateral marriage, whether there 
has not been a certain overhastiness in including adjacent unilateral forms 
under the same heading: ‘The discovery of the Kariera system by myself in 
191 1’, writes Radcliffe-Brown, ‘was the result of a definite search, on a 

1 The peripheral types with neither moieties nor sections are: the Narrinyeri, the Kurnai, 
the Y uin, the Melville Islanders, the Bard of Dampier Land and the Nanda of the western 
coast (Davidson, 19286; 1937, pp. 171-4). 

2 Elkin, 19406, pp. 379-83, and particularly n. 129, p. 382. 

3 Disputed by Needham (1960a, p. 285, n. 33); but I do no more than paraphrase Elkin, 
19406, p. 384: ‘The kinship system has in terminology a vertical form such as is fully 
developed in the Ungarinyin tribe, north-west Australia.’ 

It may conveniently be reported here that in 1951 Radcliffe-Brown proposed a new 
classification of Australian systems which assigns a place to unilateral systems, which he 
designated by the name of Karadjeri. Radcliffe-Brown’s article is usefully rounded off by 
a personal letter, which is published here for the first time. (See Appendix, p. 499] 




220 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

surmise, made before visiting Australia, but after a careful study of Australian 
data in 1909, that some such system might very well exist and that Western 
Australia would be a reasonable place in which to look for it.’ 1 That success 
should have crowned the bold hypothesis of the great English sociologist may 
justifiably encourage all those who believe that an internal logic directs the 
unconscious workings of the human mind, even in those of its creations 
which have long been considered the most arbitrary, and that the appropriate 
methods to be applied to it are those usually reserved for the study of the 
physical world. At the same time, however, a doubt intrudes itself, certainly 
not concerning the reality of the Kariera system, but about its exclusive 
existence in the enormous territory which has been assigned to it. 2 

In any case, the one fact remains. A formal study of the notion of exchange, 
such as sociologists have so far employed, has shown us that it did not 
succeed in embracing the facts in their integrity. Rather than deciding to 
lend a sterile discontinuity to phenomena which are, after all, of the same 
type, we have preferred to seek a wider and modified conception of exchange 
in an attempt to arrive at a systematic typology and an exhaustive explanation. 
It is the Australian facts, i.e., those taken from the classic region of restricted 
exchange, which have forced us to develop the notion of exchange and have, 
as it were, imposed upon us the notion of generalized exchange. What is the 
connexion between restricted and generalized exchange? Are they to be 
seen as two independent forms, yet capable of interacting one upon the 
other when the chances of culture contact bring them together, or do they 
represent two related stages in one process of evolution? In so far as the 
concern is with the solution of regional problems, this is a problem for the 
ethnographer and cultural historian. Our own intention is limited to making 
a structural study of the two types and their interrelations, and we must now 
attempt to isolate, in a simple and directly observable form, the formula 
of generalized exchange, the theoretical necessity for which has become 
apparent even before we have succeeded in discovering it in the facts. 

1 Radcliffe-Brown, 1931, p. 15, n. 5. 

2 cf. map in Radcliffe-Brown, ibid.; and in Lawrence, 1937. 




CHAPTER XIV 



Appendix to Part One 



ON THE ALGEBRAIC STUDY OF CERTAIN TYPES OF MARRIAGE 

LAWS (MURNGIN SYSTEM) 

by Andre Weil 
University of Chicago 

In these few pages, written at Levi-Strauss’s request, I propose to show how 
a certain type of marriage laws can be interpreted algebraically, and how 
algebra and the theory of groups of substitutions can facilitate its study and 
classification. 

In the societies in question, the individual men and women are divided 
into classes, each person's class being determined, according to certain rules, 
by those of his parents. According to the respective classes of a man and of 
a woman, the marriage rules indicate whether they can marry or not. 

In such a society, the totality of possible marriages can thus be divided 
into a certain number of distinct types, which, if there is only one formula 
indicating to a man of a given class, the class in which he has the right to 
choose his wife (or in other words, the class in which he can marry a man’s 
sister) is equal to the number of classes into which the population is divided. 
However, if there are several formulas, alternating in a predetermined manner, 
the number of possible marriage types may be double, triple, etc., the number 
of classes. 

At all events, let the number of types of marriage be n. We arbitrarily 
designate them by n symbols, e.g., M lt M 2 > . . . , M n . We consider only the 
marriage laws satisfying the two following conditions: 

(A) For any individual, man or woman, there is one and only one type of 
marriage which he (or she) has the right to contract. 

(B) For any individual, the type of marriage which he (or she) may con- 
tract depends solely on sex and the type of marriage from which he (or she) 
is descended. 



221 




222 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

Consequently, the type of marriage which a son descended from a marriage 
of type Mj (/ being one of the numbers 1 , 2 , n) may contract is a 
function of M if which, following the normal mathematical notation in such 
cases, can be designated by /(Afj). It would be the same for a daughter, the 
corresponding function, which we shall designate by usually being 

distinct from the former. From the abstract point of view, knowledge of the 
two functions,/ and g, completely determines the marriage rules in the society 
studied. These rules can thus be represented by a table with three lines, the 
first listing the marriage types M u . . . , Af„, the second and the third giving 
the corresponding values of the two functions / and g respectively. 

Take a simple example. Let us suppose a four-class society, with generalized 
exchange, of the following type: 




There are four types of marriage: (A/ t ) A man, B woman; ( M 2 ) B man, 
C woman; (A/ 3 ) C man, D woman; (M 4 ) D man, A woman. Let us further 
assume that the children of a mother of class A, B, C, D are respectively of 
class B, C, D, A. Our table is then as follows: 

(Parents’ marriage type) Mi M 2 M 3 M 4 

(Son’s marriage type) /(Mj) = M 3 M 4 Mi M 2 

(Daughter’s marriage type) g(M f ) = M 2 M 3 M 4 Mj 

Furthermore, as may be seen from the above example, / and g are substi- 
tutions, or, as is also said in such cases, permutations of M i , . . . , M n . This 
means that in our table the second line (which gives the values for /) and the 
third (which gives the values for g) are formed from symbols M x , . . . , M n , 
like the first line, but differ simply in being in a different order. Indeed, if 
this were not so, certain marriage types would disappear from the second 
generation onward. It is already clear that our study depends on the theory 
of the permutations of n elements, a theory which goes back to Lagrange, 
and Galois, and which has been further developed since. 

We now introduce a new condition: 

(C) Any man must be able to marry his mother’s brother’s daughter. 

Let us express this condition algebraically. Let us consider a brother and 
a sister, descended from a marriage of the M t type. The brother will have to 
contract an /(A/,) marriage, so that his daughter will contract a g\j\Mf\ 
marriage. The sister must contract a g(M t ) marriage, so that her son will 




Appendix to Part One 223 

contract an f[g{Mf\ marriage. Condition (C) will thus be expressed by the 
relationsh ip : 

figiMd) = g[f(Mi)] 

This condition is known, in the theory of groups, as the permutability of 
the substitutions / and g. The pairs of permutable substitutions can be studied 
and classified according to known principles. In the language of the theory 
of groups (which it is unfortunately almost impossible to express in non- 
technical terms without going into very long explanations), the group of 
permutations generated by f and g is an Abelian group, which, having two 
generators, is necessarily cyclic or else is the direct product of two cyclic 
groups. 

A new condition is introduced at this point and we shall express it by 
means of the following definition. We shall say that a society is reducible if 
it can be differentiated into two or more sub-populations, such that there is 
never any kinship tie between the individuals in one and the individuals in 
the other. In the opposite case, the society will be said to be irreducible. From 
the standpoint of the purely abstract study of types of marriage laws, we 
need only consider irreducible societies, since a reducible society operates 
as if each sub-population were a distinct society, in itself irreducible. For 
example, consider a system of restricted exchange: 

a~ :-Tb 

c . ~ rp 

with four types of marriage: (Af t ) A man, B woman; ( M 2 ) B man, A woman; 
(M 3 ) C man, D woman ; ( M A ) D man, C woman. Let us further suppose that 
all children are of the same class A, B, C, or D as their mothers. This society 
is obviously reducible, and consists of two sub-populations, one formed by 
the classes A and 2 ?, and the other by the classes C and D. The table of the 
functions / and g for this society is as follows: 

M t M 2 M 3 M 4 
f(M t ) = M 2 Mi M 4 M 3 
g(M t ) = Mi M 2 M 3 M 4 

To suppose we are dealing with an irreducible society is to suppose, in 
the language of the theory of groups, that the group defined above (Abelian 
group of permutations generated by / and g) is transitive. Such a group, if 
cyclic, is of an extremely simple structure. If it is a direct product of two 
cyclical groups, the possibilities are more varied, and the principles of 
classification to be employed are more complicated; in any case, these 
questions can be treated using known methods. At this stage we shall merely 
state the results obtained in the case of a cyclic group. To this end it is neces- 
sary to indicate the well-known principle of the modulus n numeration. 




224 77 /e Elementary Structures of Kinship 

Let n be any integer. The use of the modulus n means replacing a number 
at all times by the remainder when this number is divided by n. For example, 
‘the proof by 9’, well known in elementary arithmetic, consists in using the 
modulus 9 in calculations. Similarly, in a calculation modulo 10, by adding 
8 and 7 we get 5; multiplying 3 by 4 we get 2; adding 8 and 7 we get 5; 
multiplying 2 by 5 we get 0, etc. These are written: 8 + 7 = 5 (mod 10); 
3x4 = 2 (mod 10); 2x5 = 0 (mod 10), etc. In all such calculations, it is 
usual to replace the sign = by the sign = ‘congruent to’. Calculating by 
modulus 10, we never have 10 or a number greater than 10, so that in this 
form of calculation, there are only 10 numbers, namely 0, 1, 2, . . . , 9. 

Let us return to the case of an irreducible society with a cyclical group. 
In this society it is then possible to distinguish a certain number, n, of classes, 
numbered from 0 to n — 1 , such that a man of class .v always marries a woman 
of class x + a (mod n), and the children of a woman of class ,x are always of 
class x y h (mod //), a and b being two fixed numbers, and all calculations 
being made modulo n. For example, in the system of generalized exchange 
described above, n = 4, a — 1, b — 1, as is seen by numbering the classes 
A, B, C, D as 0, 1, 2, 3 respectively. 

We now go on to show how a more complex example can be formulated 
and discussed algebraically. We suppose a system with eight classes, with 
two marriage formulas to be applied alternatively: 

A I ^Z=TB I 

Aj< t " B2 

CtZa —t .d 1 

C 2 Z — -P 2 

We further assume that the children’s class is determined by the mother’s, 
as follows: 

(Mother’s class) A t A 2 B, B 2 C t C 2 Dj D 2 

(Children’s class) C 2 Ci D 2 D t A! A 2 B, B 2 

Finally, for our method to be applicable there must be a rule of alternation, 
between the formulas (I) and (II), satisfying condition (B) above. At this 
point, for mathematical convenience, we shall make a more precise hypothesis, 
which is perhaps unduly restrictive, but which will serve: i.e., the marriage 
formula, (I) or (II), to which any given individual must conform, depends 
solely on his sex and on the formula, (I) or (II), by which his parents married. 





Appendix to Part One 225 

There are in this case sixteen types of marriage, according to the class of 
the spouses and the formula being applied. We shall not number them from 
1 to 16, but in a way which is arithmetically more convenient. In all that 
follows, the calculations must he seen in terms of the modulus 2 . In numeration 
modulus 2, there are only two numbers, 0 and 1. The multiplication table 
is as follows: 0x0 = 0, 0x1 =0, 1x0 = 0, lxl = 1. The addition table 
is as follows: 0 + 0 = 0, 0+1 = 1,1+0 = 1,1 + 1 =0. 

Given this, we annotate each class by a triple index (a, b, c), each being 
one of the numbers of numeration modulo 2, i.e., 0 or 1. This follows these 
rules: 



(1) a is 0 if the class is A or B, 1 if it is C or D 

(2) h is 0 if the class is A or C, 1 if it is B or D 

(3) c is 0 for the sub-class 1, and 1 for the sub-class 2. 

For example, if a man or a woman is of class C 2 , we would say, in our 
notation, that he or she is of class (1,0, 1). 

Each marriage type is annotated by a quadruple index (a, h, c, d), whereby 
(a, b, c) represents the husband’s class, and where d is 0 if the marriage 
follows formula (I), and 1 if it follows formula (II). Thus, in a marriage 
(1,0, 1, 1) the husband is of class (1,0, 1), that is C 2 , and if the marriage 
follows formula (II) the woman is of class D u that is (1, 1, 0). Furthermore, 
the children are of class that is (0, 1, 0). 

Generally speaking, in formula (I) marriages, if the husband is of class 
(a, />, c), the wife is of class (a, b + 1, c) and in formula (II) marriages, if the 
husband is of class (a, b , c) the wife is of class (a, b+ 1, c+ I), all this being 
verified by direct examination of individual cases. Thus, in a marriage 
(0, b , c, d ), the husband is of class (0, b, c), and the wife is of class (0, &+ 1, 
c + d ). 

On the other hand, if a woman is of class (x, v, r), her children are of class 
(jc+ 1, v, .x + r+1), this again being confirmed by direct examination. It 
follows that, in a marriage (0, b , c, d ), the children are of class (0 + 1 , b + 1 , 
a + c + d+ 1 ). 

It is now necessary to specifiy our hypothesis on the alternation between 
the formulas (I) and (II). We shall assume one of the four following cases: 
(i) the children always follow the parents' formula; (ii) the children always 
follow the opposite formula to the parents', so that the formulas alternate 
from generation to generation; (iii) the sons follow the parents’ formula, 
and the daughters the opposite formula : (iv) the daughters follow the parents’ 
formula, and the sons the opposite formula. Each of these cases will be 
annotated with a double index, ( p , q), as follows: p is 0 if the son follows the 
formula of the parents (case (i) and (iii)), and 1 in the opposite case (case (ii) 
and (iv)); q is 0 if the daughter follows the parents’ formula (case (i) and 
(iv)), and 1 in the opposite case (case (ii) and (iii)). 




226 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

This being so, we find, by direct verification on the basis of the results 
obtained above, that the functions / and g previously defined can be expressed 
at this point by the following formulas: 

f(a, b , c , d ) = (a + 1, by 1, aycydy 1, dyp) (mod 2) 

g(a , b, c, d) = (a+1, b , a + c+q+ 1, d+q) (mod 2) 

It remains to be stated that these substitutions are permutable, this expressing, 
as we know, that marriage with the mother's brother’s daughter is always 
allowed. It is an easy calculation to make and gives: 

( a , 6+l,£’+</+l) = ( a , by 1 , c y d yqy 1 ) (mod 2) 



This shows that q cannot be 1. Condition (C) thus excludes cases (ii) and 
(iii), the only possible cases then being (i) and (iv). The first of these is that 
of a reducible society, composed of two sub-populations, one of which 
always marries following formula (I), and the other always following 
formula (II). If we leave this case to one side, there remains case (iv), in 
which p — 1, <7 = 0. The functions / and g are then as follows: 

f(ay by e, d ) == + 1, by \ , ay c ydy\ y dy 1) (mod 2) 

g(a, by c, d) = (a+1, by a + c+ 1, d) (mod 2) 

By means of these formulas, all the questions relating to this marriage 
law can easily be submitted to arithmetic examination. For example, let us 
ask ourselves if marriage with the father's sister’s daughter is possible. In 
this general case, it is easy to see that a necessary and sufficient condition 
for it to be possible is that / and g shall satisfy the relationship: 

For the law just examined, an immediate calculation shows that this re- 
lationship is not verified for any choice of indices a, b , c, d. Thus, no man in 
the society in question can marry his father’s sister’s daughter. A similar 
calculation shows that this type of marriage would always be allowed, by 
contrast, in a society which always applied either formula (I) or formula (II). 

Finally, let us find out if the society above is irreducible. There are general 
methods for treating such a problem, but here it is easier to note that the 
combination b~d is constant for the substitutions / and g, i.e., it has the same 
value respectively for the four-index symbol (a, b , c, d), and for symbols 
deduced from it by the substitutions / and g. This implies the existence of 
two distinct sub-populations, one composed of all the possible spouses for 
marriages of the type (a, b, c, d) where b-d s 0, that is, b — d, and the other 
comprising the spouses for marriages (a, b, d, c) where b-d s 1, that is, 
b 9* d. In other words, we are dealing here with a reducible society, which 
breaks down into the two following sub-populations: 




227 



Appendix to Part One 

Men of class A or C who marry according to formula (i) 

Men of class B or D who marry according to formula (II) 

Women of class A or C who marry according to formula (II) 

Women of class B or D who marry according to formula (1) 

Men of class A or C who marry according to formula (II) 

Men of class B or D who marry according to formula (I) 

Women of class A or C who marry according to formula (I) 

Women of class B or D who marry according to formula (II). 

Of course, as we have already noted above, these calculations are only 
valid if the alternation between formulas (I) and (II) follows the simple 
rules indicated earlier. If it were not so, the calculation would have to be 
modified. Further, if the rules of alternation did not satisfy condition (B), 
the problem could no longer be suitably treated by our method. 

n 

COMMENTARY 

This mathematical examination of the Murngin system calls for a number 
of comments. Firstly, the discovery that a Murngin type system, if it functions 
under the strict conditions which alone allow it to be interpreted systemati- 
cally, gives rise to the fission of the group into two irreducible societies, shows 
that a system of generalized exchange cannot evolve beyond its own formula. 
Doubtless, the system can be conceived of with any number of classes, but 
whether there be 3, n, or n + 1 , the structure remains unchanged. If an attempt 
is made to change the structure there are two possibilities open: either the 
change is made, and the formula for generalized exchange comes to an end 
(as with the Dieri system), or the formula is preserved, and then it is the 
change of structure which proves illusory. In acquiring eight subsections, 
the Murngin system succeeds only in functioning under the theoretical 
conditions for two juxtaposed systems of generalized exchange, each with 
four classes. We came to this conclusion in the previous chapter, using a 
purely structural analysis, and it is confirmed by the mathematical analysis. 
The extent to which Elkin was mistaken can be seen when, letting himself 
be misled by a Malinowski-inspired empiricism, he wrote: ‘And generally 
speaking, the study of the merely formal element in Australian kinship is 
hardly worth doing . . . After all, it is of little satisfaction and affords no 
real understanding of the life of the tribe.’ 1 
In connexion with Murngin society properly speaking, it is difficult to 
imagine that a society should function in the circumstances suggested by the 
theory and still maintain its individuality. On the other hand, if Murngin 
society was actually split into two sub-societies, this would not have passed 

1 Elkin, 1941, p. 91. 





228 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

unnoticed by observers of the quality of Warner and of Webb. In point of 
fact, the Murngin must adhere to a formula which allows them to preserve 
the unity of the group. Thus we w ere justified in supposing that the system, as 
expressed in the complicated rules of subsections and optional marriage, 
should be considered as a theory elaborated by the natives while under con- 
tradictory influences, and as a rationalization of these difficulties, rather 
than as an expression of the reality. The reality of the system lies elsewhere, 
and we have attempted to disclose the nature of this reality. 

It remains to be seen how the Murngin manage to avoid the danger of their 
theoretical system, which can only be done by applying it incorrectly. In 
these circumstances, the gaps in the observations, the ambiguous nature of 
the information on the various ways in which the cycles of exchanges can 
in fact be closed, perhaps do not arise solely from a lack of informants. 
It is possible that they are an indication of an intrinsic limit to the structure, 
which cannot be carried to its logical conclusion without compromising the 
unity of the group. Is the mark of this limit the fact that the real cycles are 
shorter or longer than those which would be implied by the existence of 
seven lines? This is possible, though it is difficult to see how this reduction 
would in itself constitute a solution. It is also possible that the cycle is closed 
with a displacement of one or more generations, as is the case among the 
Wikmunkan. However this may be, the apparently Aranda-type codification 
must always remain incomplete, or the social group must be segmented. 

Consequently, it is perhaps not absolutely arbitrary that the systems in 
the neighbourhood of Southern Cross give the appearance - an illusory one, 
moreover - of two endogamous moieties, and that the Yir-yoront are at 
least partially endogamous. The Yir-yoront are divided into two patrilineal 
moieties and ‘all the men of Pam Lul clans marry into the other moiety; 
but men of certain Pam Bib clans marry into Pam Lul clans, the others 
marrying into clans of their own Pam Bib division’. 1 These facts should be 
closely re-examined, in the light of this mathematical study and its theoretical 
conclusions. 

In any case, there is one tribe in which we know that a system of generalized 
exchange in the course of evolving tends to bring about the subdivision of 
the group into sub-societies. This is the Apinayd of Central Brazil. It may 
be remembered that the tribe is divided into four kiy&, i.e., four ‘sides’ or 
‘parties’. The rule of marriage is typical of generalized exchange: an A man 
marries a B woman, a B man a C woman, a C man a D woman, and a D 
man an A woman. Furthermore, boys follow their father’s kiye and girls 
their mother’s kiye , i.e., kiy 4 A comprises, on the one hand, the sons of A 
men and of B women, and on the other, the daughters of D men and of A 
women. In these circumstances, as we have already noted, all A men, and 
all B women, originate from one type of marriage (between A men and B 
women) which they are obliged to perpetuate. Although cousins of the first 

1 Sharp, 1934, p. 19. 




Appendix to Part One 229 

degree are prohibited spouses among the Apinaye (which may be considered 
as a partial defence against the consequences of the system), it is none the 
less true that the kiye, which seem exogamous, really function as endogamous 
units. 1 It is probable that a careful examination of cases of the same type, 
which must be more numerous than a too exclusive attention to the ‘exo- 
gamous' side of the phenomenon would allow us to suppose, would provide 
a useful method of approach for the study of systems of generalized exchange. 
We shall return to this problem of the relationships between endogamy and 
generalized exchange in Part II. 2 

1 cf. ch. IV above. Maybury-Lewis has given a very different interpretation of the 
Apinaye system (1960), to which the reader is referred. 

2 cf. chs. XXVI to XXVIII. 




PART TWO 



Generalized Exchange 



The earth, it is true, is in good condition, but roads are yet 
wanting; Ningkong is going to open them; he takes under 
his arm his sister, ‘Ndin Lakong, a ball of twine, unwinds 
part of it on China, and re-enters his palace; henceforth 
there is a fine road to China. He then goes towards the Shan 
countries, again unwinds his sister, and it is the Shan road. 
In the same way he opens the Kachin, Burmese and Kala 
roads . . . 

Kachin Myth of Creation: C. Gilhodes, The 
Kachins: Religion and Customs (Calcutta: 1922), 

p. 18 




1 ■ Simple Formula of Generalized 

Exchange 



CHAPTER XV 

The Givers of Wives 

I 

We have isolated a wider formula of exchange than that to which this term 
has so far been confined. Alongside and beyond exchange in its restricted 
sense, i.e., involving only two partners, there may be imagined, and there 
exists, a cycle which is less immediately discernible, precisely because it 
involves a more complex structure. It is to this that we give the name 
‘generalized exchange’. The analysis of forms of marriage in Australia, and 
the contradictions which appear in the traditional typology based exclusively 
on the notion of restricted exchange, have made us perceive the more complex 
formula, and the impossibility of understanding the marriage rules without 
integrating the two forms of exchange in the overall system which implies 
them both. But, so far, the formula of generalized exchange has appeared 
to us rather as a theoretical necessity. It has still to be discovered in the facts, 
and this is what we propose to do, by adopting a double viewpoint. 

We must first present concrete systems based clearly and simply upon a 
structure of generalized exchange, and this will be the aim of the first chapters 
of Part II. But, to justify the object of this work, which is to find the origin 
and regulatory function of kinship in exchange in all its forms, something 
more must be done, viz., to show that kinship systems and types of marriage 
which until now have been considered incompatible with what is currently 
called ‘marriage by exchange’ do in fact depend on exchange, for the same 
reason as do forms of marriage which are more literally known by this term; 
and also to show that all known and conceivable types of kinship and marriage 
can be integrated into one general classification, as methods of exchange, 
either restricted or generalized. It is the notion of generalized exchange which 
will allow us to make this reduction, or, if one prefers, to extend the structure 
of exchange to types and customs which might seem completely foreign to 
this notion. For the time being, however, we shall keep to the first of these 
tasks, namely, the examination of generalized exchange, as it appears in fact, 
in its simplest form. 



233 



234 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

It was Hodson, in 1922, who first formulated the hypothesis that groups 
allowing marriage with the matrilateral cross-cousin, to the exclusion of the 
patrilateral cross-cousin, are structurally different from those allowing 
marriage with both. 1 He took up this hypothesis more systematically in 
1925, and great credit goes to his short article, published in that year, for 
being the first to propose the theoretical distinction between dual organi- 
zations with bilateral cross-cousin marriage, and what he called tripartite 
organizations (composed of three sections, or a multiple of three), charac- 
terized by asymmetrical marriage between sister's son and brother’s daughter. 2 
The term, ‘tripartite organization’, is too narrow, since the Kachin system, 
which Hodson sees as the most perfect example, requires, at least on the level 
of the model, five elementary sections. In fact, systems of generalized exchange 
can incorporate any number of sections, but only if a given group is sub- 
divided into an odd number of marriage classes or functionally analogous 
units (or if this number, although even, is a multiple of three), can its presence 
be presumed a priori . 

Nevertheless, we shall come across systems of generalized exchange with 
four sections. Moreover, this is generally the case when dealing with a moiety 
system with generalized exchange - a formula already encountered among 
the Murngin 3 - the possibility of which, however, eluded Hodson. Neverthe- 
less, he was able to distinguish the two basic formulas; he understood the 
correlation between marriage rules and social structure (although he believed 
that tripartite organizations must always be patrilineal, 4 when, as we have 
seen, they need only be harmonic, as defined in chapter XIII) ; and he divined 
that the formula of generalized exchange was more widely distributed than 
the facts at his disposal indicated. Moreover, Hodson discovered the typical 
examples, and his conviction that the Kachin system was a particularly 
favourable illustration is still just as valid. 

In fact, in the Far East we find not one but two characteristic forms of 
generalized exchange, which are distributed - and this contrast itself poses 
a problem - at opposite extremes of the Pacific coast: on the one hand, 
among the Kachin of Burma and several tribes of Assam, and on the other, 
among the Gilyak of eastern Siberia. 



ii 

There are numerous sources on the Kachin, and also a commentary on their 
kinship system by Granet. 5 It is not always easy to reconcile the texts, which 
date from widely differing periods, often dealing with different groups, and 
all relating to a period during which we know the system had begun to 
disintegrate. 

1 Hodson, 1922. 

3 cf. ch. XII. 

5 Granet, 1939, pp. 211-12, 238-42. 



2 ibid. 1925. 

4 Hodson, 1925, p. 174. 




The Givers of Wives 235 

The Kachin live grouped in domains of a roughly feudal character. They 
are patrilineal and patrilocal, and practise polygamy. Their kinship system 
has been compiled by Wehrli from numerous sources dating before 1900. 1 
There is also an analysis of their kinship system by Gilhodes, 2 and there are 
various pieces of information in Hanson 3 and Hertz. 4 

These were the only available sources when I wrote the present work. 
Shortly after its publication, Leach began, firstly in the form of articles, later 
in a book, to publish the results of his fieldwork among the Kachin. It 
scarcely needs to be said that his fieldwork was conducted in a much more 
up-to-date and systematic manner than was that of his predecessors. Because 
of this, we have been faced with a problem in deciding whether or not it was 
advisable to retain in the present edition a chapter which was prepared from 
sources which were now out of date. Would it not be better to use Leach’s 
work as the basis for an entirely new text ? I ruled this out for several reasons 
which should be briefly declared. In the first place, it is this book and not 
any other which the publishers wish to have translated. In the second place, 
this chapter, in its original form, contained a detailed summary of the older 
writers which is not to be found in Leach’s publications, except as incidental 
references. It seems to me that in spite of the period when they worked, and 
their lack of ethnographic training, these older writers deserve much more 
credit than such treatment would have us suppose. In the third place, and 
most importantly, what I published in 1949 on the Kachin has been vigorously 
attacked, and on now re-reading the original text, it seems to me that it has 
much more often been distorted than really contradicted. It is true that, since 
his highly polemical article of 1951, Leach has been anxious to emphasize 
that he has drawn considerably closer to my point of view, but as he has 
republished this article unchanged in his book of 1961, 1 believe it necessary, 
without wishing to seek a retrospective quarrel, to justify what I originally 
wrote. 

There is one initial point on which I shall again hasten to pay tribute to 
Leach. His analysis of the Kachin kinship system is much more firm, com- 
plete and precise than his predecessors’. The latter left many points in doubt 
and I was obliged therefore, in the first edition of this book, to devote two 
pages 5 to discussing certain contradictions between the sources, and to 
attempt to fill in the gaps by hypothetical reconstructions. Although the 
system I arrived at in this way was very close to that reported by Leach, 
it is quite clear that his is infinitely preferable, and I shall content myself, 
therefore, with reproducing it here, with very slight modifications. This is 
to be found in the new Fig. 45. 

This much said, I shall proceed to discuss the many criticisms made by 
Leach in his 1951 article, none of which, in fact, seems to me to have any 
serious basis. 

* Wehrli, 1904. 2 Gilhodes, 1913, pp. 363-75; 1922. 3 Hanson, 1896; 1913. 

* Hertz, 1915 9 pp. 294-5. 




236 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

The first and most grave of these is that in this chapter J am held to have 
continually confused two distinct peoples, on the one hand the Kachin, and 
on the other the Haka Chin : 

‘There can be no doubt at all that he [Levi-Strauss] has assumed that 
Head’s statements about the Haka Chins are applicable to the Kachins 
[cf. L.-S., pp. 297, 322 ff., 377, etc.]. There can be no excuse for this blunder. 
Not only are the Chins geographically remote from the Kachins, they do 
not so far as we know even practise Kachin type marriage.’ 1 

I freely admit having been perhaps over-eager in combining the two types, 
without always distinguishing, as far as 1 should have done, the sources of 
the information I used in constructing the model of generalized exchange. 
But is this amalgamation really inexcusable, as Leach claims? In order to 
assert this, it would be necessary to be able to demonstrate that the Kachin 
on the one hand, and the Chin on the other, are ethnically, linguistically and 
culturally two homogeneous entities which can be clearly differentiated. This 
hardly seems demonstrable in the case of the Kachin, about whom Leach 
writes: ‘This population speaks a number of different languages and dialects 
and there are wide differences of culture between one part of the area and 
another.’ 2 In fact, and in Leach’s very own words, the term Kachin designates 
a highly heterogeneous population consisting of about 300,000 people 
scattered over an area of 50,000 square miles, a rectangle roughly 250 miles 
long and 170 miles across. The distance to the nearest Chin, who inhabit the 
hills on the other side of the Irrawaddy valley, is little more than 175 miles 
as the crow flies. In other words, the southern Kachin are closer to the Chin 
than they are to the northern Kachin. This conglomeration of local groups, 
sometimes without any contact with one another and scattered as they are 
over an enormous area, are arbitrarily grouped together in the literature as 
the Kachin. What actually do they have in common? As Leach himself 
acknowledges, it is not language, or dress, or culture. Leach succeeds in 
isolating only one criterion in justification of the collective and distinctive 
name of Kachin, and that is the existence of a common social structure 
within all the groups so designated: ‘I assume that within a somewhat 
arbitrarily defined area - namely the Kachin Hills Area - a social system 
exists. The valleys between the hills are included in this area so that Shan 
and Kachin are, at this level, part of a single social system.’ 3 If Leach sees 
the existence of a common social system as justifying the amalgamation of 
peoples as different in language, culture and history as the Shan and the 
Kachin, he is surely unwarranted in criticizing me for having likewise 
used a common social structure in bringing together the Kachin and the 
Chin groups, which certainly differ much less from one another than the 
Kachin differ from the Shan. 

It is true that in 1951 Leach disputed the existence of a social system 
1 Leach, 1961a, p. 78. 2 ibid. 1954, p. 1. 3 ibid. p. 60. 




The Givers of Wives 237 

common to the Kachin and to the Haka Chin. He wrote: ‘So far as we know 
[the Chins do not] even practise Kachin type marriage ’. 1 He immediately 
added a note: ‘The Haka Chins are neighbours to the Lakher on one side, 
who do practise Kachin type marriage, and to the Zahau Chins on the other] 
who do not. Concerning the Haka themselves there is no evidence .’ 2 Never- 
theless, Leach already seemed to have had a doubt in this article about the 
presumed heterogeneity of the social structures, since he wrote a few pages 
later: ‘Although Levi-Strauss confused Kachin practice with Chin, he might 
still 1 think argue that the scale of Kachin bride-price payments is paradoxi- 
cally large .’ 3 However, a remarkable change has taken place in Leach’s 
thinking on the close affinity of the Kachin and Haka Chin systems which 1 
postulated in 1949, and to which he took exception in 1951 on the plea that 
there was no evidence on Haka Chin rules of marriage. Some years later 
he wrote of: 

‘The Lakher, an Assam tribe who are neighbours to the Haka Chin of 
Burma, whom they closely resemble in general culture. These last live some 
hundreds of miles to the south-west of the Kachin groups and are not in 
direct contact with them. Kachin and Haka Chin cultures are, however, 
so similar in their general aspects that at least one distinguished anthro- 
pologist has confused the two groups (Levi-Strauss, 1949).’ 4 

Leach thus took six years to realize that there was some justification for 
the liberty that I had taken in constituting a type of social structure by 
borrowing elements from peoples who were undeniably geographically 
distinct (although not so much as he himself suggests). He simply forgets to 
give me credit for having demonstrated this identity between the social 
structure of the Kachin and that of the Haka Chin. The very fact that I was 
able to deduce the structure of the Haka Chin marriage system solely from 
their system of economic prestations shows that, contrary to Leach’s 
assertions, 1 never isolated the former from the latter. Indeed, it is not 
because I confused them that I thought them similar; it is because I had 
established that they were similar that I asserted that - as far as the marriage 
system was concerned - it was justifiable to merge them. Therefore, I have 
done no differently than Leach, when he recognizes that the category 
‘Kachin’ rests neither on language, nor on culture, nor on geographical 
proximity, but solely on a common social structure. This is a suitable juncture 
at which to recall that, as Leach rightly remarks without realizing the 
consequences for himself: ‘The assiduous ethnographer can find just as many 
“tribes” as he cares to look for .’ 5 

Another charge made against me by Leach is that of having considered 
that the Kachin system contained a paradox, and having concluded from this 
that the model of the system was necessarily in disequilibrium. There are two 

1 ibid. 1961 a, p. 78. 2 ibid. n. 2. 3 ibid. p. 88, n. 3. 

4 ibid. p. 116. 5 ibid. 1954, p. 291. 




238 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

aspects to be distinguished in his argument. In the first place, Leach disputes 
that the Kachin system tends to heighten the inequality between wife- 
receivers and wife-givers. According to him, the marriage prestations consist 
essentially of cattle, 

‘and cattle, among the Kachin, are a consumable commodity. On balance 
the chief does tend to accumulate wealth in the form of cattle. But prestige 
does not come from the owning of cattle ; it derives from the slaughter of 
animals in religious feasts ( manau ). If a chief becomes rich as a consequence 
of marriages or other legal transactions he merely holds manau at more 
frequent intervals and on a larger scale, and his followers, who partake 
of the feast, benefit accordingly. Here then is the element which is 
necessary to complete the cycle of exchange transactions, the absence of 
which struck Levi-Strauss as paradoxical.’ 1 

Leach himself indicates, however, 2 that prestations are far from consisting 
chiefly of cattle, since they also include free labour, and it is difficult to see 
in what form restitution is made for this. In particular, moreover, it is wrong 
to say that restitution for the cattle provided is somehow made in the form 
of feasts. That the chief, thanks to his cattle, is in a position to give feasts 
means a gain in his prestige, which is literally capitalized. There is thus a 
constant tendency for chiefs to increase their prestige by means of that which 
the givers are not in a position to acquire on their own account since they 
part with cattle in the course of making marriage payments. Here as else- 
where, Leach seems gradually to have seen the inadequacy of his early views, 
since he writes much more justly some years later, contradicting the passage 
just quoted: ‘Social climbing ... is the product of a dual process. Prestige 
is first acquired by an individual by lavishness in fulfilling ritual obligations. 
This prestige is then converted into recognized status by validating retro- 
spectively the rank of the individual’s lineage.’ 3 
Actually, in the passage previously quoted and in others 4 Leach seems to 
attribute to me the absurd idea that, in Kachin society, women are exchanged 
for goods. I have never said any such thing. It is clear that, as in ail other 
social systems, women are exchanged for women. The reason I claim the 
Kachin system to be basically unstable is completely different. It does not 
relate to the economic nature of an alleged counterpart to prestations of 
women, but to the distortion of matrimonial exchanges in a system of 
generalized exchange. In fact, the longer the cycle of exchanges tends to 
become, the more frequently it will happen, at all stages, that an exchange 
unit, not being immediately bound to furnish a counterpart to the group to 
which it is directly in debt, will seek to gain advantages either by accumulating 
women or by laying claims to women of an unduly high status. The first 
aspect of Leach’s argument that the model of Kachin society is in equili- 

2 ibid. p. 83. 

4 ibid. 1961a, pp. 90, 101, 103. 



1 Leach, 1961a, p. 89. 
3 ibid. 1954, p. 164. 




The Givers of Wives 239 

brium, owing to the fact that the cattle given by the receivers of women in 
return for wives are redistributed to these receivers in the form of feasts, 
does not hold good. Restitution can be made for the meat but not for the 
prestige gained in this distribution. 

Most important, however, it seems that Leach, having asserted in his 1951 
article, contrary to me, that the model of Kachin society is in equilibrium 
and is not subject to any instability (‘the system ... is neither contradictory 
nor self-destructive’; 1 ‘He [Levi-Strauss] is led to attribute to the Kachin 
system an instability which it does not in fact possess’ 2 ) came to a different 
interpretation, in his 1954 book, which in point of fact coincides with the 
one I had put forward five years earlier. 

It is clear, in fact, that in the 1951 article it is only one form of organization 
in Kachin society which is being considered. Indeed, Leach writes before 
beginning his analysis : ‘What follows applies primarily to the Kachin gumsa 
type of political organization. In an alternative type of system known as 
gumlao the structure is somewhat different.’ 3 Nowhere, however, is this 
second type discussed. By contrast, in his 1954 book Leach emphasized the 
duality of the two types. He shows that, depending on the region and some- 
times even the village, Kachin society may be organized either on an egali- 
tarian basis (gumlao) or a hierarchical and semi-feudal basis (gumsa). He 
also shows that the two types are structurally linked and that, theoretically 
at least, it could be conceived that Kachin society continually oscillates 
between the two types. With regard to the question which is our present 
concern, it is strange that Leach in analysing each form emphasizes, on the 
one hand ‘a basic inconsistency in gumsa ideology’ 4 and adds, on the other : 
‘yet the gumlao system is equally full of inconsistencies’. 5 He continues: 

‘Both systems are in a sense structurally defective. A gumsa political state 
tends to develop features which lead to rebellion, resulting, for a time, in 
a gumlao order. But a gumlao community . . . usually lacks the means to 
hold its component lineages together in a status of equality. It will then 
either disintegrate altogether through fission, or else status differences 
between lineage groups will bring the system back into the gumsa pattern.’ 6 

Having therefore asserted, in 1951, that Kachin society was in equilibrium, 
Leach acknowledged, in 1954, that it alternates, that it constantly oscillates, 
between two contradictory forms, each in itself involving a contradiction 
(‘self contradictions of gumsa and gumlao ’ 7 ). Leach so clearly realizes that 
he is thus merely adopting my own interpretation that he adds, not without 
embarrassment : 

‘The hypothesis that there might be such a relationship [between the 
Kachin mayu-dama marriage system and the class structure of Kachin 

1 ibid. p. 88. 2 ibid. p. 90. 3 ibid. p. 82, n. 2; cf. also p. 185, n. 1. 

4 Leach, 1954, p. 203. s loc. cit. 6 ibid. p. 204. 7 ibid. p. 231. 




240 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

society] originates with Levi-Strauss . . . [who] made the further suggestion 
that the existence of a mayu-dama type marriage system, while leading to 
a class stratified society, would for that very reason result in the breakdown 
of Kachin society. The material I have assembled here partly supports 
L6vi-Strauss' argument though the instability in Kachin gumsa organi- 
zation is not, 1 think, of quite the type that Levi-Strauss supposed’. 1 

Leach might well have added that this empirical confirmation of my inter- 
pretation completely invalidates w'hat he himself advanced in 1951. To be 
sure, I could not possibly have known of the existence of the two types, 
gumsa and gumlao , which had not been described by the older writers, and 
for which Leach deserves great credit in observing them in the field and in 
putting them in their correct perspective. But the pages which follow need 
only be read to show that, while unaware of this distinction, I nevertheless 
deduced it from a theoretical analysis of the formal conditions of Kachin 
marriage. However, from the fact that the gumlao distinguish the mayu and 
dama categories although ‘there is nothing in their political system which 
calls for such separation’, 2 l do not conclude, as does Leach, that there is 
a paradox, but that this dichotomy is not the result of a political system. 
Rather it is the cause: ‘Empirically, gumlao groups . . . seem to revert 
rather rapidly to class differentiation on a lineage basis.’ 3 

Even in 1954, in fact, Leach adhered to an interpretation which was 
insufficiently structural. The connexion between the feudal structure of 
gumsa type and matrilatcral marriage seemed a contingent one to him, when 
I had shown them to be structurally related. 

I shall pass more quickly over another of Leach’s criticisms, 4 that in my 
discussion of the Kachin system 1 did not distinguish clearly between hyper- 
gamy and hypogamy. The reason for this is that, from a formal point of view, 
there was no need to distinguish between the two. To make this point clear, in 
the pages that follow I shall use the term anisogamy, from botany, which 
simply means marriage between spouses of different status without any impli- 
cation as to which of them, to the man or the woman, is higher or lower. Here 
again, Leach, who in 1951 considered that hypergamy was a structural aspect 
of the Kachin systems, seems in 1954 to be drawing appreciably closer to my 
point of view: 

‘Matrilateral cross-cousin marriage is ... a correlate of a system of 
patrilineal lineages rigged into a class hierarchy. It does not necessarily 
follow that the bride-givers (mayu) should rank higher than the bride- 
receivers (dama)\ but it does follow that if class difference is expressed by 
marriage, then mayu and dama must be exclusive and one of the two 
must rank above the other.’ 5 

1 Leach, 1954, pp. 287-8. 2 ibid. p. 203. 

3 loc. cit. 4 ibid. 1961a, p. 80, n. 1. 

3 Ibid. 1954, p. 256. 




The Givers of Wives 




Indeed, it seems to me that in the same way that matrilateral and patrilateral 
marriage are both consistent with the two modes of descent, although 
patrilateral marriage is more likely in a regime with matrilineal descent 
(because of its structural instability which makes it prefer short cycles), and 
matrilateral marriage more likely in a patrilineal regime (which more easily 
allows the cycles to be lengthened), so hypogamy (representing the maternal 
aspect of anisogamy), in a regime with patrilineal descent, is the sign of a 
relatively unstable structure, and hypergamy of a stable structure. Hypogamy 
is therefore a sign of instability in a patrilineal society inclined towards 
feudalism, because its practice characterizes lineages which seek, in alliance 
(i.e., in a recognition of cognates), a means of affirming their position as 
agnates. It thus makes cognation a means to agnation, whereas hypergamy 
more logically assumes that, in an agnatic system, cognatic relatives are not 
pertinent. Consequently, to make the Kuchin hypogamic configuration a 
historical and local result of the assimilation ‘of Shan ideas about class 
difference’ 1 is to fail to recognize that hypogamy represents an immense 
structural phenomenon, universally attested to in the taboos on parents-in- 
law, and that it corresponds to a state of tension between paternal and maternal 
lineages, the latter not yet in disequilibrium to the sole benefit of the first 
as with true hypergamy. In his 1951 article in which, concerning another 
problem, he proposes an interpretation, which this time is purely structural. 



of the relationship between ‘affinal tie" and ‘sibling tie’, Leach seems finally 
to have found the principle for a typology which could usefully be extended 
to the classification of gumsa and gumlao , in which exchanges of women are 



still inseparably part of the general system of prestations. 

I shall end with the last criticism made against me by Leach in 1951, 
namely, that of attempting to establish a conjectural history of all Asiatic 
societies. 2 Here again, it is Leach himself who, hostile to all historical 
reconstructions in 1951, states, as soon after as 1954, that it is very difficult 



when faced with systems of this type (referring to a periodic model, thus one 
which is interpretable only in diachronic terms) not to attempt to check the 
synchronic interpretation by historical considerations: ‘I move on now from 
semi-history to pure speculation. We do not know how Kachin society grew 
to be what it is, but I am going to guess. My guess must fit with the historical 
facts which I have outlined above, it must also be consistent with known 
facts of Asiatic ethnography.’ 3 Once again, time has done its work, but, 
contrary to Leach’s assertion 4 that I regard the Kachin system as a borrowing 
from an archaic Chinese system, I have never said any such thing, but 
merely that the Kachin system, even today, attests to the existence of a type 
of social structure which must formerly have spread over an enormous part 



of Asia, including China. 

After this long discussion, we can now take up the examination of the 



1 ibid. 

3 ibid. 1954, p. 247. 



2 ibid. 1961a, pp. 77 and 103. 
4 ibid. p. 249. 




24 2 The Elementary Structures of Kinship 

Kachin system from the beginning, i.e., by commencing with the kinship 
system (Fig. 45). 

(SHU) DAMA HPU-NAU MAYU (JI) 



n i — 


1 


i 


1 


i 


— 1 


A = O 


A = O 


A = 


O 


A 


GU MOI 


ji 


WOI 


ji 


WOI 


ji 





1 

A - 


1 

: . ") 


1 

A ' 


r 


1 

A = 


» 

3= O 


1 ( 

A = O 


1 

t 




SHU 


HKRI 


GU 


MOI 


WA 


NU 


TSA NI 


y 




(hkri) 
- 1 


(ning) 


1 




1 




(ning) 

.... | f 


1 


r 

o 


1! 


1 

• > 


1 

A ’ 


1 


1 

A = 


1 

= o 


1 » 

A = O 


1 

r 


SHU 


SHU 


HKRI 


HKAU 


NA 


HPU 


RAT 


HKAU NI 


J 


(ning) 


(hkri) 


(ning) 


(gu) 






(ning) 


(tsa) (ning) 








(madu wa) 


(ego) 


EGO 


MADU JAN 








HKRI 


HKAU 


NAU 


NAU 


NAM 


HKAU 






- 1 


(ning) 


(rat) 

I 




< 

_J 


(ning) 


(tsa) 

1 


1 


1 

o 


1 

A = 


1 

o 


1 

A = 


1 

= o 


1 

A = 


\ ) 


1 1 

A = O 


1 


SHU 


SHU 


HKRI 


HKRI 


SHA 


SHA 


NAM 


NAM NI 


J 


(ning) 


(hkri) 
_ | 


(sha) 


(sha) 

1 


(nam) 


(nam) 

1 


(ning) 


(tsa) (ning) 
1 




1 

o 


\ 

A = 


\ 

■■ o 


1 

A 


\ 

= o 


1 

A = 


\ 

= o 


1 

A 




SHU 


SHU 


SHU 


SHU 


SHU 


SHU 


NAM 


NAM 












(nam) 


(nam) 


(ning) 


(tsa) 





Fig. 45. The Kachin system (after Leach, 1961a, p. 41). 

The terms in parentheses are those used exclusively by a female Ego. 

This system is even more firmly structured than Leach seems to believe. 
Indeed, Leach is troubled by the collective designations of dama as ‘grand- 
children’ and mayu as ‘grandparents’, which he tries to justify by saying: 
‘Those who do not do so [i.e., which are neither hpu-nau (“brothers”) nor 
mayu nor dama] by strict cognate or affinal relationship are treated much 
as if they were remote relatives of Ego’s own clan.’ 1 But they are strictly 
cognates, at least at the level of the model. When Ego was a child, the only 
cognates that the last line to the right {mayu of mayu) could contain were 
‘grandparents’: father’s mother’s mother, mother’s mother’s father; and, 
when Ego gets older, he will find in the last line to the left {dama of dama ) 
cognates who will be ‘grandchildren’: his daughter's daughter’s children. 
The terms for the extreme lines are thus structurally a function of the rule of 

1 Leach, 1961a, p. 82. 




The Givers of Wives 243 

marriage. They mean: ‘line in which I have (great) grandparents’, ‘line in 
which 1 have (great) grandchildren’. 

The terminology thus reflects completely the rules of alliance, which must 
now be examined. 

‘In all that concerns marriage, Kachins are divided into two groups: 
mayu ni and dama ni. Mayu ni are the tribe or the tribes which furnish 
women; dama ni, those where husbands are found.’ 1 Strictly, the names 
mayu ni and dama ni designate families of which two members at least are 
united by marriage, but they also have a more general connotation. They 
are applied to all families or tribes which can intermarry, or which are in 
a proper relationship with one another for intermarriage. 

‘A tribe or family which is dama with regard to the mayu ni, tribe which 
gives it women, is its dama tribe. So, in the village of Matau, there are 
three principal families or branches: Chyamma ni, Latsin ni and Kawlu ni. 
The first takes a wife from the second, the second from the third and the 
third from the first. 

‘Chyamma ni are dama ni of Latsin ni, who are dama ni of Kawlu ni, 
who are dama ni of Chyamma ni. 

‘As also Latsin ni are mayu ni of Chyamma ni, who are mayu ni of 
Kawlu ni, who are mayu ni of Latsin ni. 

‘According to this arrangement, women remain only one generation in 
the same family; they turn so to speak from one tribe to another, whilst 
husbands remain stationary. So in the foregoing example, Latsin damsels 
become Chyamma ladies, whose daughters become Kawlu ladies, whose 
daughters become Latsin ladies, etc.’ 

It obviously ‘follows that the nearest relative a young man can marry is 
only a cousin, daughter of a maternal uncle ... In his mayu tribe, he can 
meet only cousins issued of maternal uncles, and according to custom, it is 
good, but not obligatory, that his choice fall on one of them.' 2 The same 
information is found in Hanson and in Carrapiett: ‘The Kachins have 
clearly defined families who are said to be Dama or “husband-giving”, and 
others who are said to be Mayu or “wife-giving” families.’ 3 
The passages cited are important for several reasons, firstly, because they 
establish the marriage rule with the mother's brother’s daughter, and the 
general formula of which it is the application, and secondly, because they 
show that the exchange cycle can be closed after a minimum of three stages, 
which directly eliminates any possibility of dual organization (which would 
require at least four stages). Here then is an absolutely simple formula of 
generalized exchange, not derived (as it was with the Murngin) from a 
previous organization into exogamous moieties. 

The normal Kachin marriage then is with the mother’s brother’s daughter, 

1 Gilhodes, 1922, p. 207. 2 ibid. pp. 207-8. 

3 Carrapiett, 1929, p. 32; Hanson, 1913, pp. 181-2. 




244 



The Elementary Structures of Kinship 



who, however, is denoted by the same term as the wife’s brother’s daughter. 
There is also marriage with a classificatory ‘wife’ of the father , 1 as well as 
the levirate and the sororate. Among the Haka Chin, the first is called Nu 
Klai , to marry a relative by marriage . 2 Gilhodes also describes successive 
sororal polygyny. Thus it seems that the preferred marriage results, not so 
much from a prescribed and precise degree of relationship, as from a general 
relationship between all the men of a lineage, creditors in wives, dama ni, 
and a debtor lineage, mavu ni , in respect of all its daughters and sisters. 
This is just the state of affairs represented to us by the observers. Carrapiett 
savs: ‘There is a word in Kachin which has been defined as a “debt”. 
Every breach of the honour of a Kachin, every injury caused to him directly 
or indirectly, results in a “debt” which must be satisfied some day or other .’ 3 
Debts and claims are handed on for generation after generation. ‘Nine out 
of ten cases can be traced, either directly or indirectly, but generally directly, 
to a woman .’ 4 A note by Barnard in the same work adds this valuable com- 
ment: ‘A Kachin woman, though actually married to an individual, is taken 
for a clan, and on becoming a widow passes to another male of the clan 
who exercises marital rights over her. Hence, according to true Kachin 
custom, there is no such thing as divorce . . . The best way to settle such 
cases is to provide another wife .’ 5 Conversely, if a suitor asks for the younger 
sister before the elder sister he must pay a higher price, e.g., an extra buffalo . 6 
The same author adds that, in the case of trouble in the household: ‘Some- 
times, to end the trouble, the parents exchange the first wife who is impossible 
against one of her younger sisters whom they hope will be more easily 
satisfied; the elder sister must then make over to her younger sister all her 
jewels, and the younger one takes her place .’ 7 It is also stated that brothers 
commonly marry their brothers' widows, and that a father-in-law marries 
his daughter-in-law if she is widowed. This clearly shows that practice 
coincides with the terminology. ‘If a woman refuses to live with her husband 
and all efforts by her people to induce her to return to him have failed, her 
family are required to give him another woman .’ 8 Carrapiett cites a case 
judged before the district court, which clearly shows the collective and 
reciprocal aspect of the conjugal claim: ‘Plaintiff is widow of respondent's 
cousin who died a year ago. She sues to be divorced from respondent’s 
family as none of the male members remaining have taken her to wife .’ 9 
Conversely, if the mother’s brother has no daughter to give in marriage, he 
must look for a wife for his nephew from among his other kin. If, on the other 
hand, a nephew refuses to marry his cousin, he must pay a fine to the offended 



1 Carrapiett, 1929, p. 96; Gilhodes, 1922, p. 209. 

2 Head, 1917, pp. 8-9. 3 Carrapiett, 1929, p. 4. * ibid. p. 5. s ibid. pp. 35-6. 

6 Gilhodes, 1922, p. 212, a mi than or bos frontalis, cf. also Carrapiett, 1929, p. 73: ‘It 

is considered an insult if a younger sister marries before her elder sister; and every endeavour 

is made (though not always successfully) to avoid this happening.’ 

7 ibid. pp. 222-3. 

• ibid. 1929, p. 37. 



9 ibid. p. 117. 




The Givers of Wives 245 

uncle. If the wife dies after marriage, her husband has the right to demand 
another woman from his parents-in-law (uncle and aunt), who give him a 
daughter or a kinswoman as wife. Moreover, in the case of adultery the 
seducer’s clan is jointly responsible for the fine payable to the offended 
husband. 1 

That one never marries an individual is brought out clearly in the cus- 
tomary form of the marriage proposal. 

‘The first step is to send Salangs (elders) to the chosen family ... If the 
parents are agreeable, the Salangs surreptitiously take some personal 
ornaments or garments of all the eligible daughters - e.g., a flower, betel, 
tobacco, head-dress - which is brought to the man’s village. 

‘Here a Ningwawt divines . . . which of the daughters is the most 
suitable.’ 2 

Gilhodes gives other information: ‘Woman, by marriage, enters into the 
family of her husband of whom she becomes so to say the property. So, at 
her husband’s death, she is not free to return to her parents' house, or to 
re-marry with one of her choice; she remains at the disposal of the dama ni.' 3 
The alternatives are marriage to a brother-in-law, or to a cousin of her 
husband, or to a married brother-in-law, as a second wife, or to a son from 
one of her husband’s previous marriages. It is only if none of the dama ni 
wants her that she may return to her own family, who must give back part 
of the price paid for her. 



m 

What then are these groups between which marriage prestations are made 
in a way which is in principle unchangeable and directional? The older 
writers agree in reporting that the Kachin are subdivided into five principal 
groups: Marip, Maran, Nkhum, Lahpai and Lathong. Myth has it that they 
derive from a common ancestor. However, it is highly doubtful whether 
these are actually clans. These groups have certain ethnic differences, of 
dialect, dress and custom. The bond between them is established through a 
common tradition, and a real or theoretical kinship uniting the noble families 
of each group. However, George, quoted by Wehrli, adduces precise examples 
to show that the affiliations no longer have anything to do with real or 
mystical kinship relationship. For example, a Szi-Lepai who settles in the 
neighbourhood of a Maran chief becomes a Maran, together with all his 
descendants. Although nowadays the groups are more or less intermingled, 
it seems still possible to find a geographical centre for each of them which is 
perhaps the trace of a more rigid spatial division: the Lathong are to the 

1 Wehrli, 1904, p. 28. 2 Carrapiett, 1929, pp. 32-3. 

3 Gilhodes, 1922, p. 227. Reservations must be held concerning this interpretation, 

which does not seem to correspond to reality, cf. below, pp. 260-61. 




